UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark one)
☒ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2022
OR
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ___________ to ______________
COMMISSION FILE NUMBER 1-16483
Mondelēz International, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Virginia 52-2284372
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
905 West Fulton Market, Suite 200
Chicago,Illinois 60607
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: 847-943-4000
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each classTrading
Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Class A Common Stock, no par value MDLZ The Nasdaq Global Select Market
1.625% Notes due 2027 MDLZ27 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.250% Notes due 2028 MDLZ28 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.750% Notes due 2033 MDLZ33 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
2.375% Notes due 2035 MDLZ35 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
4.500% Notes due 2035 MDLZ35A The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
1.375% Notes due 2041 MDLZ41 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
3.875% Notes due 2045 MDLZ45 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    Yes  x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.    Yes  ¨    No  x
Note: Checking the box above will not relieve any registrant required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act from
their obligations under those Sections.
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to
such filing requirements for the past 90 days.    Yes  x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule
405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to
submit such files).    Yes   x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting
company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and
“emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer x  Accelerated filer ¨
Non-accelerated filer ¨  Smaller reporting company ☐
  Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with
any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.    ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its
internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm
that prepared or issued its audit report.  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).    Yes ☐     No  x
The aggregate market value of the shares of Class A Common Stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant, computed by reference to the
closing price of such stock on June 30, 2022, was $85.1 billion. At January 31, 2023, there were 1,363,306,849 shares of the registrant’s Class A
Common Stock outstanding.
Documents Incorporated by Reference
Portions of the registrant’s definitive proxy statement to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with its annual
meeting of shareholders expected to be held on May 17, 2023 are incorporated by reference into Part III hereof.
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc.
  Page No.
Part  I –
Item 1. Business 3
Item 1A. Risk Factors 12
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 27
Item 2. Properties 27
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 27
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 27
Part II  –
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters
   and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 28
Item 6. Reserved 29
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations: 30
Recent Developments and Significant Items Affecting Comparability 30
Summary of Results 32
Financial Outlook 33
Discussion and Analysis of Historical Results 35
Critical Accounting Estimates 51
Liquidity and Capital Resources 54
Commodity Trends 56
Non-GAAP Financial Measures 57
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 64
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data: 66
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 66
Consolidated Statements of Earnings
   for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 69
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Earnings
   for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 70
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 71
Consolidated Statements of Equity
   for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 72
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
   for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 73
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 74
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 127
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 127
Item 9B. Other Information 128
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 128
Part III  –
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 129
Item 11. Executive Compensation 129
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management
   and Related Stockholder Matters 129
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 129
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 129
Part IV  –
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 130
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 134
Signatures 135
In this report, for all periods presented, “we,” “us,” “our,” “the Company” and “Mondelēz International” refer to Mondelēz
International, Inc. and subsidiaries. References to “Common Stock” refer to our Class A Common Stock.
i
Table of Contents
Forward-Looking Statements
This report contains “forward-looking statements” within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. All statements other than statements
of historical fact are “forward-looking statements” for purposes of federal and state securities laws, including any
projections of earnings, revenue or other financial items; any statements of the plans, strategies and objectives of
management, including for future operations, capital expenditures or share repurchases; any statements concerning
proposed new products, services, or developments; any statements regarding future economic conditions or
performance; any statements of belief or expectation; and any statements of assumptions underlying any of the
foregoing or other future events. Forward-looking statements may include, among others, the words, and variations of
words, “will,” “may,” “expect,” “would,” “could,” “might,” “intend,” “plan,” “believe,” “likely,” “estimate,” “anticipate,”
“objective,” “predict,” “project,” “drive,” “seek,” “aim,” “target,” “potential,” “commitment,” “outlook,” “continue” or any
other similar words.
Although we believe that the expectations reflected in any of our forward-looking statements are reasonable, actual
results or outcomes could differ materially from those projected or assumed in any of our forward-looking statements.
Our future financial condition and results of operations, as well as any forward-looking statements, are subject to
change and to inherent risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond our control. Important factors that could
cause our actual results or performance to differ materially from those contained in or implied by our forward-looking
statements include, but are not limited to, the following:
•weakness in macroeconomic conditions in our markets, including as a result of inflation (and related monetary
policy actions by governments in response to inflation), volatility of commodity and other input costs and
availability of commodities;
•geopolitical uncertainty, including the impact of ongoing or new developments in the war in Ukraine, related
current and future sanctions imposed by governments and other authorities and related impacts, including on
our business operations, employees, reputation, brands, financial condition and results of operations;
•global or regional health pandemics or epidemics, including COVID-19;
•competition and our response to channel shifts and pricing and other competitive pressures;
•pricing actions;
•promotion and protection of our reputation and brand image;
•weakness in consumer spending and/or changes in consumer preferences and demand and our ability to
predict, identify, interpret and meet these changes;
•risks from operating globally, including in emerging markets, such as political, economic and regulatory risks;
•the outcome and effects on us of legal and tax proceedings and government investigations, including the
European Commission legal matter;
•use of information technology and third party service providers;
•unanticipated disruptions to our business, such as malware incidents, cyberattacks or other security breaches,
and supply, commodity, labor and transportation constraints;
•our ability to identify, complete, manage and realize the full extent of the benefits, cost savings or synergies
presented by strategic transactions, including our recently completed acquisitions of Ricolino, Clif Bar, Chipita,
Gourmet Food, Grenade and Hu, and the anticipated closing of our planned divestiture of our developed
market gum business in North America and Europe;
•our investments and our ownership interests in those investments, including JDE Peet's and KDP;
•the restructuring program and our other transformation initiatives not yielding the anticipated benefits;
•changes in the assumptions on which the restructuring program is based;
•the impact of climate change on our supply chain and operations;
•consolidation of retail customers and competition with retailer and other economy brands;
•changes in our relationships with customers, suppliers or distributors;
•management of our workforce and shifts in labor availability or labor costs;
•compliance with legal, regulatory, tax and benefit laws and related changes, claims or actions;
•perceived or actual product quality issues or product recalls;
•failure to maintain effective internal control over financial reporting or disclosure controls and procedures;
•our ability to protect our intellectual property and intangible assets;
•tax matters including changes in tax laws and rates, disagreements with taxing authorities and imposition of
new taxes;
•changes in currency exchange rates, controls and restrictions;
1
Table of Contents
•volatility of and access to capital or other markets, the effectiveness of our cash management programs and
our liquidity;
•pension costs;
•significant changes in valuation factors that may adversely affect our impairment testing of goodwill and
intangible assets; and
•the risks and uncertainties, as they may be amended from time to time, set forth in our filings with the U.S.
Securities and Exchange Commission, including this Annual Report on Form 10-K and subsequent Quarterly
Reports on Form 10-Q.
There may be other factors not presently known to us or which we currently consider to be immaterial that could cause
our actual results to differ materially from those projected in any forward-looking statements we make. We disclaim and
do not undertake any obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement in this report except as required by
applicable law or regulation. In addition, historical, current and forward-looking sustainability-related statements may be
based on standards for measuring progress that are still developing, internal controls and processes that continue to
evolve, and assumptions that are subject to change in the future.
2
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business.
General
Mondelēz International’s purpose is to empower people to snack right. We sell our products in over 150 countries
around the world. We are one of the world’s largest snack companies with global net revenues of $31.5 billion and net
earnings of $2.7 billion in 2022. Our core business is making and selling chocolate, biscuits and baked snacks. We also
have additional businesses in adjacent, locally relevant categories including gum & candy, cheese & grocery and
powdered beverages. Our portfolio includes iconic global and local brands such as Oreo, Ritz, LU, CLIF Bar and Tate’s
Bake Shop biscuits and baked snacks, as well as Cadbury Dairy Milk, Milka and Toblerone chocolate.
We strive to create a positive impact on the world and communities in which we operate while driving business
performance. Our goal is to lead the future of snacking around the world by offering the right snack, for the right
moment, made the right way. We aim to deliver a broad range of delicious, high-quality snacks that nourish life’s
moments, made with sustainable ingredients and packaging that consumers can feel good about. We remain
committed to driving longstanding and enduring positive change in the world.
Strategy
We aim to be the global leader in snacking by focusing on growth, execution, culture and sustainability. Our strategic
plan builds on our strong foundations, including leadership in attractive categories, an attractive global footprint, a
strong core of iconic global and local brands, marketing, sales, distribution and cost excellence capabilities, and top
talent with a growth mindset.
Our plan to drive long-term growth includes four strategic priorities:
•Accelerate consumer-centric growth. Our consumers are the reason we want to be the best snacking company
in the world, and we put them at the heart of everything we do. With our consumers in mind, we are focused on
accelerating and increasing our focus on chocolate, biscuits and baked snacks by investing in both our global
and local brands. We are working to deliver multi-category growth in key geographies, expand our presence in
high growth channels and increase our presence in under-represented segments and price tiers. As demands
on consumers’ time increase and consumer eating habits evolve, we aim to meet consumers' snacking needs.
We plan to test, learn and scale new product offerings quickly to meet diverse and evolving local and global
snacking demand.
•Drive operational excellence. Our operational excellence and continuous improvement plans include a special
focus on the consumer-facing areas of our business and optimizing our sales, marketing and customer service
efforts. To drive productivity gains and cost improvements across our business, we also plan to continue
leveraging our global shared services platform, driving greater efficiencies in our supply chain informed by a
consumer-centric approach and applying strong cost discipline across our operations. We expect the
improvements and efficiencies we drive will fuel our growth and continue to expand profit dollars. We are also
focused on boosting digital commerce and our digital transformation program that will help to enable consumer
demand and sales opportunities.
•Build a winning growth culture. To support the acceleration of our growth, we are becoming more agile, digital
and local-consumer focused. We are committed to investing in a diverse and talented workforce that helps our
business move forward with greater speed and agility along with future-forward growth capabilities. We
empower our local teams to innovate and deliver consumers’ snacking needs while continuing to leverage our
global scale to efficiently support our growth strategy. We have given our local teams more autonomy to drive
commercial and innovation plans as they are closer to the needs and desires of consumers. We will continue to
leverage the efficiency and scale of our regional operating units while empowering our local and commercial
operations to respond faster to changing consumer preferences and capitalize on growth opportunities. We
believe our commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion and operating and cultural shifts to continue building a
winning growth culture will help drive profitable top-line growth.
3
Table of Contents
•Scale sustainable snacking. We continue to focus significant efforts to drive progress against our core
initiatives for more sustainable and mindful snacking. We have a clear strategic approach to focus on the areas
where we believe we can drive the most impact with a sustainable snacking strategy, with environmental, social
and governance (“ESG”) goals and initiatives that include significant involvement and oversight by our
leadership and Board of Directors. This includes ongoing efforts to sustainably source key ingredients, reduce
our end-to-end environmental impact and innovate our processes and packaging to reduce waste and promote
recycling. Please see our Sustainability and Mindful Snacking section below.
We run our business with a long-term perspective, and we believe the successful delivery of our strategic plan will drive
consistent top- and bottom-line growth and enable us to create long-term value for our shareholders.
Global Operations
We sell our products in over 150 countries and have operations in approximately 80 countries, including 148
manufacturing and processing facilities across 46 countries. The portion of our net revenues generated outside the
United States was 73.6% in 2022, 75.1% in 2021 and 73.2% in 2020. For more information on our U.S. and non-U.S.
operations, refer to Note 18, Segment Reporting; on our manufacturing and other facilities, refer to Item 2, Properties;
and risks related to our operations outside the United States, see Item 1A, Risk Factors.
We also monitor our revenue growth across emerging markets and developed markets:
•Our emerging markets include our Latin America region in its entirety; the Asia, Middle East and Africa
(“AMEA”) region, excluding Australia, New Zealand and Japan; and the following countries from the Europe
region: Russia, Ukraine, Türkiye, Kazakhstan, Georgia, Poland, Czech Republic, Slovak Republic, Hungary,
Bulgaria, Romania, the Baltics and the East Adriatic countries.
•Our developed markets include the entire North America region, the Europe region excluding the countries
included in the emerging markets definition, and Australia, New Zealand and Japan from the AMEA region.
Reportable Segments
Our operations and management structure are organized into four operating segments:
•Latin America
•AMEA
•Europe
•North America
We manage our operations by region to leverage regional operating scale, manage different and changing business
environments more effectively and pursue growth opportunities as they arise across our key markets. Our regional
management teams have responsibility for the business, product categories and financial results in the regions.
Please see Note 18, Segment Reporting and Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations for additional information.
Product Categories
Our brands span five product categories:
•Biscuits & Baked Snacks (including cookies, crackers, salted snacks, snack bars and cakes & pastries)
•Chocolate
•Gum & candy
•Beverages
•Cheese & grocery
Seasonality
Demand for our products is generally balanced throughout the year, with increases in the fourth quarter primarily
because of holidays and other seasonal events. Depending on the timing of Easter, the holiday sales may shift between
and affect net revenue in the first and second quarter.
4
Table of Contents
Customers
We generally sell our products to supermarket chains, wholesalers, supercenters, club stores, mass merchandisers,
distributors, convenience stores, gasoline stations, drug stores, value stores and other retail food outlets. We also sell
products directly to businesses and consumers through various pure play e-retail platforms, retailer digital platforms,
our direct-to-consumer websites and social media platforms. No single customer accounted for 10% or more of our net
revenues from continuing operations in 2022. For a discussion of long-term demographics, consumer trends and
demand, refer to our Financial Outlook within Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations.
Distribution and Marketing
We distribute our products through direct store delivery, company-owned and satellite warehouses, distribution centers,
third party distributors and other facilities. We use the services of independent sales offices and agents in some of our
international locations. Through our global digital commerce organization and capabilities, we pursue online growth with
partners in key markets around the world, including both pure e-tailers and omni-channel retailers. We continue to
invest in advertising and consumer promotions, talent and digital capabilities. Our digital commerce channel strategies
play a critical role in our ambition to be the global leader in snacking.
We conduct marketing efforts through three principal sets of activities: (i) consumer marketing and advertising including
digital and social media, on-air, print, outdoor and other product promotions; (ii) consumer sales incentives such as
coupons and rebates; and (iii) trade promotions to support price features, displays and other merchandising of our
products by our customers.
Research, Development and Innovation
We work to understand consumer needs and deliver snacks with consistent quality and taste. We continue to invest in
a global network of technical centers to research and support our growth while continuing to innovate our processes.
Our innovation and new product development objectives include continuous improvement in food safety and quality,
growth through new products, superior consumer satisfaction and reduced production costs. Our innovation efforts
focus on anticipating consumer demands and adapting quickly to changing market trends. We work to test-and-learn
new ideas and implement successful ones into other areas of our business. Mindful snacking and sustainability are a
significant focus of our current research and development initiatives. We work to introduce new varieties of our core
products, including new taste or nutrition profiles based on consumer preferences, such as Cadbury Dairy Milk
chocolate bars with 30% less sugar, Sugar-free and Gluten-free Oreos and the Cadbury Plant Bar, a vegan (100%
plant-based) sustainably-sourced cocoa chocolate bar wrapped in plant-based packaging. We aim to address
consumer needs and market trends and leverage scalable innovation platforms, sustainability programs and
breakthrough technologies in order to delight our consumers, fuel our growth and reduce our environmental impact. We
are focusing our technical research and development resources at 12 technical centers around the globe to drive
growth, creativity, greater effectiveness, improved efficiency and accelerated project delivery.
We also have a dedicated innovation and venture hub, SnackFutures, which is designed to capitalize on consumer
trends and emerging growth opportunities in mindful snacking. The group’s priorities support incremental growth
against three key strategic areas: invent new brands and businesses, invest in early-stage entrepreneurs, and amplify
SnackFutures’ impact with the CoLab start-up engagement and mentoring program built to provide start-ups with tools,
technologies and expertise that can help them learn, grow and succeed.
Competition
We operate in highly competitive markets that include global, regional and local competitors, including new start-up
brands and businesses. Some competitors have different profit objectives and investment time horizons than we do
and therefore may approach pricing and promotional decisions differently. We compete based on product quality, brand
recognition and loyalty, service, product innovation, taste, convenience, nutritional value, the ability to identify and
satisfy consumer preferences, effectiveness of our digital and other sales and marketing strategies, routes to market
and distribution networks, promotional activity and price. Our advantaged global footprint, operating scale and portfolio
of brands have all significantly contributed to building our market-leading positions across most of the product
categories in which we sell. To grow and maintain our market positions, we focus on meeting consumer needs and
preferences through a local-first commercial focus, new digital and other sales and marketing initiatives,
5
Table of Contents
product innovation and high standards of product quality. We also continue to optimize our manufacturing and other
operations and invest in our brands through ongoing research and development, advertising, marketing and consumer
promotions.
Raw Materials and Packaging
We purchase and use large quantities of commodities, including cocoa, dairy, wheat, edible oils, sugar and other
sweeteners, flavoring agents and nuts. In addition, we purchase and use significant quantities of packaging materials to
package our products and natural gas, fuels and electricity for our factories and warehouses. We monitor worldwide
supply, commodity cost and currency trends so we can sustainably and cost-effectively secure ingredients, packaging
and fuel required for production.
A number of external factors such as changing weather patterns and conditions, commodity market conditions, the
macroeconomic environment, supply chain disruptions, currency fluctuations and the effects of governmental
agricultural or other programs affect the cost and availability of raw materials and agricultural materials used in our
products. We address higher commodity costs and currency impacts primarily through hedging, higher pricing and
manufacturing and overhead cost control. We use hedging techniques to limit the impact of fluctuations in the cost of
our principal raw materials; however, we may not be able to fully hedge against commodity cost changes, and our
hedging strategies may not protect us from increases in specific raw material costs.
Due to factors noted above, the costs of our principal raw materials can fluctuate. Commodity costs have primarily
increased due to recent supply chain disruptions. We expect commodity cost volatility to continue, and our commodity
hedging activities cannot fully offset this volatility. Despite the recent and expected supply chain, transportation and
labor disruptions, at this time we believe there will continue to be an adequate supply of the raw materials we use and
that they will generally remain available. However, we continue to monitor the near-term and long-term impacts of the
pandemic, geopolitical conditions, supply chain disruptions, inflationary pressures, climate change and related factors
that could affect the availability or cost of raw materials, packaging and energy. For additional information, refer to
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations and Commodity Trends. For
information on our ongoing sustainability efforts and programs, refer to Sustainability and Mindful Snacking below.
Human Capital
We believe the strength of our workforce is one of the significant contributors to our success as a global company that
leads with purpose. All our employees contribute to our success and help us drive strong financial performance.
Attracting, developing and retaining global talent with the right skills to drive our business is central to our purpose,
mission and long-term growth strategy. Beyond this, diversity is a strength that drives innovation and growth, and we
strive to champion diversity, inclusion, and economic empowerment.
Workforce Profile: At December 31, 2022, we had approximately 91,000 employees. At December 31, 2022, we had
approximately 13,000 U.S. employees and approximately 78,000 employees outside the United States, with employees
represented by labor unions or workers’ councils representing approximately 28% of our U.S. employees and
approximately 50% of our employees outside the United States.
Workplace Safety and Wellness: We promote a strong culture of safety and prioritize keeping all our employees,
contractors and visitors safe. To accomplish this, we employ comprehensive health, safety and environment
management policies and standards throughout the organization. In addition, we strive to continuously improve our
work processes, tools and metrics to reduce workplace injuries and enhance safety.
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, we will continue to take appropriate measures in our facilities including
implementing temperature screening, social distancing, mask-wearing and work-from-home policies where applicable
and in accordance with state and local guidelines. We remain committed to providing a modern and flexible approach
to how and where we work. We have established a hybrid-model that embraces the benefits of flexibility and
collaboration, and expect our office-based employees to engage with colleagues, customers and suppliers in-person on
a regular basis.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion: Diversity, equity & inclusion (“DE&I”) significantly contributes to our winning growth culture.
We work to reflect the diversity of ideas and people in our world and to maximize the power and potential of our
employees.
6
Table of Contents
In addition, we have many communities and sponsored programs tailored for our diverse workforce, including those
that foster gender and race equality. At the end of 2022, women held 41% of global management roles (defined as
Director and above) and 40% of executive leadership roles (defined as the Management Leadership Team plus one
level below). In September 2020, we announced our goal to double Black representation in our U.S. management team
by 2024. For our U.S. leadership, Black employees held 5.5% of management roles (defined as Director and above) at
the end of 2022 and 5.1% at the end of 2021.
Our DE&I commitment is led from the top and driven throughout the organization by our Management Leadership
Team, Board of Directors and Mondelēz Diversity, Equity & Inclusion Steering Committee. As an important step in our
DE&I journey, we established a team, including C-suite officers, our Chief Diversity and Inclusion Officer, and other key
senior leaders, charged with collectively setting the strategy and DE&I commitments across the organization.
We also include specific DE&I metrics as a part of the strategic scorecard within our annual incentive plan for our CEO
and other senior leaders. The scorecard is used consistently across the Company at both the corporate and region
level and is linked directly to the four pillars of our strategy – growth, execution, culture and sustainability.
As a global employer, we recognize and value differences and are championing DE&I around the world. We are
creating local and global opportunities to further racial equity and economic empowerment by expanding our DE&I
initiatives across three key areas: colleagues, culture and communities. These opportunities include mobilizing our
consumer-facing brands and leveraging our partnerships with agencies and advertising platforms to drive change,
equity and inclusion.
Talent Management and Development: Maintaining a robust pipeline of talent is crucial to our ongoing success and is a
key aspect of succession planning efforts across the organization. Our leadership and people teams are responsible for
attracting and retaining top talent by facilitating an environment where employees feel supported and encouraged in
their professional and personal development. Specifically, we promote employee development by reviewing strategic
positions regularly and identifying potential internal candidates to fill those roles, evaluating job skill sets to identify
competency gaps and creating developmental plans to facilitate employee professional growth. We invest in our
employees through training and development programs, on the job experiences, coaching, as well as tuition
reimbursement for a majority of our employees in the United States to promote continued professional growth. We
provide technical and leadership programs across the organization that enable colleagues to grow skills and
capabilities to become more successful. We also have dedicated talent programs that support and accelerate
leadership development and strengthen our succession plans. Additionally, we understand the importance of
maintaining competitive compensation, benefits and appropriate training that provides growth, developmental
opportunities and multiple career paths within the Company.
Culture and Employee Engagement: We conduct confidential engagement surveys frequently of our global workforce
that are administered and analyzed by an independent third party. Aggregate survey results are reviewed by executive
officers and the Board of Directors. Based on the results, we create action plans at global, regional, functional and
managerial levels. By acting on results both at an aggregate enterprise level and a department/business/work group
level, we have been able to enhance our culture and improve our overall engagement.
We believe this reflects our ongoing efforts to focus on our employees, their well-being and the issues that matter to
them. In 2022, we had over 16,000 colleagues actively participating in training that supported their well-being and
provided them with new tools and resources to support remote work. We also launched initiatives to further agile ways
of working and streamline decision-making processes to enhance productivity and employee engagement. We continue
to build a winning growth culture and continue our commitment to work on the areas that matter to our people and build
on our momentum.
Total Rewards: As part of our total rewards philosophy, we offer competitive compensation and benefits to attract and
retain top talent. Our compensation programs are designed to reinforce our growth agenda and talent strategy as well
as drive a strong connection between the contributions of our employees and their pay. We believe the structure of our
compensation packages provides the appropriate incentives to attract, retain and motivate our employees. Further, to
foster a strong sense of ownership and align the interests of employees with shareholders, we grant stock-based
incentives to most senior-level employees.
7
Table of Contents
We also continue to evolve our programs to meet our employees’ health and wellness needs. We provide access to
medical and welfare benefits and offer programs to all employees that support work-life balance, including paid parental
leave, as well as financial, physical and mental health resources. In 2022, we expanded our Employee Assistance
Programs to reach all global colleagues.
We are committed to equal pay for equal work, regardless of gender, race, ethnicity or other personal characteristics.
To deliver on that commitment, we benchmark and set pay ranges based on market data and consider various factors
such as an employee’s role and experience, job location and performance. We also regularly review our compensation
practices to promote fair and equitable pay.
With the support of an independent third-party expert in this field, we conduct global pay equity reviews for salaried
employees comparing employees in the same pay grade within a country/area to help identify any unsupported
distinctions in pay between employees of different genders and races (as permitted by local country law).
Our last global analysis in 2022 encompassed 83 countries and over 33,000 employees. From this analysis, we noted
our pay gap between male and female employees was less than 1%. We anticipate this gap will further decrease
through pay adjustments for employees identified during the review. In the United States, we also review pay for
salaried employees in the same pay grade by race/ethnicity (Asian, Black and Hispanic). The 2022 independent
analysis found no systemic issues and no negative pay gap between non-white and white employees.
Sustainability and Mindful Snacking
Snacking Made Right is the lens through which we determine our ESG priorities to deliver on our mission of leading the
future of snacking by offering the right snack, for the right moment, made the right way. We have a clear strategic
approach to making snacking right, so we can drive innovative, more sustainable business growth the right way for
people and the planet. At our 2022 investor update, we unveiled the evolution of our growth strategy elevating
sustainability as a fourth pillar in our long-term growth strategy now sitting alongside growth, execution and culture.
We focus where we believe we can make a bigger difference and deliver greater long-term positive impact. Our
strategy and goals in these key focus areas are central to supporting our growth around the world and underpinned by
our focus on promoting a culture of safety, quality, inclusivity and equity. Our goal includes more sustainable sourcing of
key ingredients, reducing our environmental footprint, promoting the rights of people across our value chain, and
evolving our portfolio to offer a broader range of high-quality snacks addressing consumer needs while encouraging
consumers to snack mindfully. In 2022 we made progress against these goals, such as expanding our signature raw
material sourcing programs. In 2022 we announced the next phase of Cocoa Life backed by an additional $600 million
investment through 2030, for a total $1 billion investment since the start of the program.
The Governance, Membership and Sustainability Committee of our Board of Directors oversees our ESG policies and
programs related to corporate citizenship, social responsibility, and public policy issues significant to us such as
sustainability and environmental responsibility; food labeling, marketing and packaging; philanthropic and political
activities and contributions; and Board of Directors ESG education and capabilities. The People and Compensation
Committee of our Board of Directors oversees our diversity, equity and inclusion priorities, as well as workplace safety
and employee wellness, pay equity, talent sourcing strategies, talent management and development programs and
ESG KPIs for incentive plans. The Audit Committee of our Board of Directors oversees our safety priorities, goals and
performance, as well as our ESG-related disclosure in SEC filings, including controls and assurance. Our ESG goals
are part of our risk and strategic planning processes and are also embedded across our organization and within our
annual incentive compensation program for our leadership. Business leadership teams and our Board of Directors
regularly review progress toward these programs and priorities.
We discuss our ESG goals and programs in detail in our annual Snacking Made Right report available on our website.
We also publish an ESG disclosure data sheet that outlines our alignment with the Sustainability Accounting Standards
Board (“SASB”) and Task Force on Climate-related Financial Disclosures (“TCFD”) reporting frameworks. We also
provide our annual CDP Climate Change, Water Security and Forests disclosure.
8
Table of Contents
Intellectual Property
Our intellectual property rights (including trademarks, patents, copyrights, registered designs, proprietary trade secrets,
recipes, technology and know-how) are material to our business.
We own numerous trademarks and patents in many countries around the world. Depending on the country, trademarks
remain valid for as long as they are in use or their registration status is maintained. Trademark registrations generally
are renewable for fixed terms. We also have patents for a number of current and potential products. Our patents cover
inventions ranging from packaging techniques to processes relating to specific products and to the products
themselves. Our issued patents extend for varying periods according to the date of patent application filing or grant and
the legal term of patents in the various countries where patent protection is obtained. The actual protection afforded by
a patent, which can vary from country to country, depends upon the type of patent, the scope of its coverage as
determined by the patent office or courts in the country, and the availability of legal remedies in the country. While our
patent portfolio is material to our business, the loss of one patent or a group of related patents would not have a
material adverse effect on our business.
From time to time, we grant third parties licenses to use one or more of our trademarks, patents and/or proprietary
trade secrets in connection with the manufacture, sale or distribution of third-party products. Similarly, we sell some
products under brands, patents and/or proprietary trade secrets we license from third parties. In our agreement with
Kraft Foods Group, Inc. (which is now part of The Kraft Heinz Company), we each granted the other party various
licenses to use certain of our and their respective intellectual property rights in named jurisdictions following the spin-off
of our North American grocery business in 2012.
Regulation
Our food products and ingredients are subject to local, national and multinational regulations related to labeling, health
and nutrition claims, packaging, pricing, marketing and advertising, data privacy and related areas. In addition, various
jurisdictions regulate our operations by licensing and inspecting our manufacturing plants and facilities, enforcing
standards for select food products, grading food products, and regulating trade practices related to the sale and pricing
of our food products. Many of the food commodities we use in our operations are subject to government agricultural
policy and intervention. These policies have substantial effects on prices and supplies and are subject to periodic
governmental and administrative review. In addition, increased attention to environmental and social issues in industry
supply chains has led to developing different types of regulation in many countries. The lack of a harmonized approach
can lead to uneven scrutiny or enforcement, which can impact our operations.
Examples of laws and regulations that affect our business include workplace safety regulations; selective food taxes;
labeling requirements such as front-of-pack labeling based on nutrient profiles or environmental claims; sales or media
and marketing restrictions such as those on promotions or advertising products with specified nutrient profiles on
certain channels or platforms or during certain hours of the day; sanctions on sales or sourcing of raw materials; cross-
border trade concessions or border barriers; corporate tax policies of the United States and other countries; and
packaging taxes. In addition, over 25 countries in the European Union have implemented extended producer
responsibility (“EPR”) policies as part of national packaging waste policies that make manufacturers responsible for the
cost of recycling food and beverage packaging after consumers use it. These range from mandatory regulations to
voluntary agreements between government and industry to voluntary industry initiatives. EPR policies are being
implemented or contemplated in other jurisdictions around the world, including India, Vietnam and certain states in the
United States. Single-use plastic bans and other plastic taxes are being considered in Europe as well as countries
including Indonesia and the Philippines.
Throughout the countries in which we do business, we are subject to local, national and multinational environmental
laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment. We have programs across our business units
designed to meet applicable environmental compliance requirements. In the United States, the laws and regulations
include the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act and the Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act. We are also subject to legislation designed to reduce
emissions from greenhouse gases, and many countries are considering introducing carbon taxes that could increase
our production costs or those of our suppliers.
9
Table of Contents
We continue to monitor developments in laws and regulations. Also refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies – Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting, for additional information on government regulations
and currency-related impacts on our operations in the United Kingdom, Argentina and other countries.
Information about our Executive Officers
The following are our executive officers as of February 3, 2023:
Name AgeTitle
Dirk Van de Put 62 Chief Executive Officer
Luca Zaramella 53 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Paulette R. Alviti 52 Executive Vice President and Chief People Officer
Maurizio Brusadelli 54 Executive Vice President and President, Asia Pacific, Middle East and
Africa
Vinzenz P. Gruber 57 Executive Vice President and President, Europe
Mariano C. Lozano 56 Executive Vice President and President, Latin America
Daniel E. Ramos 49 Executive Vice President, Chief Research and Development Officer
Laura Stein 61 Executive Vice President, Corporate & Legal Affairs and General Counsel
Gustavo C. Valle 58 Executive Vice President and President, North America
Mr. Van de Put became Chief Executive Officer and a director in November 2017 and became Chairman of the Board
of Directors in April 2018. He formerly served as President and Chief Executive Officer of McCain Foods Limited, a
multinational frozen food provider, from July 2011 to November 2017 and as its Chief Operating Officer from May 2010
to July 2011. Mr. Van de Put served as President and Chief Executive Officer, Global Over-the-Counter, Consumer
Health Division of Novartis AG, a global healthcare company, from 2009 to 2010. Prior to that, he worked for 24 years
in a variety of leadership positions for several global food and beverage providers, including Danone SA, The Coca-
Cola Company and Mars, Incorporated.
Mr. Zaramella became Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in August 2018. He previously served as
Senior Vice President Corporate Finance, CFO Commercial and Treasurer from June 2016 to July 2018. He also
served as Interim Lead Finance North America from April to November 2017. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice
President and Corporate Controller from December 2014 to August 2016 and Senior Vice President, Finance of
Mondelēz Europe from October 2011 to November 2014. Mr. Zaramella joined Mondelēz International in 1996.
Ms. Alviti became Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer (now Executive Vice President and
Chief People Officer) in June 2018. Before joining Mondelēz International, Ms. Alviti served as Senior Vice President
and Chief Human Resources Officer of Foot Locker, Inc., a leading global retailer of athletically inspired shoes and
apparel, from June 2013 to May 2018. Prior to that, Ms. Alviti spent 17 years at PepsiCo, Inc., a global snack and
beverage company, in various leadership roles, including Senior Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer
Asia, Middle East, Africa.
Mr. Brusadelli became Executive Vice President and President, Asia Pacific in January 2016 and Executive Vice
President and President, Asia Pacific, Middle East and Africa in October 2016. He previously served as President
Biscuits Business, South East Asia, Japan and Sales Asia Pacific from September 2015 to December 2015, President
Markets and Sales Asia Pacific from September 2014 to September 2015 and President United Kingdom, Ireland and
Nordics from September 2012 to August 2014. Prior to that, Mr. Brusadelli held various positions of increasing
responsibility. Mr. Brusadelli joined Mondelēz International in 1993.
Mr. Gruber became Executive Vice President and President, Europe in January 2019. He previously served as
President, Western Europe from October 2016 to December 2018 and President, Chocolate, Europe from August 2011
to September 2016. Mr. Gruber was formerly employed by Mondelēz International, in various capacities, from 1989
until 2000 and resumed his employment in September 2007.
Mr. Lozano became Executive Vice President and President, Latin America in May 2022. He previously served as CEO
of Dannon North America, a business unit of Danone, a global food and beverage company, from January
10
Table of Contents
2014 until April 2017 and CEO Danone North America from September 2017 until December 2022. Mr. Lozano spent
more than 24 years at Danone in various leadership roles across Latin America including President, Danone Brazil.
Mr. Ramos became Chief Research & Development Officer in November 2022. Before joining Mondelēz International,
Mr. Ramos was Senior Vice President of Global Packaging at The Estée Lauder Companies, a manufacturer and
marketer of quality skin care, makeup, fragrance and hair care products, from January 2021 to November 2022, and
served as the Chief Scientific Officer at Coty Inc., a multinational beauty company and developer of fragrance, color
cosmetics, and skin and body care, from September 2017 to January 2021. Mr. Ramos has worked in Research and
Development for over 20 years.
Ms. Stein became Executive Vice President, Corporate & Legal Affairs and General Counsel in January 2021. Before
joining Mondelēz International, Ms. Stein spent 15 years at The Clorox Company, a multinational manufacturer and
marketer of consumer and professional products, most recently as Executive Vice President – General Counsel and
Corporate Affairs from February 2016 to December 2020. She also served as Executive Vice President – General
Counsel from February 2015 to February 2016 and as Senior Vice President – General Counsel from January 2005 to
February 2015.
Mr. Valle became Executive Vice President and President, North America in March 2022 and was Executive Vice
President and President, Latin American from February 2020 to February 2022. Before joining Mondelēz International,
Mr. Valle served as Chief Executive Officer of Axia Plus, LLC, a management consulting firm, from February 2018 to
January 2020. Prior to that he spent more than 20 years at Groupe Danone SA, a multinational provider of packaged
water, dairy and baby food products, in a variety of leadership positions, most recently as Executive Vice President,
Dairy Division Worldwide, from January 2015 to January 2018, and Vice President Dairy Division Europe, from January
2014 until December 2014.
Ethics and Governance
We have adopted the Mondelēz International Code of Conduct, which qualifies as a code of ethics under Item 406 of
Regulation S-K. The code applies to all of our employees, including our principal executive officer, principal financial
officer, principal accounting officer or controller, and persons performing similar functions. Our code of ethics is
available free of charge on our web site at www.mondelezinternational.com/investors/corporate-governance and will be
provided free of charge to any shareholder submitting a written request to: Corporate Secretary, Mondelēz
International, Inc., 905 West Fulton Market, Suite 200, Chicago, IL 60607. We will disclose any waiver we grant to an
executive officer or director under our code of ethics, or certain amendments to the code of ethics, on our web site at
www.mondelezinternational.com/investors/corporate-governance.
In addition, we have adopted Corporate Governance Guidelines, charters for each of the Board’s four standing
committees and the Code of Business Conduct and Ethics for Non-Employee Directors. All of these materials are
available on our web site at www.mondelezinternational.com/investors/corporate-governance and will be provided free
of charge to any shareholder requesting a copy by writing to: Corporate Secretary, Mondelēz International, Inc., 905
West Fulton Market, Suite 200, Chicago, IL 60607.
Available Information
Our Internet address is www.mondelezinternational.com. Our Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on
Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a)
or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), are available free of charge as
soon as possible after we electronically file them with, or furnish them to, the U.S. Securities and Exchange
Commission (the “SEC”). You can access our filings with the SEC by visiting www.sec.gov or our website:
ir.mondelezinternational.com/sec-filings. The information on our web site is not, and shall not be deemed to be, a part
of this Annual Report on Form 10-K or incorporated into any other filings we make with the SEC.
11
Table of Contents
Item 1A. Risk Factors.
You should carefully read the following discussion of significant factors, events and uncertainties when evaluating our
business and the forward-looking information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. The events and
consequences discussed in these risk factors could materially and adversely affect our business, operating results,
liquidity and financial condition. While we believe we have identified and discussed below the key risk factors affecting
our business, these risk factors do not identify all the risks we face, and there may be additional risks and uncertainties
that we do not presently know or that we do not currently believe to be significant that may have a material adverse
effect on our business, performance or financial condition in the future.
Strategic and Operational Risks
Commodity and other input prices are volatile and may increase or decrease significantly or availability of
commodities may become constrained.
We purchase and use large quantities of commodities, including cocoa, dairy, wheat, edible oils, sugar and other
sweeteners, flavoring agents and nuts. In addition, we purchase and use significant quantities of product packaging
materials, natural gas, fuel and electricity for our factories and warehouses, and we also incur expenses in connection
with labor and the transportation and delivery of our products. Costs of raw materials, energy and other supplies and
services are volatile and fluctuate due to conditions that are difficult to predict. These conditions include global
competition for resources; currency fluctuations; geopolitical conditions or conflicts (including the ongoing war in
Ukraine and international sanctions imposed on Russia for its invasion of Ukraine); inflationary pressures related to
domestic and global economic conditions or supply chain issues; transportation and labor disruptions; tariffs or other
trade barriers; government intervention to introduce living income premiums or similar requirements such as those
announced in 2019 in two of the main cocoa-growing countries; changes in environmental or trade policy and
regulations, alternative energy and agricultural programs; severe weather; agricultural productivity; crop disease or
pests; water risk; health pandemics including COVID-19; forest fires; supplier capacity; and consumer or industrial
demand. Many of these conditions are or could be exacerbated or worsened by climate change. Increased government
intervention and consumer or activist responses caused by increased focus on climate change, deforestation, water,
plastic waste, animal welfare and human rights concerns and other risks associated with the global food system could
adversely affect our or our suppliers’ reputation and business and our ability to procure the materials we need to
operate our business. Some commodities are grown by smallholder farmers who might not be able to invest to increase
productivity or adapt to changing conditions. Our work to monitor our exposure to commodity prices and hedge against
input price increases cannot fully protect us from changes in commodity costs due to factors like market illiquidity,
specific local regulations and downstream costs. Thus, our hedging strategies have not always protected and will not in
the future always protect us from increases in specific raw material costs. Continued volatility in the prices of
commodities and other supplies we purchase or changes in the types of commodities we purchase as we continue to
evolve our product and packaging portfolio could increase or decrease the costs of our products, and our profitability
could suffer as a result. Moreover, increases in the price of our products, including increases to cover inflation and
higher input, packaging and transportation costs, may result in lower sales volumes or customer delistings, while
decreases in input costs could require us to lower our prices and thereby affect our revenues, profits or margins.
Likewise, constraints in the supply or availability of key commodities and necessary services like transportation, such
as we experienced across our business, particularly in the United States and United Kingdom, may limit our ability to
grow our net revenues and earnings. If our mitigation activities are not effective, if we are unable to price to cover
increased costs or must reduce our prices, if increased prices affect demand for our products, or if we are limited by
supply or distribution constraints, our financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock price can be
materially adversely affected.
We are subject to risks from operating globally.
We are a global company and generated 73.6% of our 2022 net revenues, 75.1% of our 2021 net revenues and 73.2%
of our 2020 net revenues outside the United States. We manufacture and market our products in over 150 countries
and have operations in approximately 80 countries. Therefore, we are subject to risks inherent in global operations.
Those risks include: 
•changing macroeconomic conditions in our markets, including as a result of inflation (and related monetary
policy actions by governments in response to inflation), volatile commodity prices and increases in the cost of
raw and packaging materials, labor, energy and transportation;
12
Table of Contents
•compliance with U.S. laws affecting operations outside of the United States, including anti-bribery laws such as
the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (“FCPA”);
•the imposition of increased or new tariffs, sanctions, export controls, quotas, trade barriers, price floors or
similar restrictions on our sales or key commodities like cocoa, potential changes in U.S. trade programs and
trade relations with other countries, or regulations, taxes or policies that might negatively affect our sales or
profitability;
•compliance with antitrust and competition laws, trade laws, data privacy laws, anti-bribery laws, human rights
laws and a variety of other local, national and multinational regulations and laws in multiple regimes;
•currency devaluations or fluctuations in currency values, including in developed and emerging markets. This
includes events like applying highly inflationary accounting as we did for our Argentinean subsidiaries
beginning in July 2018 and for Türkiye beginning in April 2022;
•changes in capital controls, including currency exchange controls, government currency policies or other limits
on our ability to import raw materials or finished products into various countries or repatriate cash from outside
the United States;
•increased sovereign risk, such as defaults by or deterioration in the economies and credit ratings of
governments, particularly in emerging markets;
•changes or inconsistencies in local regulations and laws, the uncertainty of enforcement of remedies in non-
U.S. jurisdictions, and foreign ownership restrictions and the potential for nationalization or expropriation of
property or other resources;
•varying abilities to enforce intellectual property and contractual rights;
•discriminatory or conflicting fiscal policies;
•greater risk of uncollectible accounts and longer collection cycles; and
•design, implementation and use of effective control environment processes across our diverse operations and
employee base.
In addition, increased political and economic changes or volatility, geopolitical regional conflicts, terrorist activity,
political unrest, civil strife, acts of war, government shutdowns, travel or immigration restrictions, tariffs and other trade
restrictions, public health risks or pandemics including COVID-19, energy policy or restrictions, public corruption,
expropriation and other economic or political uncertainties, including inaccuracies in our assumptions about these
factors, could interrupt and negatively affect our business operations or customer demand. High unemployment or the
slowdown in economic growth in some markets could constrain consumer spending. Declining consumer purchasing
power could result in loss of market share and adversely impact our profitability. The nature and degree of the various
risks we face can also differ significantly among our regions and businesses.
All of these factors could result in increased costs or decreased revenues and could materially and adversely affect our
product sales, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows, stock price, and our relationships with customers,
suppliers and employees in the short or long term.
The war in Ukraine has impacted and could continue to impact our business operations, financial performance
and results of operations.
The war in Ukraine has impacted and could continue to impact our business operations, financial performance and
results of operations (as discussed below in Recent Developments and Significant Items Affecting Comparability – War
in Ukraine under Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations). The scope
and duration of the war in Ukraine is uncertain and rapidly changing, and we are unable to predict the full extent to
which the war in Ukraine will impact our business operations, financial performance, results of operations and stock
price in the future. We have discontinued new capital investments and suspended our advertising spending in Russia.
As the business and geopolitical environment continues to change, our operations and activity in Russia, which
accounted for 4.0% of 2022 consolidated net revenues, or Ukraine, which accounted for 0.3% of 2022 consolidated net
revenues, may decline or be further scaled back. International sanctions, export controls and other measures, including
restrictions on the transfer of funds to and from Russia, that have been imposed on Russian entities make it more
difficult to operate in Russia, and failure to comply with applicable sanctions and measures could subject us to
regulatory penalties and reputational risk. The war could also result in the temporary or permanent loss of assets or our
ability to conduct business operations in Russia, and our Russian assets may be partially or fully impaired in future
periods, or our business operations terminated, based on actions taken by Russia, other parties or us. In addition, our
operations may be subject to increased disruptions to our information systems, including through network failures,
malicious or disruptive software or cyberattacks by hackers, criminal groups or nation-state organizations. There is a
possibility of loss of life and physical damage and destruction of property. We may not be able to operate in certain
areas due to damage and safety concerns. We might also face
13
Table of Contents
questions or negative scrutiny from stakeholders about our operations in Russia despite our role as a food company
and our public statements about Ukraine and Russia.
The war in Ukraine has continued to result in worldwide geopolitical and macroeconomic uncertainty. The war has
materially disrupted commodity markets, including for wheat, energy and energy-related commodities, and is
contributing to supply chain disruption and inflation. Other ongoing consequences of the war have included increased
volatility of input prices, including for packaging materials, energy, commodities, other raw materials, labor and
transportation; adverse changes in international trade policies and relations; increased exposure to foreign currency
fluctuations, including volatility of the Russian ruble; constraints, volatility or disruptions in the credit and capital
markets; increased costs to ensure compliance with global and local laws and regulations; and heightened risk to
employee safety. We expect continued volatility with respect to commodity and other input prices, and our hedging
activities might not sufficiently offset this volatility.
These and other impacts of the war in Ukraine could have the effect of heightening many of the other risks described in
the risk factors presented in this filing, including but not limited to those relating to our reputation, brands, product sales,
sanctions, trade relations in countries in which we operate, input price inflation and volatility, results of operations and
financial condition. We might not be able to predict or respond to all impacts on a timely basis to prevent near- or long-
term adverse impacts to our results. The ultimate impact of these disruptions also depends on events beyond our
knowledge or control, including the scope and duration of the war and actions taken by parties other than us to respond
to them. Any of these disruptions could have a negative impact on our business operations, financial performance,
results of operations and stock price, and this impact could be material. Additionally, the war in Ukraine, or related
developments in Russia, Europe or elsewhere, may also materially adversely affect our operating results and financial
position in a manner that is not currently known to us or that we do not currently consider to be a significant risk.
Global or regional health pandemics or epidemics, including COVID-19, could negatively impact our business
operations, financial performance and results of operations.
Our business and financial results could be negatively impacted by COVID-19 or other pandemics or epidemics. The
severity, magnitude and duration of global or regional pandemics or epidemics are uncertain and hard to predict. Since
2020, COVID-19 has significantly impacted economic activity and markets around the world, and it could negatively
impact our business in numerous ways. For example, the COVID-19 pandemic has disrupted and could materially
disrupt our global supply chain, operations and routes to market or those of our suppliers, their suppliers, our external
manufacturing partners, distributors or other business partners. The COVID-19 pandemic has resulted in broader
supply, transportation and labor disruptions resulting in inflation and generally higher operating costs in our business.
Relatedly, commodity and transportation costs have become more volatile and generally increased due to the COVID-
19 pandemic, supply chain disruptions, and transportation and labor shortages. Additionally, government or regulatory
responses to pandemics could negatively impact our business. Mandatory lockdowns or other restrictions on
operations in some countries temporarily disrupted our ability to distribute our products in some markets. Resumption,
continuation or expansion of these disruptions could materially adversely impact our operations and results.
These and other impacts of the COVID-19 or other global or regional health pandemics or epidemics could have the
effect of heightening many of the other risks described in the risk factors presented in this filing, including but not limited
to those relating to our reputation, brands, consumer preferences, supply chain, product sales, pricing actions, results
of operations or financial condition. We might not be able to predict or respond to all impacts on a timely basis to
prevent near- or long-term adverse impacts to our results. The ultimate impact of these disruptions also depends on
events beyond our knowledge or control, including the duration and severity of the COVID-19 and other pandemics or
epidemics and actions taken by parties other than us to respond to them, and in the case of COVID-19, on the
emergence and spread of COVID-19 variants and the effectiveness of vaccines. Any of these disruptions could have a
negative impact on our business operations, financial performance, results of operations and stock price, and this
impact could be material.
14
Table of Contents
We operate in a highly competitive industry and we face risks related to the execution of our strategy and our
timely response to channel shifts and pricing and other competitive pressures.
The food and snacking industry is highly competitive. Our principal competitors include food, snack and beverage
companies that operate globally, regionally and locally. Failure to effectively respond to challenges from our competitors
could adversely affect our business.
Competitor and customer pressures require that we timely and effectively respond to changes in distribution channels
and technological developments that may require changes in our prices. These pressures could affect our ability to
increase prices in response to commodity and other cost increases. Failure to effectively and timely assess new or
developing trends, technological advancements or changes in distribution methods and set proper pricing, including as
a result of inflation or weak economic conditions or recessions, or effective trade incentives could negatively impact
demand for our products, our operating results, achievement of our strategic and financial goals and our ability to
capitalize on new revenue or value-producing opportunities. The rapid growth of some channels, such as discounters
as well as digital commerce which has expanded significantly following the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic, may
impact our current operations or strategies more quickly than we planned for, create consumer price deflation, alter the
buying behavior of consumers or disrupt our retail customer relationships. We may need to increase or reallocate
spending on existing and new distribution channels and technologies, marketing, advertising and new product
innovation to protect or increase revenues, market share and brand significance. These expenditures may not be
successful, including those related to our digital commerce and other technology-focused efforts, and might not result in
trade and consumer acceptance of our efforts, which could materially and adversely affect our product sales, financial
condition, results of operations and cash flows. We will be disadvantaged if we are not able to effectively leverage
developing online channels such as direct-to-consumer and electronic business-to-business commerce. New
distribution channels, as well as growing opportunities to utilize external manufacturers, lower the barriers to entry and
allow smaller competitors to gain market share more effectively. Additionally, if we adjust pricing but cannot maintain or
increase sales volumes, or our labor or other costs increase but we cannot increase prices to offset those changes, our
financial condition and results of operations will suffer.
During 2022, we continued to operate under our strategy to drive long-term growth by focusing on four strategic
priorities: accelerating consumer-centric growth, driving operational excellence, creating a winning growth culture and
scaling sustainable snacking. If our strategy is not effective, we fail to achieve our goals and objectives or identify or
prioritize the areas most important to achieving our goals, or we fail to effectively operate under our strategy in a way
that minimizes disruptions to our business, it could materially and adversely affect our financial condition, results of
operations, cash flows and stock price.
Promoting and protecting our reputation and brand image is essential to our business success.
Our success depends on our ability to maintain and enhance our brands, expand to new geographies and new
distribution platforms such as digital commerce, and evolve our portfolio with new product offerings that meet consumer
needs and expectations.
We seek to strengthen our brands through investments in our product quality, product renovation, innovation and
marketing investments, including consumer-relevant advertising, digital communication and consumer promotions.
Failure to effectively address the continuing global focus on well-being, including changing consumer acceptance of
certain ingredients, industrial manufacturing and processing, nutritional expectations of our products and the
sustainability of our ingredients, our supply chain and our packaging (including plastic packaging and its ability to be
recycled and other environmental impacts) could adversely affect our brands. Increased negative attention from the
media, academics and online influencers, governments, shareholders and other stakeholders in these areas as well as
on the role of food marketing, our response to political and social issues or catastrophic events, and other
environmental, social, human capital or governance practices, including our diversity, equity and inclusion initiatives,
could adversely affect our brand image. Undue caution or our failure to react timely in addressing these challenges and
trends could weaken our competitive position. Such pressures could also lead to stricter regulations, industry self-
regulation that is unevenly adopted among companies, increased transparency in public disclosures, and increased
focus on food and snacking marketing and labeling practices. Increasing and disparate legal or regulatory restrictions
on our labeling, advertising and consumer promotions, or our response to those restrictions, could limit our efforts to
maintain, extend and expand our brands. This includes regulations such as front-of-pack labeling and selective food
taxes in multiple jurisdictions as well as age-based restrictions on sales of products with certain nutritional profiles
enacted in some states in Mexico. In the United Kingdom, a ban on specific types of TV and
15
Table of Contents
online advertising of food containing levels of fat, sugar or salt above specified thresholds is expected to go into effect
in October 2025, and new measures restricting certain promotions are expected to go into effect in October 2023.
Restrictions on in-store placement of some of those products went into effect in October 2022. Moreover, adverse
publicity, regulatory developments or legal action against us, our employees or our licensees related to product quality
and safety, where and how we manufacture our products, environmental risks including climate change, human and
workplace rights across our supply chain, labor relations, or antitrust, anti-bribery and anti-corruption compliance could
damage our reputation and brand health. Such actions could undermine our customers’ and shareholders’ confidence
and reduce demand for our products, even if the regulatory or legal action is unfounded or these matters are immaterial
to our operations. Our product sponsorship relationships, including those with celebrity spokespersons, influencers or
group affiliations, could also subject us to negative publicity.
In addition, our success in maintaining and enhancing our brand image depends on our ability to anticipate change and
adapt to a rapidly changing marketing and media environment, including our increasing reliance on established and
emerging social media and online platforms, digital and mobile dissemination of marketing and advertising campaigns,
targeted marketing and the increasing accessibility and speed of dissemination of information. A variety of legal and
regulatory restrictions as well as our own policies and participation in industry self-regulation initiatives limit how and to
whom we market our products. These restrictions may limit our brand renovation, innovation, marketing and promotion
plans, particularly as social media and the communications environment continue to evolve. The social media platforms
we use to market our products may change their marketing rules or algorithms or may fall out of favor with certain
consumer groups, and we may fail to effectively adapt our marketing strategies or may decide to no longer utilize
certain platforms for marketing. We might also fail to sufficiently evolve our digital marketing efforts to effectively utilize
consumer data. Negative posts or comments about Mondelēz International, our brands or our employees on social
media or web sites (whether factual or not) or security breaches related to use of our social media accounts and failure
to respond effectively to these posts, comments or activities could damage our reputation and brand image across the
various regions in which we operate. Our brands may be associated with or appear alongside harmful content before
these platforms or our own social media monitoring can detect this risk to our brand. In addition, we might fail to invest
sufficiently in maintaining, extending and expanding our brands, our marketing efforts might not achieve desired results
and we might be required to recognize impairment charges on our brands or related intangible assets or goodwill. Third
parties may sell counterfeit or imitation versions of our products that are inferior or pose safety risks. When consumers
confuse these counterfeit products for our products or have a bad experience with the counterfeit brand, they might
refrain from purchasing our brands in the future, which could harm our brand image and sales. Third parties might also
improperly use our brands as part of phishing or other scams, which could negatively affect our brand image. Failure to
successfully maintain and enhance our reputation and brand health could materially and adversely affect our company
and product brands as well as our product sales, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock price.
We must correctly predict, identify, interpret and meet changes in consumer preferences and demand and offer
new and improved products that meet those changes.
Consumer preferences for food and snacking products change continually. Our success depends on our ability to
predict, identify, interpret and meet the tastes, dietary habits, packaging, sales channel and other preferences of
consumers around the world and to offer products that appeal to these preferences in the places and ways consumers
want to shop. There may be further shifts in the relative size of shopping channels in addition to the increasing role of
digital commerce for consumers. Our success relies upon managing this complexity to promote and bring our products
to consumers effectively. Weak economic conditions, recessions, inflation, equity market volatility or other factors, such
as global or local pandemics and severe or unusual weather events, may affect consumer preferences and demand in
ways that are hard to predict. In connection with the COVID-19 pandemic, rapid changes in lifestyles and consumption
patterns, were accompanied by increased demand for biscuits and decreased demand for gum. Failure to offer and
deliver products that appeal to consumers or to correctly judge consumer demand for our products will impact our
ability to meet our growth targets, and our sales and market share could decrease and our profitability could suffer.
We must distinguish between short-term fads and trends and long-term changes in consumer preferences. Our sales
can be adversely affected when we do not accurately predict which shifts in consumer preferences or category trends
will be long-term or we fail to introduce new and improved products to satisfy changing preferences. In addition,
because of our varied and geographically diverse consumer base, we must be responsive to local consumer needs,
including with respect to when and how consumers snack and their desire for premium or value offerings. We must also
provide an array of products that satisfy the broad spectrum of consumer preferences and use marketing and
advertising effectively to reach consumers at the right time with the right message. Increasing
16
Table of Contents
and disparate legal or regulatory restrictions on our labeling, advertising and consumer promotions, or our response to
those restrictions, could limit our efforts to offer and deliver products that appeal to consumers. Demand for our
products could decrease and our profitability could suffer if we fail to expand our product offerings successfully across
product categories, rapidly develop products in faster growing and more profitable categories or reach consumers in
efficient and effective ways leveraging data and analytics.
Negative perceptions concerning the health, environmental and social implications of certain food products, ingredients,
packaging materials, and sourcing or production methods could influence consumer preferences and acceptance of
some of our products and marketing programs. For example, consumers have increasingly focused on well-being,
including reducing sodium and added sugar consumption, as well as the source and authenticity of ingredients in the
foods they consume. Continuing to focus on and expand our well-being offerings while refining the ingredient and
nutrition profiles of existing products is important to our growth, as is maintaining focus on ethical sourcing and supply
chain management opportunities to address evolving consumer preferences. In addition, consumer preferences differ
by region, and we must monitor and adjust our use of ingredients and other activities to respond to these regional
preferences. We might be unsuccessful in our efforts to effectively respond to changing consumer preferences and
social expectations. Continued negative perceptions or failure to satisfy consumer preferences could materially and
adversely affect our reputation, brands, product sales, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock
price.
Our operations in certain emerging markets expose us to political, economic and regulatory risks.
Our growth strategy depends in part on our ability to expand our operations in emerging markets, including among
others Brazil, China, India, Mexico, Argentina, Eastern Europe, the Middle East, Africa and Southeast Asia. However,
some emerging markets have greater political, economic and currency volatility and greater vulnerability to
infrastructure and labor disruptions than more established markets. In many countries, particularly those with emerging
economies, engaging in business practices prohibited by laws and regulations with extraterritorial reach, such as the
FCPA and the U.K. Bribery Act, or local anti-bribery laws may be more common. These laws generally prohibit
companies and their employees, contractors or agents from making improper payments to government officials,
including in connection with obtaining permits or engaging in other actions necessary to do business. Failure to comply
with these laws could subject us to civil and criminal penalties that could materially and adversely affect our reputation,
financial condition, results of operations and stock price.
In addition, competition in emerging markets is increasing as our competitors grow their global operations and low-cost
local manufacturers improve and expand their production capacities. Our success in emerging markets is critical to
achieving our growth strategy. Failure to successfully increase our business in emerging markets and manage
associated political, economic and regulatory risks could adversely affect our product sales, financial condition, results
of operations, cash flows and stock price.
Our use of information technology and third-party service providers exposes us to cybersecurity breaches and
other business disruptions.
We use information technology and third-party service providers to support our global business processes and
activities, including supporting critical business operations such as manufacturing and distribution; communicating with
our suppliers, customers and employees; maintaining effective accounting processes and financial and disclosure
controls; executing mergers and acquisitions and other corporate transactions; conducting research and development
activities; meeting regulatory, legal and tax requirements; and executing various digital marketing and consumer
promotion activities. Global shared service centers managed by third parties provide an increasing number of services
important to conducting our business, including accounting, internal control, human resources and computing functions.
Continuity of business applications and services has been, and may in the future be, disrupted by events such as
infection by viruses or malware; other cybersecurity attacks; issues with or errors in systems’ maintenance or security;
power outages; hardware or software failures; denial of service attacks; telecommunication failures; natural disasters;
terrorist attacks; and other catastrophic occurrences. Our use of new and emerging technologies such as cloud-based
services and mobile applications continues to evolve, presenting new and additional risks in managing access to our
data, relying on third parties to manage and safeguard data, ensuring access to our systems and availability of third-
party systems. In addition, we are experiencing new and more frequent attempts by third parties to gain access to our
systems, such as through increased email phishing of our workforce.
17
Table of Contents
Cybersecurity breaches of our or third-party systems, whether from circumvention of security systems, denial-of-service
attacks or other cyberattacks such as hacking, phishing attacks, computer viruses, ransomware or malware, cyber
extortion, employee or insider error, malfeasance, social engineering, physical breaches or other actions or attempts to
exploit vulnerabilities may cause confidential information or Personally Identifiable Information belonging to us or our
employees, customers, consumers, partners, suppliers, or governmental or regulatory authorities to be misused or
breached. These risks could be magnified since the number of employees, contractors and others working outside of
offices increased as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. Additionally, continued geopolitical turmoil, including the
ongoing war in Ukraine, has heightened the risk of cyberattacks. When risks such as these materialize, the need for us
to coordinate with various third-party service providers and for third-party service providers to coordinate amongst
themselves might increase challenges and costs to resolve related issues. Our information security program includes
capabilities designed to evaluate and mitigate cyber risks arising from third-party service providers. We believe that
these capabilities provide insights and visibility to the security posture of our third-party service providers, however,
cyber threats to those organizations are beyond our control. Additionally, new initiatives, such as those related to digital
commerce and direct sales, that increase the amount of confidential information that we process and maintain increase
our potential exposure to a cybersecurity breach. If our controls, disaster recovery and business continuity plans or
those of our third-party providers do not effectively respond to or resolve the issues related to any such disruptions in a
timely manner, our product sales, financial condition, results of operations and stock price may be materially and
adversely affected, and we might experience delays in reporting our financial results, loss of intellectual property and
damage to our reputation or brands.
We continue to devote focused resources to network security, backup and disaster recovery, enhanced training and
other security measures to protect our systems and data, such as advanced email protection to reduce the likelihood of
credential thefts and electronic fraud attempts. We also focus on enhancing the monitoring and detection of threats in
our environment, including but not limited to the manufacturing environment and operational technologies, as well as
adjusting information security controls based on the updated threat. However, security measures cannot provide
absolute security or guarantee that we will be successful in preventing or responding to every breach or disruption on a
timely basis. Due to the constantly evolving and complex nature of security threats, we cannot predict the form and
impact of any future incident, and the cost and operational expense of implementing, maintaining and enhancing
protective measures to guard against increasingly complex and sophisticated cyber threats could increase significantly.
Moreover, as cyberattacks increase in frequency and magnitude around the world, we may be unable to obtain
cybersecurity insurance in the amounts and on terms we view as appropriate and favorable for our operations.
We transfer data across local, regional, and national borders to conduct our operations, and we are subject to a variety
of continuously evolving and developing laws and regulations in numerous jurisdictions regarding privacy, data
protection and data security, including those related to the collection, storage, handling, use, disclosure, transfer and
security of personal data. Privacy and data protection laws may be interpreted and applied differently from jurisdiction
to jurisdiction and may create inconsistent or conflicting requirements. The European Union’s General Data Protection
Regulation (“GDPR”) has greatly increased the jurisdictional reach of E.U. law, added a broad array of requirements for
handling personal data including the public disclosure of significant data breaches, and imposes substantial penalties
for non-compliance of up to 4% of global annual revenue for the preceding financial year in addition to potential
restrictions on data transfer and processing. The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) requires greater
transparency in handling personal information from consumers by imposing new responsibilities for the handling,
disclosure and deletion of personal information for consumers, permits California to assess potentially significant fines
for violating CCPA and creates a right for individuals to bring class action suits seeking damages for violations. In
addition, the California Privacy Rights Act, which grants a private right of action to individuals and expands rights and
obligations, and the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act became effective on January 1, 2023, and the Colorado
Privacy Act will enter into effect on July 1, 2023. Our efforts to comply with multijurisdictional privacy and data
protection laws and the uncertainty of new laws and regulations will likely increase the complexity of our processes and
may impose significant costs and challenges that are likely to increase over time, and we could incur substantial
penalties or be subject to litigation related to violation of existing or future data privacy laws and regulations.
We are subject to risks from unanticipated business disruptions.
We manufacture and source products and materials on a global scale. We utilize an interdependent supply chain – a
complex network of suppliers and material needs, owned and leased manufacturing locations, external manufacturing
partners, distribution networks, shared service delivery centers and information systems that support our ability to
provide our products to our customers consistently. Factors that are hard to predict or beyond our
18
Table of Contents
control, like weather, natural disasters, water and energy availability, supply and commodity shortages, port
congestions or delays, transport capacity constraints, terrorism, political unrest or armed hostilities (including the
ongoing war in Ukraine), cybersecurity incidents, labor shortages, strikes, operational and/or financial instability of our
key suppliers and other vendors or service providers, government shutdowns or health pandemics such as COVID-19,
including any potential impact of climate change on these factors, could damage or disrupt our operations or those of
our suppliers, their suppliers, our external manufacturing partners, distributors or other business partners. Failure to
effectively prepare for and respond to disruptions in our operations, for example, by not finding alternative suppliers or
replacing capacity at key or sole manufacturing or distribution locations or by not quickly repairing damage to our
information, production or supply systems, can cause delays in delivering or the inability to deliver products to our
customers, and the quality and safety of our products might be negatively affected. Moreover, disputes with significant
customers or suppliers, including disputes regarding pricing or performance, could adversely affect our sales, financial
condition, and results of operations. The occurrence of a material or extended disruption may cause us to lose our
customers’ or business partners’ confidence or suffer damage to our reputation, and long-term consumer demand for
our products could decline. We use insurance to transfer our financial risk related to these exposures, but some of the
risks we face are difficult or impossible to insure and the timing of insurance recoveries may not match the timing of the
financial loss we incur. We are subject to risk related to operational safety, including risk of fire, explosion or accidental
contamination. We could also fail to achieve our strategic objectives due to capability or technology deficiencies related
to our ongoing reconfiguration of our supply chain to drive efficiencies and fuel growth. Further, our ability to supply
multiple markets with a streamlined manufacturing footprint may be negatively impacted by portfolio complexity,
significant changes in trade policies, changes in volume produced and changes to regulatory restrictions or labor-
related or other constraints on our ability to adjust production capacity in the markets in which we operate. These
events could materially and adversely affect our product sales, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and
stock price.
We may not successfully identify, complete or manage strategic transactions.
We regularly evaluate a variety of potential strategic transactions globally, including acquisitions, divestitures, joint
ventures, equity method investments and other strategic alliances that could further our strategic business objectives,
and acquisitions and joint ventures are an important part of our strategy to increase our exposure to fast-growing
snacking segments, fill geographic white spaces and expand into adjacent categories. For example, in 2022 we
acquired Chipita, Clif Bar and Ricolino. Such transactions and investments present significant challenges and risks. We
may not successfully identify potential strategic transactions to pursue, may not have counterparties willing to transact
with us, or we may not successfully identify or manage the risks presented by these strategic transactions, or complete
such transactions. Our success depends, in part, upon our ability to identify suitable transactions; negotiate favorable
contractual terms; comply with applicable regulations and receive necessary consents, clearances and approvals
(including regulatory and antitrust clearances and approvals); integrate or separate businesses; manage or achieve
performance of ESG goals and initiatives; realize the full extent of the benefits, cost savings or synergies presented by
strategic transactions; offset loss of revenue associated with divested brands or businesses; effectively implement
control environment processes; minimize adverse effects on existing business relationships with suppliers and
customers; achieve accurate estimates of fair value; minimize potential loss of customers or key employees; and
minimize indemnities and potential disputes with buyers, sellers and strategic partners. In addition, execution or
oversight of strategic transactions may result in the diversion of management attention from our existing business and
may present financial, managerial and operational risks.
With respect to acquisitions and joint ventures in particular, we are also exposed to potential risks based on our ability
to conform standards, controls, policies and procedures, and business cultures; consolidate and streamline operations
and infrastructures; identify and eliminate, as appropriate, redundant and underperforming operations and assets;
manage inefficiencies associated with the integration of operations; and coordinate timely and ongoing compliance with
applicable laws, including antitrust and competition, anti-bribery and corruption and import/export laws. Equity
investments such as our investments in JDE Peet’s N.V. and Keurig Dr Pepper Inc., joint ventures and other strategic
alliances pose additional risks, as we could share ownership in both public and private companies and in some cases
management responsibilities with one or more other parties whose objectives for the alliance may diverge from ours
over time, who may not have the same priorities, strategies or resources as we do, or whose interpretation of
applicable policies may differ from our own. Transactions or ventures into which we enter might not meet our financial
and non-financial control and compliance expectations or yield the anticipated benefits. Depending on the nature of the
business ventures, including whether they operate globally, these ventures could also be subject to many of the same
risks we are, including political, economic, regulatory and compliance risks, currency exchange rate fluctuations, and
volatility of commodity and other input prices. Either partner might fail to
19
Table of Contents
recognize an alliance relationship that could expose the business to higher risk or make the venture not as productive
as expected.
Furthermore, we may not be able to complete, on terms favorable to us, desired or proposed divestitures of businesses
that do not meet our strategic objectives or our growth or profitability targets. Our divestiture activities, or related
activities such as reorganizations, restructuring programs and transformation initiatives, may require us to provide or
receive transitional support and/or ongoing commercial relationships, recognize impairment charges or take action to
reduce costs that remain after we complete a divestiture. Gains or losses on the sales of, or lost operating income from,
those businesses may also affect our profitability.
Any of these risks could materially and adversely affect our business, product sales, financial condition, results of
operations, cash flows and stock price.
Macroeconomic and Industry Risks
Our business is subject to an increasing focus on sustainability matters.
We have announced, and may from time to time announce, certain initiatives, including goals, targets and other
objectives, related to sustainability matters. These statements reflect our current plans and do not constitute a
guarantee that they will be achieved. Our efforts to research, establish, accomplish, and accurately report on these
goals, targets and other objectives expose us to numerous operational, reputational, financial, legal and other risks.
Our ability to achieve any stated goal, target or objective is subject to numerous factors and conditions, many of which
are outside of our control. Examples of such factors include evolving regulatory requirements affecting sustainability
standards or disclosures or imposing different requirements, the reliance on other value chain actors to implement the
required changes, the pace of changes in technology and the availability of suppliers that can meet our sustainability
and other standards. In addition, statements about our sustainability goals, targets and other objectives, and progress
against those goals, targets and other objectives, may be based on standards for measuring progress that are still
developing, internal controls and processes that continue to evolve and assumptions that are subject to change in the
future. Further, developing and collecting, measuring and reporting ESG-related information and metrics can be costly,
difficult and time consuming and is subject to evolving reporting standards, including the SEC’s proposed climate-
related reporting requirements, and similar proposals by other international regulatory bodies.
Our business may face increased scrutiny from the investment community, customers, consumers, employees,
activists, media, regulators and other stakeholders related to our sustainability initiatives, including the goals, targets
and objectives that we announce, and our methodologies and timelines for pursuing them. If our sustainability practices
do not meet evolving investor or other stakeholder expectations and standards, our reputation, our ability to attract or
retain employees and our attractiveness as an investment, business partner or as an acquiror could be negatively
impacted. Similarly, our failure or perceived failure to pursue or fulfill our goals, targets and objectives, to comply with
ethical, environmental or other standards, regulations or expectations, or to satisfy various reporting standards with
respect to these matters, within the timelines we announce, or at all, could have the same negative impacts, as well as
expose us to government enforcement actions and private litigation. Even if we achieve our goals, targets and
objectives, we may not realize all of the benefits that we expected at the time they were established.
Climate change might adversely impact our supply chain or our operations.
Scientific evidence collected by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change demonstrates that carbon dioxide and
other greenhouse gases in the atmosphere have caused and will in the future cause changes in weather patterns
around the globe that expose us to physical and transition risk. Physical risks include the increasing frequency of
extreme weather events and natural disasters and effects on water availability and quality and biodiversity loss. These
impacts increase risks to the global food production and distribution system and to the safety and resilience of the
communities where we live, work and source our ingredients, and could further decrease food security for communities
around the world. Decreased agricultural productivity caused by climate change might limit the availability of the
commodities we purchase and use and increase the costs of such products. These include cocoa, which is a critical
raw material for our chocolate and biscuit portfolios that is particularly sensitive to changes in climate, as well as other
raw materials such as dairy, wheat, vegetable oils, sugar and nuts. Weather events such as floods, severe storms or
water shortages that are partially caused or exacerbated by climate change might disrupt our business operations or
those of our suppliers, their suppliers, our external
20
Table of Contents
manufacturing partners, distributors or other business partners and could increase our insurance and other operating
costs.
Transition risks include increased focus by federal, state and local regulatory and legislative bodies globally regarding
environmental policies relating to climate change, regulating greenhouse gas emissions (including carbon pricing or a
carbon tax), energy policies, disclosure obligations and sustainability, including single use plastics. New legal and
regulatory requirements have increased and could continue to increase our operating costs for things like energy or
packaging through taxes or regulations, including payments under extended producer responsibility policies, taxes on
specific packaging material types and targets to increase the use of reuse/refill delivery models. Increasing regulation
of carbon taxes could also substantially increase our product supply chain and distribution costs. Even if we make
changes to align ourselves with such legal or regulatory requirements, we may still be subject to significant penalties or
potential litigation if such laws and regulations are interpreted and applied in a manner inconsistent with our practices.
Concern about climate change might cause consumer preferences to switch away from products or ingredients
considered to have high climate change impact and towards products that are more sustainably grown and made. We
expect to incur additional costs as we evolve our portfolio and engage in due diligence, verification and reporting in
connection with our ESG and sustainability initiatives. We might not effectively address increased attention from the
media, shareholders, activists and other stakeholders on climate change and related environmental sustainability
matters, including deforestation, land use, water use and packaging, including plastic. Those stakeholders might also
have requests or proposals that are not aligned with the focus of our efforts on climate change and ESG matters.
Climate change-related impacts could also reduce demand for our products. If costs for raw materials increase or
availability decreases, we raise prices for our products and our competitors respond differently to those cost or
availability pressures, demand for our products and our market share could suffer. We have also experienced
decreased demand for chocolate during periods when temperatures are warmer.
In 2021, we announced our goal of net zero greenhouse gas emissions by 2050. Achieving this goal will require
significant transformation of our business, capital investment and the development of technology that might not
currently exist. We might incur significant additional expense or be required to recognize impairment charges in
connection with our efforts, and we might be unable to achieve our goal.
Any or all of these risks could materially and adversely affect our ability to meet the needs of our customers, reputation,
product sales, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock price.
Our retail customers are consolidating, and we must leverage our value proposition in order to compete
against retailer and other economy brands.
Retail customers, such as supermarkets, discounters, digital commerce merchants, warehouse clubs and food
distributors in the European Union, the United States and other major markets, continue to consolidate, form buying
alliances or be acquired by new entrants in the food retail market, resulting in fewer, larger customers. Large retail
customers and customer alliances can delist our products or reduce the shelf space allotted to our products and
demand lower pricing, increased promotional programs or longer payment terms. Retail customers might also adopt
these tactics in their dealings with us in response to the significant growth in online retailing for consumer products,
which is outpacing the growth of traditional retail channels and has increased further in response to the COVID-19
pandemic. The growth of alternative online retail channels, such as direct-to-consumer and electronic business-to-
business, may adversely affect our relationships with our large retail and wholesale customers.
In addition, larger retail customers have the scale to develop supply chains that permit them to operate with reduced
inventories or to develop and market their own retailer and other economy brands that compete with some of our
products. Our products must provide higher quality or value to our consumers than the less expensive alternatives,
particularly during periods of economic uncertainty, recessions or significant inflation. Consumers may not buy our
products if they perceive little difference between the quality or value of our products and those of retailer or other
economy brands. If consumers prefer or otherwise choose to purchase the retailer or other economy brands, we can
lose market share or sales volumes, or we may need to shift our product mix to lower margin offerings.
Retail consolidation also increases the risk that adverse changes in our customers’ business operations or financial
performance will have a corresponding material adverse effect on us. For example, if our customers cannot access
sufficient funds or financing, then they may delay, decrease or cancel purchases of our products, or delay or fail to pay
us for previous purchases.
21
Table of Contents
Failure to effectively respond to retail consolidation, increasing retail power and competition from retailer and other
economy brands could materially and adversely affect our reputation, brands, product sales, financial condition, results
of operations, cash flows and stock price.
We are subject to changes in our relationships with significant customers, suppliers and distributors.
During 2022, no single customer accounted for more than 10% of our net revenues. There can be no assurance that
our customers will continue to purchase our products in the same mix or quantities or on the same terms as in the past,
particularly as increasingly powerful retailers continue to demand lower pricing and develop their own brands. The loss
of or disruptions related to a significant customer could result in a material reduction in sales or change in the mix of
products we sell to the customer. This could materially and adversely affect our product sales, financial condition,
results of operations, cash flows and stock price.
Disputes with significant customers, suppliers or distributors, including disputes related to pricing or performance, could
adversely affect our ability to supply or deliver products or operate our business and could materially and adversely
affect our product sales, financial condition and results of operations. The financial condition of our significant
customers and business partners are affected by events that are largely beyond our control such as the COVID-19
pandemic. New regulations can also affect our commercial practices and our relationship with customers, suppliers or
distributors. Deterioration in the financial condition of significant customers, suppliers or distributors or regulations
affecting our relationship with these parties could materially and adversely affect our product sales, financial condition,
results of operations, cash flows and stock price.
We may be unable to hire or retain and develop key personnel or a highly skilled and diverse global workforce
or effectively manage changes in our workforce and respond to shifts in labor availability.
We must attract, hire, retain and develop effective leaders and a highly skilled and diverse global workforce. We
compete to hire new personnel with a variety of capabilities in the many countries in which we manufacture and market
our products and then to develop and retain their skills and competencies. We have experienced and could continue to
experience unplanned or increased turnover of employees with key capabilities, and we could fail to develop adequate
succession plans for leadership positions or hire and retain a workforce with the skills and in the locations we need to
operate and grow our business. We could also fail to attract and develop personnel with key emerging capabilities that
we need to continue to respond to changing consumer and customer needs and grow our business, including skills in
the areas of digital commerce and marketing, data analytics, and procurement and supply chain expertise. Occurrence
of any of these conditions could deplete our institutional knowledge base and erode our competitiveness.
We are experiencing an increasingly tight and competitive labor market and could face unforeseen challenges in the
availability of labor. A sustained labor shortage or increased turnover rates within our employee base caused by
COVID-19 or related issues such as vaccine mandates, or as a result of general macroeconomic factors (including high
inflation and hyperinflation in certain markets), have led and in the future could continue to lead to increased costs,
such as increased overtime to meet demand and increased wages to attract and retain employees. We have also been
negatively affected and could continue to be negatively affected by labor shortages or constraints experienced by our
partners, including our external manufacturing partners, freight providers, other strategic suppliers and distributors.
Failure to achieve and maintain a diverse workforce and leadership team, compensate our employees competitively
and fairly, maintain a safe and inclusive environment or promote the well-being of our employees could affect our
reputation and also result in lower performance and an inability to retain valuable employees.
We must address changes in, and that affect, our workforce and satisfy the legal requirements associated with how we
manage and compensate our employees. This includes our management of employees represented by labor unions or
workers’ councils, who represent approximately 50% of our 78,000 employees outside the United States and
approximately 28% of our 13,000 U.S. employees. Strikes such as the one we experienced in some of our U.S.
manufacturing and distribution facilities in 2021, work stoppages, or other forms of labor unrest by our employees or
those of our suppliers, distributors or other business partners, or situations like the renegotiation of collective bargaining
agreements, have in the past and may in the future cause disruptions to our supply chain, manufacturing or distribution
processes. Changes in immigration laws and policies or restrictions such as those imposed in connection with the
COVID-19 pandemic could make it more difficult for us to recruit or relocate skilled employees. We could also fail to
effectively respond to evolving perceptions and goals of those in our workforce or whom we
22
Table of Contents
might seek to hire, including in response to changes brought on by the COVID-19 pandemic, with respect to flexible
working or other matters.
These risks could materially and adversely affect our reputation, ability to efficiently operate our manufacturing facilities
and overall business and meet the needs of our customers, product sales, financial condition, results of operations,
cash flows and stock price.
Legal and Regulatory Risks
We face risks related to complying with changes in and inconsistencies among laws and regulations in many
countries in which we operate.
Our activities around the world are highly regulated and subject to government oversight. Various laws and regulations
govern food production, sourcing, packaging and waste management, storage, distribution, sales, advertising, labeling
and marketing, as well as intellectual property, competition, antitrust, trade and export controls, labor, tax, social and
environmental matters, privacy, data protection, and health and safety practices. Government authorities regularly
change laws and regulations as well as their interpretations of existing laws and regulations. Our failure to comply with
existing laws and regulations, or to make changes necessary to comply with new or revised laws and regulations or
evolving interpretations and application of existing laws and regulations, and differing or competing laws and
regulations across the markets where our products are made, manufactured, distributed and sold, could materially and
adversely affect our product sales, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. For instance, our financial
condition, results of operations and cash flows could be negatively affected by the regulatory and economic impact of
changes in the corporate tax policies of the United States and other countries; trade relations among the United States
and other countries, including China, Mexico and the European Union; and changes within the European Union.
Evolving expectations on ESG disclosures and reporting will also result in new regulatory actions. In addition, the
results of third-party studies (whether or not scientifically valid) purporting to assess the health implications of
consumption of certain ingredients or substances present in certain of our products or packaging materials have
resulted in and could continue to result in our being subject to new taxes and regulations or lawsuits that can adversely
affect our business.
We may decide or be required to recall products or be subjected to product liability claims.
We could decide, or laws or regulations could require us, to recall products due to suspected or confirmed deliberate or
unintentional product contamination, including contamination of ingredients we use in our products that third parties
supply, spoilage or other adulteration, product mislabeling or product tampering. These risks could be heightened in
light of increased pressure on our suppliers from supply chain challenges. On-site quality audits of third parties such as
suppliers, external manufacturers and trademark licensees have been limited in some instances by travel restrictions
and heightened safety protocols in light of COVID-19, and remote audits do not fully offset risks from the inability to
conduct on-site audits. In addition, if another company recalls or experiences negative publicity related to a product in a
category in which we compete, consumers might reduce their overall consumption of products in this category. Any of
these events could materially and adversely affect our reputation, brands, product sales, financial condition, results of
operations, cash flows and stock price.
We may also suffer losses when our products or operations or those of our suppliers violate applicable laws or
regulations, or when our or our suppliers’ products cause injury, illness or death. In addition, our marketing could face
claims of false or deceptive advertising or other criticism. A significant product liability claim or other legal judgment
against us, a related regulatory enforcement action, a widespread product recall or attempts to manipulate us based on
threats related to the safety of our products could materially and adversely affect our reputation and profitability.
Moreover, even if a product liability, consumer fraud or other claim is unsuccessful, has no merit or is not pursued, the
negative publicity surrounding assertions against our products or processes could materially and adversely affect our
reputation, brands, product sales, product inventory, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock
price, and we could incur significant expense responding to such a claim.
We face risks related to legal or tax claims or other regulatory enforcement actions.
We operate around the world in many regulated environments with constantly evolving legal, tax and regulatory
frameworks, and we are subject to risk of litigation, legal or tax claims or other regulatory enforcement actions. Actions
by our employees, contractors or agents in violation of our policies and procedures could lead to deficiencies in our
internal or other controls or violations, unintentional or otherwise, of laws and regulations.
23
Table of Contents
Furthermore, as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and supply chain challenges, there may be investigations, legal
claims or litigation against us relating to our actions or decisions in response to these conditions. We could also be
subject to litigation, legal claims or regulatory actions in connection with the continued evolution of our sustainability
and ESG-related initiatives. When litigation, legal or tax claims or regulatory enforcement actions arise out of our failure
or alleged failure to comply with applicable laws, regulations or controls, we could be subject to civil and criminal
penalties that could materially and adversely affect our reputation, product sales, financial condition, results of
operations, cash flows and stock price. Even if a claim is unsuccessful, without merit or not pursued to completion, the
cost of responding to such a claim, including expenses and management time, could adversely affect us.
We could fail to maintain effective internal control over financial reporting or disclosure controls and
procedures.
The accuracy of our financial reporting depends on the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting.
Internal control over financial reporting can provide only reasonable assurance with respect to the preparation and fair
presentation of financial statements and may not prevent or detect misstatements because of its inherent limitations.
These limitations include, among others, the possibility of human error, inadequacy or circumvention of controls and
fraud. If we do not maintain effective internal control over financial reporting or design and implement disclosure and
other controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance with respect to the preparation and fair presentation of our
financial statements and other disclosures, including in connection with controls executed for us by third parties, we
might fail to timely detect any misappropriation of corporate assets or inappropriate allocation or use of funds and could
be unable to file financial reports or make other disclosures accurately and on a timely basis.
We face challenges as we work to meet our ESG goals and continue to evolve our ESG-related disclosures and
reporting considering various existing and developing standards, such as those of the Financial Stability Board’s TCFD,
the EU Corporate Sustainability Reporting Directive and the SASB Standards of the Value Reporting Foundation. We
might fail to meet our ESG goals or report on them accurately and timely.
As a result of any of these factors, our reputation, results of operations and stock price could be materially adversely
affected.
We face risks related to adequately protecting our valuable intellectual property rights.
We consider our intellectual property rights, particularly and most notably our trademarks, but also our patents,
copyrights, registered designs, proprietary trade secrets, recipes, technology, know-how and licensing agreements, to
be a significant and valuable part of our business. We attempt to protect our intellectual property rights by taking
advantage of a combination of patent, trademark, copyright and trade secret laws in various countries, as well as
licensing agreements, third-party nondisclosure and assignment agreements and policing of third-party misuses and
infringement of our intellectual property. Our failure to obtain or adequately protect our intellectual property rights, or
any change in law or other changes that serve to lessen or remove the current legal protections of our intellectual
property, may diminish our competitiveness and could materially harm our business, financial condition and stock price.
We may be unaware of potential third-party claims of intellectual property infringement relating to our technology,
brands or products. Any litigation regarding patents or other intellectual property could be costly and time-consuming
and could divert management’s and other key personnel’s attention from our business operations. Third-party claims of
intellectual property infringement might require us to pay monetary damages or enter into costly license agreements.
We also may be subject to injunctions against development and sale of certain of our products, which could include
removal of existing products from sale. Any of these occurrences could materially and adversely affect our reputation,
brand health, ability to introduce new products or improve the quality of existing products, product sales, financial
condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock price.
24
Table of Contents
Financial Risks
We face risks related to tax matters, including changes in tax laws and rates, disagreements with taxing
authorities and imposition of new taxes.
As a global company, we are subject to taxation in the United States and various other countries and jurisdictions. As a
result, our effective tax rate is determined based on the income and applicable tax rates in the various jurisdictions in
which we operate. Our future effective tax rates could be affected by changes in the composition of earnings in
countries with differing tax rates or other factors, and adverse changes in the underlying profitability or financial outlook
of our operations in several jurisdictions could lead to changes in the realizability of our deferred tax assets, resulting in
a charge to our effective tax rate.
Changes in tax laws in the U.S. or in other countries where we have significant operations, including rate changes or
corporate tax provisions that could disallow or tax perceived base erosion or profit shifting payments or subject us to
new types of tax, could materially affect our effective tax rate and our deferred tax assets and liabilities. In addition,
aspects of U.S. tax laws may lead foreign jurisdictions to respond by enacting additional tax legislation that is
unfavorable to us. On August 16, 2022, the U.S. enacted the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, which, among other
things, implements a 15% minimum tax on book income of certain large corporations, a 1% excise tax on net stock
repurchases and several tax incentives to promote clean energy. Based on our initial analysis of the provisions, we
expect to meet the criteria of a large corporation but we do not believe this legislation will have a material impact on our
consolidated financial statements; we will continue to evaluate it as additional guidance and clarification becomes
available. We also continue to monitor countries’ progress toward enactment of the Organization of Economic
Cooperation and Development’s model rules on a global minimum tax. During December 2022, the European Union
reached agreement on the introduction of a minimum tax directive requiring each member state to enact local
legislation. Additionally, South Korea became the first country to enact minimum tax rules, which will be effective for
fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 2024. These specific actions did not impact our consolidated financial
statements in 2022, but future enacted legislation in this area could have a material effect on us if enacted.
We are also subject to tax audits by governmental authorities. Although we believe our tax estimates are reasonable, if
a taxing authority disagrees with the positions we have taken, we could face additional tax liabilities, including interest
and penalties. Unexpected results from one or more such tax audits could significantly adversely affect our effective tax
rate, results of operations, cash flows and stock price.
We are subject to currency exchange rate fluctuations.
At December 31, 2022, we sold our products in over 150 countries and had operations in approximately 80 countries.
Consequently, a significant portion of our business is exposed to currency exchange rate fluctuations. Our financial
position and operating results are sensitive to movements in currency exchange rates, which have recently been more
volatile, because a large portion of our assets, liabilities, revenue and expenses must be translated into U.S. dollars for
reporting purposes or converted into U.S. dollars to service obligations such as our U.S. dollar-denominated
indebtedness and to pay dividends to our shareholders. In addition, movements in currency exchange rates affect
transaction costs because we source product ingredients from various countries. Our efforts to mitigate our exposure to
exchange rate fluctuations, primarily on cross-currency transactions, may not be successful. We hedge a number of
risks including exposures to foreign exchange rate movements and volatility of interest rates that could impact our
future borrowing costs. Hedging of these risks could potentially subject us to counter-party credit risk. In addition, local
economies, monetary policies and currency hedging availability affect our ability to hedge against currency-related
economic losses. We might not be able to successfully mitigate our exposure to currency risks due to factors such as
continued global and local market volatility, actions by foreign governments, political uncertainty, inflation and limited
hedging opportunities. Accordingly, changes in the currency exchange rates that we use to translate our results into
U.S. dollars for financial reporting purposes or for transactions involving multiple currencies could materially and
adversely affect future demand for our products, our financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and stock
price, and our relationships with customers, suppliers and employees in the short or long-term.
25
Table of Contents
Weak financial performance, downgrades in our credit ratings, rising interest rates, illiquid global capital
markets and volatile global economic conditions could limit our access to the global capital markets or the
effectiveness of our cash management programs, reduce our liquidity and increase our borrowing costs.
We access the long-term and short-term global capital markets to obtain financing. Our financial performance, our
short-and long-term debt credit ratings, interest rates, the stability of financial institutions with which we partner, the
liquidity of the overall global capital markets (which could be impacted by the United States government’s decisions
regarding its debt ceiling) and the state of the global economy, including the food industry, could affect our access to,
and the availability and cost of, financing on acceptable terms and conditions and our ability to pay dividends in the
future. Globally, several central banks in various countries have raised, and may again raise, interest rates to combat
inflation. There can be no assurance that we will have access to the global capital markets on terms we find
acceptable.
We regularly access the commercial paper markets in the United States and Europe for ongoing funding requirements.
A downgrade in our credit ratings by a credit rating agency could increase our borrowing costs and adversely affect our
ability to issue commercial paper. Disruptions in the global commercial paper market or other effects of volatile
economic conditions on the global credit markets also could reduce the amount of commercial paper that we could
issue and raise our borrowing costs for both short- and long-term debt offerings.
We use cash management programs, such as factoring and supply chain finance arrangements, in our business when
circumstances are favorable to manage liquidity. If these programs or underlying customer or supplier terms do not
continue and we are unable to secure alternative programs, our cash and working capital may be negatively affected
and we may have to utilize our various financing arrangements or increase our long-term borrowings for short- and
long-term liquidity requirements.
Limitations on our ability to access the global capital markets, a reduction in our liquidity or an increase in our borrowing
costs could materially and adversely affect our financial condition, results of operations and stock price.
Volatility in the global capital markets, interest rates, inflation rates, our participation in multiemployer pension
plans and other factors could increase our costs relating to our employees’ pensions.
We sponsor defined benefit pension plans for a number of our employees throughout the world and also contribute to
other employees’ pensions under defined benefit plans that we do not sponsor. At the end of 2022, the projected
benefit obligation of the defined benefit pension plans we sponsor was $8.1 billion and plan assets were $8.7 billion.
For defined benefit pension plans that we maintain, the difference between plan obligations and assets, or the funded
status of the plans, significantly affects the net periodic benefit costs of our pension plans and the ongoing funding
requirements of those plans. Our largest funded defined benefit pension plans are funded with trust assets invested in
a globally diversified portfolio of investments, including equities and corporate and government debt. Among other
factors, changes in interest rates, inflation rates, mortality rates, early retirement rates, investment returns, funding
requirements in the jurisdictions in which the plans operate and the market value of plan assets affect the level of plan
funding, cause volatility in the net periodic pension cost and impact our future funding requirements. Legislative and
other governmental regulatory actions may also increase funding requirements for our pension plans’ benefits
obligation. Volatility in the global capital markets may increase the risk that we will be required to make additional cash
contributions to these company-sponsored pension plans and recognize further increases in our net periodic pension
cost.
We also participate in multiemployer pension plans for certain U.S. union-represented employees. As a participating
employer under multiemployer pension plans, we may owe more than the contributions we are required to make under
the applicable collective bargaining agreements. For example, if we partially or completely withdraw from a
multiemployer pension plan, we may be required to pay a partial or complete withdrawal liability, such as the withdrawal
liability we are paying in connection with our complete withdrawal from the Bakery and Confectionery Union and
Industry International Pension Fund in 2018. This kind of withdrawal liability will generally increase if there is also a
mass withdrawal of other participating employers or if the plan terminates. See Note 11, Benefit Plans, to the
consolidated financial statements for more information on our multiemployer pension plans.
A significant increase in our pension benefit obligations, future funding requirements or net periodic benefit costs could
curtail our ability to invest in the business and adversely affect our financial condition, results of operations, cash flows
and stock price.
26
Table of Contents
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments.
None.
Item 2. Properties.
On December 31, 2022, we had approximately 148 manufacturing and processing facilities in 46 countries and 111
distribution centers and warehouses worldwide that we owned or leased. In addition to our owned or leased properties,
we also utilize a highly distributed network of warehouses and distribution centers that are owned or leased by third
party logistics partners, contract manufacturers, co-packers or other strategic partners. We believe we have or will add
sufficient capacity to meet our planned operating needs. It is our practice to maintain all of our plants and other facilities
in good condition.
 As of December 31, 2022
Number of
Manufacturing
FacilitiesNumber of
Distribution
 and Warehouse Facilities
Latin America 16 11 
AMEA 45 29 
Europe 63 10 
North America 24 61 
Total 148 111 
Owned 128 15 
Leased 20 96 
Total 148 111 
(1)Excludes our deconsolidated Venezuela operations. Refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies, for more information.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
Information regarding legal proceedings is available in Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated
financial statements in this report.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.(1)
27
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5.  Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities.
We are proud members of the Standard and Poor’s 500 and Nasdaq 100. Our Common Stock is listed on The Nasdaq
Global Select Market under the symbol “MDLZ.” At January 31, 2023, there were 38,218 holders of record of our
Common Stock.
Comparison of Five-Year Cumulative Total Return
The following graph compares the cumulative total return on our Common Stock with the cumulative total return of the
S&P 500 Index and the Mondelēz International performance peer group index. The graph assumes, in each case, that
an initial investment of $100 is made at the beginning of the five-year period. The cumulative total return reflects market
prices at the end of each year and the reinvestment of dividends each year.
As of December 31,Mondelēz
International S&P 500Performance
Peer Group
2017 $ 100.00 $ 100.00 $ 100.00 
2018 95.73 95.62 94.15 
2019 134.43 125.72 119.40 
2020 145.97 148.85 130.65 
2021 169.14 191.58 149.35 
2022 174.08 156.88 147.96 
The Mondelēz International performance peer group consists of the following companies considered our market
competitors or that have been selected on the basis of industry, global focus or industry leadership: Campbell Soup
Company, The Coca-Cola Company, Colgate-Palmolive Company, Danone S.A., General Mills, Inc., The Hershey
Company, Kellogg Company, The Kraft Heinz Company, Nestlé S.A., PepsiCo, Inc., The Procter & Gamble Company
and Unilever PLC.
28
Table of Contents
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Our stock repurchase activity for each of the three months in the quarter ended December 31, 2022 was:
 
PeriodTotal Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number of
Shares Purchased
as Part of Publicly
Announced Plans or
ProgramsApproximate Dollar Value
of Shares That May Yet
Be Purchased Under the
Plans or Programs
October 1-31, 2022 1,863,361 $ 56.55 1,847,134 $ 1,707 
November 1-30, 2022 600,970 64.87 585,763 1,669 
December 1-31, 2022 240,012 67.47 236,873 1,653 
For the Quarter Ended
December 31, 2022 2,704,343 59.37 2,669,770 
 
(1)The total number of shares purchased (and the average price paid per share) reflects: (i) shares purchased pursuant to the repurchase program
described in (2) below; and (ii) shares tendered to us by employees who used shares to exercise options and to pay the related taxes for grants
of deferred stock units that vested, totaling 16,227 shares, 15,207 shares and 3,139 shares for the fiscal months of October, November and
December 2022, respectively.
(2)Dollar values stated in millions. Our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase up to $23.7 billion of our Common Stock through December 31,
2023. Since the program inception on March 12, 2013 through December 31, 2022, we have repurchased $22.0 billion. Our Board of Directors
authorized a new program for the repurchase of up to $6.0 billion of our Common Stock through December 31, 2025. This authorization, effective
January 1, 2023, replaces our current share repurchase program. See related information in Note 13, Capital Stock.
Item 6.   Reserved. (1)  (1)  (2)  (2)
29
Table of Contents
Item 7.   Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following discussion and analysis contains forward-looking statements. It should be read in conjunction with the
other sections of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, including the consolidated financial statements and related notes
contained in Forward-Looking Statements and Item 1A, Risk Factors.
Overview of Business and Strategy
Our core business is making and selling chocolate, biscuits and baked snacks, with additional businesses in adjacent,
locally relevant categories including gum & candy, cheese & grocery and powdered beverages around the world.
We aim to be the global leader in snacking. Our strategy is to drive long-term growth by focusing on four strategic
priorities: accelerating consumer-centric growth, driving operational excellence, creating a winning growth culture and
scaling sustainable snacking. We believe the successful implementation of our strategic priorities and leveraging of our
attractive global footprint, strong core of iconic global and local brands, marketing, sales, distribution and cost
excellence capabilities, and top talent with a growth mindset, will drive consistent top- and bottom-line growth, enabling
us to continue to create long-term value for our shareholders.
For more detailed information on our business and strategy, refer to Item 1, Business.
Recent Developments and Significant Items Affecting Comparability
Macroeconomic environment
We continue to observe significant market uncertainty, increasing inflationary pressures, supply constraints, exchange
rate volatility as well as ongoing effects from the COVID-19 pandemic. Throughout the pandemic, we experienced an
overall increase in demand and revenue growth as consumers increased their food purchases for in-home consumption
in some markets, while parts of our business were negatively affected by related lockdowns and restrictions.
Additionally, global supply chain, transportation and labor issues escalated and we experienced significantly higher
operating costs, including higher overall raw material, transportation, labor and energy costs that have continued to
rise.
Our overall outlook for future snacks revenue growth remains strong; however, we anticipate ongoing volatility in
response to COVID-related risks and supply chain issues, including labor and transportation constraints. We will
continue to proactively manage our business in response to the evolving global economic environment and related
uncertainty and business risks while also prioritizing and supporting our employees and customers. We continue to
take steps to mitigate impacts to our supply chain, operations, technology and assets.
War in Ukraine
In February 2022, Russia began a military invasion of Ukraine. For the safety of our employees, we stopped production
and closed our facilities in Ukraine; since then we have been gradually restoring operations, continuing to take steps to
protect the safety of our employees and partially re-opening our two plants. We are providing all of our employees with
compensation and with help in securing shelter in neighboring countries, where required and needed. We have also
made cash and in-kind donations to several humanitarian aid organizations in the region.
In March 2022, our two Ukrainian manufacturing facilities in Trostyanets and Vyshhorod were significantly damaged.
During the remainder of 2022, the war continued through parts of Ukraine. We continue to make targeted repairs on
both our plants. We relaunched our systems and implemented additional safety and security measures. In late June,
we partially reopened the Vyshhorod plant and restarted limited potato chip production and in late November, we
reopened the Trostyanets plant and restarted limited chocolate production. See Note 1, Summary of Significant
Accounting Policies - War in Ukraine, to the condensed consolidated financial statements, and refer to Items Affecting
Comparability of Financial Results for additional information.
As a food company, we continue to work to support the continuity of food supply and provide packaged foods to
consumers. We have suspended new capital investments and our advertising spending in Russia, but as a food
company with more than 2,500 employees in the country, we have not ceased operations given we believe we play a
role in the continuity of the food supply. We are complying and will comply with applicable international sanctions
30
Table of Contents
and other measures that have been or may be imposed on Russian entities. We continue to evaluate the situation in
Ukraine and Russia and our ability to control our operating activities and businesses on an ongoing basis, and we
continue to consolidate both our Ukrainian and Russian subsidiaries. Prior to the onset of the war, Ukraine generated
0.5% and Russia generated 2.9% of 2021 consolidated net revenues and in 2022, Ukraine generated 0.3% and Russia
generated 4.0% of consolidated net revenue. Our Russian business has grown as a result of the recent strengthening
of the Russian ruble versus the U.S. dollar, underlying trends of consumers toward snack and packaged food
categories and increased price. The combination of pricing, volume growth, suspension of advertising and ruble
strength has resulted in a significant increase in the profitability of the Russian business and contributed to the growth
of our consolidated performance. Our decision to suspend new capital investments in Russia has not had a material
impact on our ability to meet demand within our Russian business during 2022. We believe the war in Ukraine has had
a negative impact on our business throughout the rest of our Europe operating segment, but the impact of this is
difficult to quantify. We cannot predict if the recent strength in our Russian business will continue in the future.
We provide more information on risks related to the war in Ukraine in our Financial Outlook and Commodity Trends
section, Item 3, Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk, and under Item 1A, Risk Factors.
Acquisitions and Divestitures
During 2022, we completed the following acquisitions to strategically complement and expand our existing portfolio:
•Ricolino, a confectionery business with products sold primarily in Mexico
•Clif Bar & Company (“Clif Bar”), a leading U.S. maker of nutritious energy bars with organic ingredients
•Chipita Global S.A. ("Chipita"), a high-growth leader in the central and Eastern European croissant and baked
snacks category
Additionally in 2022, we announced our intention to divest our developed market gum and global Halls candy
businesses and in Q4 2022, we announced an agreement to sell the developed market gum business with an
anticipated closing of Q4 2023, subject to relevant antitrust approvals and closing conditions.
Refer to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, and Liquidity and Capital Resources for additional details.
Equity Method Investment Transactions
JDE Peet’s Transactions
In 2022, we sold approximately 18.6 million of our shares back to JDE Peet’s, which reduced our ownership interest by
approximately 3% to 19.8%. We recorded a loss of €8 million ($8 million). In 2021, we issued €300 million
exchangeable bonds. If all bonds were redeemed in exchange for shares, this would represent approximately
8.5 million shares or approximately 9% of our equity interest in JDE Peet's. In 2020, we exchanged our 26.4%
ownership interest in JDE for a 26.5% equity interest in JDE Peet’s, which was then taken public. During the initial
public offering, we sold approximately 11.1 million shares, recording a pre-tax gain of $131 million and a $250 million
tax expense and reducing our ownership interest to 22.9%.
Keurig Dr Pepper Transactions:
In 2021, we sold approximately 42.7 million shares, which reduced our ownership interest by 3.0% to 5.3%. We
recorded a pre-tax gain of $768 million (or $581 million after-tax). In 2020, we sold approximately 73.4 million shares,
which reduced our ownership interest by 5.2% to 8.4%. We recorded a pre-tax gain of $865 million (or $662 million
after-tax).
For additional information, refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments and Note 10, Financial Instruments.
Highly Inflationary Accounting
Türkiye. During the first quarter of 2022, we concluded that Türkiye became a highly inflationary economy for
accounting purposes. As of April 1, 2022, we began to apply highly inflationary accounting for our subsidiaries operating
in Türkiye.
See Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting for
additional details.
31
Table of Contents
U.K. advertising and promotion ban
In the United Kingdom, a ban on specific types of TV and online advertising of food containing levels of fat, sugar or
salt above specified thresholds is expected to go into effect in October 2025, and new measures restricting certain
promotions are expected to go into effect in October 2023. Restrictions on in-store placement of some of those
products went into effect in October 2022. Although we are unable to estimate precisely the impact of the restrictions,
they did not have a significant impact on our consolidated financial statements in 2022.
Taxes
We continue to monitor existing and potential future tax reform around the world. On August 16, 2022, the U.S. enacted
the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, which, among other things, implements a 15% minimum tax on book income of
certain large corporations, a 1% excise tax on net stock repurchases and several tax incentives to promote clean
energy. Based on our initial analysis of the provisions, we expect to meet the criteria of a large corporation but we do
not believe this legislation will have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements. We will continue to
evaluate it as additional guidance and clarification becomes available. We also continue to monitor countries’ progress
toward enactment of the Organization of Economic Cooperation and Development’s model rules on a global minimum
tax. During December 2022, the European Union reached agreement on the introduction of a minimum tax directive
requiring each member state to enact local legislation. Additionally, South Korea became the first country to enact
minimum tax rules, which will be effective for fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 2024. These specific actions
did not impact our consolidated financial statements in 2022 but future enacted legislation in this area could have a
material effect on us, if enacted.
Summary of Results
 
•Net revenues were approximately $31.5 billion in 2022 and $28.7 billion in 2021, an increase of 9.7% in 2022
and an increase of 8.0% in 2021. In both 2022 and 2021, our net revenue growth continued to reflect increased
demand for most of our snack category products in both our emerging and developed markets.
–Net revenues increased in 2022, driven by higher net pricing, incremental net revenues from our
acquisitions of Chipita, Clif Bar and Ricolino in 2022 and Gourmet Foods and Grenade in 2021 and
favorable volume/mix, partially offset by a significant impact from unfavorable currency translation, as
the U.S. dollar strengthened relative to most currencies we operate in compared to exchange rates in
the prior year and the impact of divestitures.
–Net revenues increased in 2021, driven by favorable volume/mix, higher net pricing, a significant
impact from favorable currency translation, as most currencies we operate in strengthened against the
U.S. dollar compared to exchange rates in the prior year, and incremental net revenues from our
acquisitions of Gourmet Foods, Grenade and Hu in 2021 and Give & Go in 2020.
•Organic Net Revenue increased 12.3% to $32.2 billion in 2022 and increased 5.1% to $27.9 billion in 2021.
Organic Net Revenue increased in both 2022 and 2021 due to higher net pricing and favorable volume/mix.
Organic Net Revenue is on a constant currency basis and excludes revenue from acquisitions and divestitures.
We use Organic Net Revenue as it provides improved year-over-year comparability of our underlying operating
results (see the definition of Organic Net Revenue and our reconciliation with net revenues within Non-GAAP
Financial Measures appearing later in this section).
•Diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz International decreased 35.5% to $1.96 in 2022 and increased 23.1% to
$3.04 in 2021.
–Diluted EPS decreased in 2022 driven by lapping prior-year net gains on equity method transactions,
unfavorable year-over-year mark-to-market impacts from currency and commodity derivatives, the
impact from the European Commission legal matter, higher acquisition-related costs, incremental costs
incurred due to the war in Ukraine, higher acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration
adjustments, higher intangible asset impairment charges, lower net earnings from divestitures, higher
remeasurement loss of net monetary position and inventory step-up charges incurred in 2022, partially
offset by an increase in Adjusted EPS, lower Simplify to Grow program costs, lower negative impacts
from enacted tax law changes, lower equity method investee items, 2017 malware incident net
recoveries and lower negative impact from pension participation changes.
–Diluted EPS increased in 2021 driven by an increase in Adjusted EPS, lapping prior-year costs
associated with the JDE Peet’s transaction, favorable year-over-year mark-to-market impacts from
currency and commodity derivatives, lower intangible asset impairment charges, lapping the prior-
32
Table of Contents
year loss on interest rate swaps, lower losses on debt extinguishment and related expenses, lower
Simplify to Grow program costs and a net benefit from acquisition integration costs and contingent
consideration adjustments. These factors were partially offset by a lower gain on equity method
investment transactions, higher initial impacts from enacted tax law changes, lower net earnings from
divestitures, lapping the prior-year benefit from the resolution of tax matters and higher impact from
pension participation changes.
–Adjusted EPS increased 3.5% to $2.95 in 2022 and increased 12.2% to $2.85 in 2021. On a constant currency
basis, Adjusted EPS increased 11.9% to $3.19 in 2022 and increased 8.7% to $2.76 in 2021.
–Adjusted EPS increased in 2022, driven by operating gains and fewer shares outstanding, partially
offset by unfavorable currency translation, higher interest expense and lower equity method investment
earnings.
–Adjusted EPS increased in 2021, driven by operating gains, favorable currency translation, fewer
shares outstanding, higher equity method investment earnings and lower interest expense, partially
offset by higher taxes primarily due to a lower net benefit from non-recurring discrete tax items.
Adjusted EPS and Adjusted EPS on a constant currency basis are non-GAAP financial measures. We use
these measures as they provide improved year-over-year comparability of our underlying results (see the
definition of Adjusted EPS and our reconciliation with diluted EPS within Non-GAAP Financial Measures
appearing later in this section).
Financial Outlook
We seek to achieve profitable, long-term growth and manage our business to attain this goal using our key operating
metrics: Organic Net Revenue, Adjusted Operating Income and Adjusted EPS. We use these non-GAAP financial
metrics and related computations, particularly growth in profit dollars, to evaluate and manage our business and to plan
and make near- and long-term operating and strategic decisions. As such, we believe these metrics are useful to
investors as they provide supplemental information in addition to our U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles
(“U.S. GAAP”) financial results. We believe it is useful to provide investors with the same financial information that we
use internally to make comparisons of our historical operating results, identify trends in our underlying operating results
and evaluate our business. We believe our non-GAAP financial measures should always be considered in relation to
our GAAP results. We have provided reconciliations between our GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures in Non-
GAAP Financial Measures, which appears later in this section.
In addition to monitoring our key operating metrics, we monitor a number of developments and trends that could impact
our revenue and profitability objectives:
Demand – We monitor consumer spending and our market share within the food and beverage categories in which we
sell our products. Core snacks categories continued to expand due to the continued growth of snacking as a consumer
behavior around the world. As part of our strategic plan, we seek to drive category growth by leveraging our local and
consumer-focused commercial approach, making investments in our brand and snacks portfolio, building strong routes
to market in both emerging and developed markets and improving our availability across multiple channels. We believe
these actions will help drive demand in our categories and strengthen our positions across markets.
Long-Term Demographics and Consumer Trends – Snack food consumption is highly correlated to GDP growth,
urbanization of populations and rising discretionary income levels associated with a growing middle class, particularly in
emerging markets. We believe that snacks continue to be a source of comfort as well as excitement and variety for
consumers. Social media increasingly helps consumers find food trends, inspiration and connection on their social
media and other feeds. Consumers are also interested in buying snacks conveniently, whether through same-day
delivery apps, shipped sources or different retail settings. Many consumers also continue to prioritize sustainability in
their purchase decisions, valuing sustainably sourced ingredients, low carbon footprint preparation and lower waste
packaging. We seek to continue to offer snacks that meet consumer needs and preferences and align with our strategic
priorities.
Pricing – Our net revenue growth and profitability may be affected as we adjust prices to address new conditions, such
as increasing input and operating costs due to supply, transportation and labor constraints and higher cost trends. We
adjust our product prices based on a number of variables including market factors, transportation, logistics and
changes in our product input costs, and we have increased prices to control costs given recent significant cost inflation.
33
Table of Contents
Operating Costs – Our operating costs include raw materials, labor, selling, general and administrative expenses,
taxes, currency impacts and financing costs. We manage these costs through cost saving and productivity initiatives,
sourcing and hedging programs, pricing actions, refinancing and tax planning. To remain competitive on our operating
structure, we continue to work on programs to expand our profitability, such as our Simplify to Grow Program, which is
designed to bring about significant reductions in our operating cost structure in both our supply chain and overhead
costs. We experienced significantly higher operating costs, including higher overall raw material, transportation, labor
and fuel costs that have continued to rise.
34
Table of Contents
Discussion and Analysis of Historical Results
Items Affecting Comparability of Financial Results
The following table includes significant income or (expense) items that affected the comparability of our results of
operations and our effective tax rates. Please refer to the notes to the consolidated financial statements indicated
below for more information. Refer also to the Consolidated Results of Operations – Net Earnings and Earnings per
Share Attributable to Mondelēz International table for the after-tax per share impacts of these items.
 
  For the Years Ended December 31,
 See Note 2022 2021 2020
  (in millions, except percentages)
Simplify to Grow Program Note 8
Restructuring Charges $ (36)$ (154)$ (156)
Implementation Charges (87) (167) (207)
Intangible asset impairment charges Note 6 (101) (32) (144)
Mark-to-market (losses)/gains from derivatives Note 10 (318) 277 19 
Acquisition and divestiture-related costs Note 2
Acquisition integration costs and
   contingent consideration adjustments (148) 40 (4)
Inventory step-up (25) — — 
Acquisition-related costs (254) (25) (15)
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures — 8 — 
Divestiture-related costs (18) (22) (4)
Costs associated with JDE Peet's transaction Note 7 — — (48)
2017 Malware incident net recoveries 37 — — 
Incremental costs due to war in Ukraine Note 1 (121) — — 
European Commission legal matter Note 14 (318) — — 
Remeasurement of net monetary position Note 1 (40) (13) (9)
Impact from pension participation changes Note 11 (10) (42) (11)
Impact from resolution of tax matters Note 14 — 7 48 
Loss related to interest rate swaps Note 9 & 10 — — (103)
Loss on debt extinguishment and related
expensesNote 9 (129) (137) (185)
Initial impacts from enacted tax law changes Note 16 (17) (100) (36)
(Loss)/gain on equity method
   investment transactions Note 7 (22) 740 989 
Equity method investee items 8 (61) (72)
Effective tax rate Note 16 26.8 % 27.2 % 36.2 %
 
(1)Includes impacts recorded in operating income, benefit plan non-service income and interest expense and other, net. Mark-to-market
gains/(losses) above also include our equity method investment-related derivative contract mark-to-market gains/(losses) (refer to Note 10,
Financial Instruments) that are recorded in the gain on equity method investment transactions on our consolidated statement of earnings.
(2)Incremental costs due to the war in Ukraine include direct charges such as asset impairments due to damaged facilities and inventory, higher
expected allowances for uncollectible accounts receivable and committed compensation. Please see the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section
at the end of this item and Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – War in Ukraine, for additional information.
(3)Gain/(loss) on equity method investment transactions is recorded outside pre-tax operating results on the consolidated statement of earnings.
See footnote (1) as mark-to-market gains/(losses) on our equity method-investment-related derivative contracts are presented in the table above
within mark-to-market gains/(losses) from derivatives.
(4)Includes our proportionate share of significant operating and non-operating items recorded by our JDE Peet's and KDP equity method investees,
including acquisition and divestiture-related costs and restructuring program costs.(1)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(1)
(3)
(4)
35
Table of Contents
Consolidated Results of Operations
The following discussion compares our consolidated results of operations for 2022 with 2021 and 2021 with 2020.
2022 compared with 2021
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2022 2021 $ change % change
 (in millions, except per share data)  
Net revenues $ 31,496 $ 28,720 $ 2,776 9.7 %
Operating income 3,534 4,653 (1,119) (24.0)%
Earnings from continuing operations 2,726 4,314 (1,588) (36.8)%
Net earnings attributable to
   Mondelēz International 2,717 4,300 (1,583) (36.8)%
Diluted earnings per share attributable to
   Mondelēz International 1.96 3.04 (1.08) (35.5)%
Net Revenues – Net revenues increased $2,776 million (9.7%) to $31,496 million in 2022, and Organic Net Revenue
increased $3,521 million (12.3%) to $32,163 million. Developed markets net revenues increased 3.9% and developed
markets Organic Net Revenue increased 7.0%. Emerging markets net revenues increased 20.3% and emerging
markets Organic Net Revenue increased 22.0%. The underlying changes in net revenues and Organic Net Revenue
are detailed below:
 2022
Change in net revenues (by percentage point)
Total change in net revenues 9.7 %
Removing the following items affecting comparability:
Unfavorable currency 6.6 pp
Impact of acquisitions (4.2)pp
Impact of divestiture 0.2 pp
Total change in Organic Net Revenue 12.3 %
Favorable volume/mix 2.7 pp
Higher net pricing 9.6 pp
 
(1)Please see the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section at the end of this item.
Net revenue increase of 9.7% was driven by our underlying Organic Net Revenue growth of 12.3% and the impact of
acquisitions, partially offset by unfavorable currency translation and the impact of divestitures. Overall, we continued to
see increased demand for our snack category products. Organic Net Revenue growth was driven by higher net pricing
and favorable volume/mix. Higher net pricing in all regions was due to the benefit of carryover pricing from 2021 as well
as the effects of input cost-driven pricing actions taken during 2022. Favorable volume/mix was driven by AMEA, Latin
America and North America, primarily due to strong volume gains across our snack category products, while
volume/mix was essentially flat in Europe. The November 1, 2022 acquisition of Ricolino added incremental net
revenues of $98 million (constant currency basis), the August 1, 2022 acquisition of Clif Bar added incremental net
revenues of $361 million, the January 3, 2022 acquisition of Chipita added incremental net revenues of $720 million
(constant currency basis), the April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food added incremental net revenues of $15 million
(constant currency basis) and the March 25, 2021 acquisition of Grenade added incremental net revenues of $22
million (constant currency basis). Unfavorable currency impacts decreased net revenues by $1,905 million, primarily
due to the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to most currencies, including the euro, British pound sterling, Argentinean
peso, Turkish lira, Australian dollar, Indian rupee, Polish zloty, Chinese yuan and Swedish krona, partially offset by the
strength of a few currencies relative to the U.S. dollar, primarily the Russian ruble, Brazilian real and Mexican peso.
The impact of divestitures resulted in a year-over-year reduction in net revenues of $56 million. Refer to Note 2,
Acquisitions and Divestitures, for more information.(1)
36
Table of Contents
Operating Income – Operating income decreased $1,119 million (24.0%) to $3,534 million in 2022, Adjusted Operating
Income  increased $264 million (5.5%) to $5,029 million and Adjusted Operating Income on a constant currency basis
increased $583 million (12.2%) to $5,348 million due to the following:
Operating
Income Change
 (in millions)  
Operating Income for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 4,653 
Simplify to Grow Program 319 
Intangible asset impairment charges 32 
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives (279)
Acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments (40)
Acquisition-related costs 25 
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures (8)
Divestiture-related costs 22 
Operating income from divestiture (15)
Remeasurement of net monetary position 13 
Impact from pension participation changes 48 
Impact from resolution of tax matters (5)
Adjusted Operating Income  for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 4,765 
Higher net pricing 2,754 
Higher input costs (1,931)
Favorable volume/mix 218 
Higher selling, general and administrative expenses (474)
Lower amortization of intangible assets 8 
Impact from acquisitions 56 
Fixed asset and other impairment charges (48)
Total change in Adjusted Operating Income (constant currency) 583 12.2 %
        Unfavorable currency translation (319)
Total change in Adjusted Operating Income 264 5.5 %
Adjusted Operating Income  for the Year Ended December 31, 2022 $ 5,029 
Simplify to Grow Program (122)
Intangible asset impairment charges (101)
Mark-to-market losses from derivatives (326)
Acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments (136)
Inventory step-up (25)
Acquisition-related costs (330)
Divestiture-related costs (18)
Operating income from divestiture 4 
2017 Malware incident net recoveries 37 
European Commission legal matter (318)
Incremental costs due to war in Ukraine (121)
Remeasurement of net monetary position (40)
Impact from pension participation changes 1 
Operating Income for the Year Ended December 31, 2022 $ 3,534 (24.0)%
(1)Refer to the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section at the end of this item.
(2)Refer to Note 8, Restructuring Program, for more information.
(3)Refer to Note 6, Goodwill and Intangible Assets, for more information.
(4)Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments, Note 18, Segment Reporting, and Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this item for more
information on the unrealized gains/losses on commodity and forecasted currency transaction derivatives.
(5)Refer to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, for more information on the November 1, 2022 acquisition of Ricolino, August 1, 2022 acquisition
of Clif Bar, January 3, 2022 acquisition of Chipita, April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food, March 25, 2021 acquisition of a(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
(1)
(5)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(8)
(9)
(6)
(7)
37
Table of Contents
majority interest in Grenade, January 4, 2021 acquisition of the remaining 93% of equity in Hu and April 1, 2020 acquisition of a significant
majority interest in Give & Go.
(6)Refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting, for information on our
application of highly inflationary accounting for Argentina and Türkiye.
(7)Refer to Note 11, Benefit Plans, for more information.
(8)Refer to Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies – Tax Matters, for more information.
(9)Refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – War in Ukraine, for more information.
During 2022, we realized higher net pricing and favorable volume/mix, which was largely offset by increased input
costs. Higher net pricing, which included the carryover impact of pricing actions taken in 2021 as well as the effects of
input cost-driven pricing actions taken during 2022, was reflected in all regions. Overall, volume/mix benefited from
strong volume growth due to continued increased demand for our snack category products. Favorable volume/mix was
driven by AMEA and Latin America, which was slightly offset by unfavorable volume/mix in North America and Europe.
The increase in input costs was driven by higher raw material costs as well as higher manufacturing costs. Higher raw
material costs were in part due to higher dairy, packaging, edible oils, energy, grains, sugar, nuts and other ingredients
costs as well as unfavorable year-over-year currency exchange transaction costs on imported materials, partially offset
by lower cocoa costs.
Total selling, general and administrative expenses increased $1,121 million from 2021, due to a number of factors
noted in the table above, including in part, the impact from the European Commission legal matter, the impact of
acquisitions, higher acquisition-related costs, higher acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration
adjustments, higher remeasurement loss of net monetary position, higher divestiture-related costs, incremental costs
due to the war in Ukraine and lapping the prior-year favorable impact from the resolution of a tax matter, which were
partially offset by a favorable currency impact related to expenses, lapping the prior-year unfavorable impact from
pension participation changes, incremental expenses associated with the 2017 malware incident net recoveries and
lower implementation costs incurred for the Simplify to Grow Program. Excluding these factors, selling, general and
administrative expenses increased $474 million from 2021. The increase was driven primarily by higher overheads, in
part due to increased investments in route-to-market capabilities, and higher advertising and consumer promotion
costs.
Unfavorable currency changes decreased operating income by $319 million primarily due to the strength of the U.S.
dollar relative to most currencies, including the euro, British pound sterling, Turkish lira, Australian dollar, Indian rupee,
Polish zloty, Egyptian pound and Chinese yuan, partially offset by the strength of a few currencies relative to the U.S.
dollar, including the Russian ruble and Brazilian real.
Operating income margin decreased from 16.2% in 2021 to 11.2% in 2022. The decrease in operating income margin
was driven primarily by the year-over-year unfavorable change in mark-to-market gains/(losses) from currency and
commodity hedging activities, the impact from the European Commission legal matter, higher acquisition-related costs,
higher acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments, lower Adjusted Operating Income
margin, incremental costs due to the war in Ukraine, higher intangible asset impairment charges, higher
remeasurement of net monetary position and inventory step-up charges incurred in 2022, partially offset by lower costs
for the Simplify to Grow Program, lapping the prior-year unfavorable impact from pension participation changes, lower
divestiture-related costs and the impact of 2017 malware incident net recoveries. Adjusted Operating Income margin
decreased from 16.6% in 2021 to 16.0% in 2022. The decrease was driven primarily by higher raw material costs,
unfavorable product mix and the impact of acquisitions, partially offset by higher net pricing and overhead cost
leverage.
38
Table of Contents
Net Earnings and Earnings per Share Attributable to Mondelēz International – Net earnings attributable to Mondelēz
International of $2,717 million decreased by $1,583 million (36.8%) in 2022. Diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz
International was $1.96 in 2022, down $1.08 (35.5%) from 2021. Adjusted EPS  was $2.95 in 2022, up $0.10 (3.5%)
from 2021. Adjusted EPS on a constant currency basis was $3.19 in 2022, up $0.34 (11.9%) from 2021.
 Diluted EPS
Diluted EPS Attributable to Mondelēz International for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 3.04 
Simplify to Grow Program 0.17 
Intangible asset impairment charges 0.02 
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives (0.17)
Acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments (0.02)
Acquisition-related costs 0.01 
Divestiture-related costs 0.01 
Net earnings from divestitures (0.03)
Remeasurement of net monetary position 0.01 
Impact from pension participation changes 0.02 
Loss on debt extinguishment 0.07 
Initial impacts from enacted tax law changes 0.07 
Gain on equity method investment transactions (0.39)
Equity method investee items 0.04 
Adjusted EPS  for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 2.85 
Increase in operations 0.29 
Decrease in equity method investment net earnings (0.01)
Impact from acquisitions 0.03 
Changes in interest and other expense, net (0.03)
Changes in shares outstanding 0.06 
Adjusted EPS (constant currency)  for the Year Ended December 31, 2022 $ 3.19 
        Unfavorable currency translation (0.24)
Adjusted EPS  for the Year Ended December 31, 2022 $ 2.95 
Simplify to Grow Program (0.07)
Intangible asset impairment charges (0.05)
Mark-to-market losses from derivatives (0.19)
Acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments (0.05)
Inventory step-up (0.01)
Acquisition-related costs (0.19)
Divestiture-related costs (0.01)
Net earnings from divestitures 0.01 
2017 Malware incident net recoveries 0.02 
European Commission legal matter (0.23)
Incremental costs due to war in Ukraine (0.09)
Remeasurement of net monetary position (0.03)
Impact from pension participation changes (0.01)
Loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses (0.07)
Initial impacts from enacted tax law changes (0.01)
Loss on equity method investment transactions (0.02)
Equity method investee items 0.01 
Diluted EPS Attributable to Mondelēz International for the Year Ended December 31, 2022 $ 1.96 
 
(1)Refer to the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section appearing later in this section.
(2)See the Operating Income table above and the related footnotes for more information. Within earnings per share, taxes related to the JDE
Peet's transaction are included in costs associated with the JDE Peet's transaction.(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2) (3)
(2)
(2)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(1)
(2)
(8)
(9)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2) (3)
 (2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
39
Table of Contents
(3)Divestitures include completed sales of businesses, partial or full sales of equity method investments and exits of major product lines upon
completion of a sale or licensing agreement. As we record our share of KDP and JDE Peet’s ongoing earnings on a one-quarter lag basis, we
reflected the impact of prior-quarter sales of KDP and JDE Peet’s shares within divested results as if the sales occurred at the beginning of all
periods presented.
(4)Refer to Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements, for more information on the loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses.
(5)Refer to Note 16, Income Taxes, for information on income taxes.
(6)Refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments, for more information on gains and losses on equity method investment transactions.
(7)Includes our proportionate share of significant operating and non-operating items recorded by our JDE Peet's and KDP equity method
investees, such as acquisition and divestiture-related costs and restructuring program costs.
(8)Excludes the currency impact on interest expense related to our non-U.S. dollar-denominated debt which is included in currency translation.
(9)Refer to Note 12, Stock Plans, for more information on our equity compensation programs and share repurchase program and Note 17,
Earnings per Share, for earnings per share weighted-average share information.
40
Table of Contents
2021 compared with 2020
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2021 2020 $ change % change
 (in millions, except per share data)  
Net revenues $ 28,720 $ 26,581 $ 2,139 8.0 %
Operating income 4,653 3,853 800 20.8 %
Earnings from continuing operations 4,314 3,569 745 20.9 %
Net earnings attributable to
   Mondelēz International 4,300 3,555 745 21.0 %
Diluted earnings per share attributable to
   Mondelēz International 3.04 2.47 0.57 23.1 %
Net Revenues – Net revenues increased $2,139 million (8.0%) to $28,720 million in 2021, and Organic Net Revenue
increased $1,367 million (5.1%) to $27,916 million. Developed markets net revenues increased 6.3% and developed
markets Organic Net Revenue increased 1.6%. Emerging markets net revenues increased 11.4% and emerging
markets Organic Net Revenue increased 12.0%. The underlying changes in net revenues and Organic Net Revenue
are detailed below:
 2021
Change in net revenues (by percentage point)
Total change in net revenues 8.0 %
Removing the following items affecting comparability:
Favorable currency (1.8)pp
Impact of divestitures (0.1)pp
Impact of acquisitions (1.0)pp
Total change in Organic Net Revenue 5.1 %
Higher net pricing 2.6 pp
Favorable volume/mix 2.5 pp
 
(1)Please see the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section at the end of this item.
Net revenue increase of 8.0% was driven by our underlying Organic Net Revenue growth of 5.1%, favorable currency,
the impact of acquisitions and the partial year contributions of businesses divested in 2022 and a business divested on
November 1, 2021 which had been part of an earlier 2021 acquisition. Overall, we continued to see increased demand
for our snack category products, though parts of our business were not yet back to pre-pandemic levels. In developed
markets, increased food purchases for in-home consumption continued to drive net revenue growth, partially offset by
declines in some markets as they lapped strong volume growth in 2020 resulting from increased consumer demand
due to the pandemic. In emerging markets, we lapped the negative initial impacts we experienced from the pandemic in
2020, with strong revenue growth in 2021 across most of our key markets, though some markets remained challenged.
In addition, sales of our gum and candy products grew as out-of-home consumption continued to recover, as did our
world travel business as global travel improved, though still below pre-pandemic levels. Favorable currency translation
and incremental net revenues from acquisitions also added to revenue growth in 2021.
Organic Net Revenue growth was driven by favorable volume/mix and higher net pricing. Favorable volume/mix in
Europe, AMEA and Latin America was primarily driven by strong volume gains as we lapped the significant negative
impacts of the pandemic in many of our key markets. This was partially offset by unfavorable volume/mix in North
America as the region lapped very strong prior-year volume growth from significant food purchases for in-home
consumption due to the pandemic. Higher net pricing in all regions was due to the benefit of carryover pricing from
2020 as well as the effects of input cost-driven pricing actions taken during 2021. Favorable currency impacts
increased net revenues by $472 million, primarily due to the strength of several currencies relative to the U.S. dollar,
including the euro, British pound sterling, Chinese yuan, Australian dollar, Canadian dollar, South African rand and
Mexican peso, partially offset by the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to several currencies, including the Argentinean
peso, Brazilian real and Turkish lira. The April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food added incremental net revenues of
$47 million (constant currency basis), the March 25, 2021 acquisition of Grenade added(1)
41
Table of Contents
incremental net revenues of $63 million (constant currency basis), the January 4, 2021 acquisition of Hu added
incremental net revenues of $38 million and the April 1, 2020 acquisition of Give & Go added incremental net revenues
of $106 million in 2021. The packaged seafood business, which was part of our April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet
Food but divested on November 1, 2021, added incremental net revenues of $35 million prior to its divestiture. In
addition, businesses divested in 2022 and 2021 added incremental revenues of $46 million in 2021. Refer to Note 2,
Acquisitions and Divestitures, for more information.
Operating Income – Operating income increased $800 million (20.8%) to $4,653 million in 2021, Adjusted Operating
Income  increased $366 million (8.3%) to $4,765 million and Adjusted Operating Income on a constant currency basis
increased $246 million (5.6%) to $4,645 million due to the following:
Operating
Income Change
 (in millions)  
Operating Income for the Year Ended December 31, 2020 $ 3,853 
Simplify to Grow Program 360 
Intangible asset impairment charges 144 
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives (16)
Acquisition integration costs 4 
Acquisition-related costs 15 
Divestiture-related costs 4 
Operating income from divestiture (2)
Costs associated with JDE Peet's transaction 48 
Remeasurement of net monetary position 9 
Impact from resolution of tax matters (20)
Adjusted Operating Income  for the Year Ended December 31, 2020 $ 4,399 
Higher net pricing 678 
Higher input costs (475)
Favorable volume/mix 99 
Higher selling, general and administrative expenses (134)
Lower amortization of intangible assets 80 
Other (2)
Total change in Adjusted Operating Income (constant currency) 246 5.6 %
        Favorable currency translation 120 
Total change in Adjusted Operating Income 366 8.3 %
Adjusted Operating Income  for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 4,765 
Simplify to Grow Program (319)
Intangible asset impairment charges (32)
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives 279 
Acquisition integration costs 40 
Acquisition-related costs (25)
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures 8 
Divestiture-related costs (22)
Operating income from divestiture 15 
Remeasurement of net monetary position (13)
Impact from pension participation changes (48)
Impact from resolution of tax matters 5 
Operating Income for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 4,653 20.8 %
(1)Refer to the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section at the end of this item.
(2)Refer to Note 8, Restructuring Program, for more information.
(3)Refer to Note 6, Goodwill and Intangible Assets, for more information.
(4)Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments, Note 18, Segment Reporting, and Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this item for more
information on the unrealized gains/losses on commodity and forecasted currency transaction derivatives.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(7)
(9)
(8)
42
Table of Contents
(5)Refer to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, for more information on the April 1, 2020 acquisition of a significant majority interest in Give & Go,
the July 16, 2019 acquisition of a majority interest in Perfect Snacks and the May 28, 2019 divestiture of most of our cheese business in the
Middle East and Africa.
(6)Refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments, for more information on the JDE Peet's transaction.
(7)Refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting, for information on our
application of highly inflationary accounting for Argentina.
(8)Refer to Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies – Tax Matters, for more information.
(9)Refer to Note 11, Benefit Plans, for more information.
During 2021, we realized higher net pricing and favorable volume/mix, which was largely offset by increased input
costs. Higher net pricing, which included the carryover impact of pricing actions taken in 2020 as well as the effects of
input cost-driven pricing actions taken during 2021, was reflected in all regions. Favorable volume/mix was driven by
Europe, AMEA and Latin America, which was partially offset by unfavorable volume/mix in North America. Overall,
volume/mix benefited from volume gains as we lapped the significant negative impacts of the pandemic in many of our
key markets, while in North America, we lapped high volume growth in 2020 from significant food purchases for in-
home consumption due to the pandemic. The increase in input costs was driven by higher raw material costs, partially
offset by lower manufacturing costs driven by productivity and lower year-over-year incremental COVID-19 related
costs. Higher raw material costs were in part due to higher foreign currency transaction costs on imported materials, as
well as increased costs for edible oils, packaging, sugar, cocoa, grains, dairy and other ingredients.
Total selling, general and administrative expenses increased $165 million from 2020, due to a number of factors noted
in the table above, including in part, an unfavorable currency impact related to expenses, incremental expenses from
acquisitions, the impact from pension participation changes, lower benefits from the resolution of tax matters and higher
acquisition-related costs, which were partially offset by lower implementation costs incurred for the Simplify to Grow
Program, lapping prior-year costs associated with the JDE Peet's transaction and a net benefit from acquisition
integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments. Excluding these factors, selling, general and administrative
expenses increased $134 million from 2020. The increase was driven primarily by higher advertising and consumer
promotion costs, partially offset by lower overhead spending including lower year-over-year incremental COVID-19
related costs.
Favorable currency changes increased operating income by $120 million, primarily due to the strength of several
currencies relative to the U.S. dollar, including the British pound sterling, euro, Chinese yuan. Australian dollar and
Canadian dollar, partially offset by the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to several currencies, including the
Argentinean peso, Brazilian real and Turkish lira.
Operating income margin increased from 14.5% in 2020 to 16.2% in 2021. The increase in operating income margin
was driven primarily by the favorable year-over-year change in mark-to-market gains/(losses) from currency and
commodity hedging activities, lower intangible asset impairment charges, lower Simplify to Grow program costs, a net
benefit from acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments and lapping prior-year costs
associated with the JDE Peet's transaction, partially offset by the impact from pension participation changes, higher
divestiture-related costs and higher acquisition-related costs. Adjusted Operating Income margin for 2021 was flat to
2020 at 16.6%. Adjusted Operating Income margin was unchanged as higher net pricing, lower manufacturing costs
due to productivity and lower year-over-year incremental COVID-19 costs, and lower selling, general and administrative
costs were offset by higher raw material costs, unfavorable product mix and higher advertising and consumer
promotion costs.
43
Table of Contents
Net Earnings and Earnings per Share Attributable to Mondelēz International – Net earnings attributable to Mondelēz
International of $4,300 million increased by $745 million (21.0%) in 2021. Diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz
International was $3.04 in 2021, up $0.57 (23.1%) from 2020. Adjusted EPS  was $2.85 in 2021, up $0.31 (12.2%)
from 2020. Adjusted EPS on a constant currency basis was $2.76 in 2021, up $0.22 (8.7%) from 2020.
 Diluted EPS
Diluted EPS Attributable to Mondelēz International for the Year Ended December 31, 2020 $ 2.47 
Simplify to Grow Program 0.20 
Intangible asset impairment charges 0.08 
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives (0.01)
Acquisition-related costs 0.01 
Net earnings from divestitures (0.08)
Costs associated with JDE Peet's transaction 0.20 
Remeasurement of net monetary position 0.01 
Impact from pension participation changes 0.01 
Impact from resolution of tax matters (0.02)
Loss related to interest rate swaps 0.05 
Loss on debt extinguishment 0.10 
Initial impacts of enacted tax law changes 0.02 
Gain on equity method investment transaction (0.55)
Equity method investee items 0.05 
Adjusted EPS  for the Year Ended December 31, 2020 $ 2.54 
Increase in operations 0.13 
Increase in equity method investment net earnings 0.03 
Changes in interest and other expense, net 0.02 
Changes in income taxes (0.01)
Changes in shares outstanding 0.05 
Adjusted EPS (constant currency)  for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 2.76 
        Favorable currency translation 0.09 
Adjusted EPS  for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 2.85 
Simplify to Grow Program (0.17)
Intangible asset impairment charges (0.02)
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives 0.17 
Acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments 0.02 
Acquisition-related costs (0.01)
Divestiture-related costs (0.01)
Net earnings from divestitures 0.03 
Remeasurement of net monetary position (0.01)
Impact from pension participation changes (0.02)
Loss on debt extinguishment (0.07)
Initial impacts of enacted tax law changes (0.07)
Gain on equity method investment transactions 0.39 
Equity method investee items (0.04)
Diluted EPS Attributable to Mondelēz International for the Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 3.04 
(1)Refer to the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section appearing later in this section.
(2)See the Operating Income table above and the related footnotes for more information. Within earnings per share, taxes related to the JDE
Peet's transaction are included in costs associated with the JDE Peet's transaction.
(3)Divestitures include completed sales of businesses, partial or full sales of equity method investments and exits of major product lines upon
completion of a sale or licensing agreement. As we record our share of KDP and JDE Peet’s ongoing earnings on a one-quarter lag basis, we
reflected the impact of prior-quarter sales of KDP and JDE Peet’s shares within divested results as if the sales occurred at the beginning of all
periods presented.(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2) (3)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
(1)
 (9)
(6)
(10)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2) (3)
(2)
(2)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
44
Table of Contents
(4)Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments, for information on interest rate swaps no longer designated as cash flow hedges.
(5)Refer to Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements, for more information on losses on debt extinguishment.
(6)Refer to Note 16, Income Taxes, for information on income taxes.
(7)Refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments, for more information on gains and losses on equity method investment transactions.
(8)Includes our proportionate share of significant operating and non-operating items recorded by our JDE Peet's and KDP equity method
investees, such as acquisition and divestiture-related costs and restructuring program costs.
(9)Excludes the currency impact on interest expense related to our non-U.S. dollar-denominated debt which is included in currency translation.
(10)Refer to Note 12, Stock Plans, for more information on our equity compensation programs and share repurchase program and Note 17,
Earnings per Share, for earnings per share weighted-average share information.
45
Table of Contents
Results of Operations by Operating Segment
Our operations and management structure are organized into four operating segments:
•Latin America
•AMEA
•Europe
•North America
We manage our operations by region to leverage regional operating scale, manage different and changing business
environments more effectively and pursue growth opportunities as they arise across our key markets. Our regional
management teams have responsibility for the business, product categories and financial results in the regions.
We use segment operating income to evaluate segment performance and allocate resources. We believe it is
appropriate to disclose this measure to help investors analyze segment performance and trends. See Note 18,
Segment Reporting, for additional information on our segments and Items Affecting Comparability of Financial Results
earlier in this section for items affecting our segment operating results.
Our segment net revenues and earnings were:
 
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Net revenues:
Latin America $ 3,629 $ 2,797 $ 2,477 
AMEA 6,767 6,465 5,740 
Europe 11,420 11,156 10,207 
North America 9,680 8,302 8,157 
Net revenues $ 31,496 $ 28,720 $ 26,581 
 
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Earnings before income taxes:
Operating income:
Latin America $ 388 $ 261 $ 189 
AMEA 929 1,054 821 
Europe 1,481 2,092 1,775 
North America 1,769 1,371 1,587 
Unrealized gains/(losses) on hedging activities
(mark-to-market impacts) (326) 279 16 
General corporate expenses (245) (253) (326)
Amortization of intangible assets (132) (134) (194)
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures — 8 — 
Acquisition-related costs (330) (25) (15)
Operating income 3,534 4,653 3,853 
Benefit plan non-service income 117 163 138 
Interest and other expense, net (423) (447) (608)
Earnings before income taxes $ 3,228 $ 4,369 $ 3,383 
46
Table of Contents
Latin America
 
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2022 2021 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 3,629 $ 2,797 $ 832 29.7 %
Segment operating income 388 261 127 48.7 %
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2021 2020 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 2,797 $ 2,477 $ 320 12.9 %
Segment operating income 261 189 72 38.1 %
2022 compared with 2021:
Net revenues increased $832 million (29.7%), due to higher net pricing (23.7 pp), favorable volume/mix (8.2 pp) and
the impact of acquisitions (3.5 pp), partially offset by unfavorable currency (4.4 pp) and the impact of divestitures (1.3
pp). Higher net pricing was reflected across all categories, driven primarily by Argentina, Brazil and Mexico. Favorable
volume/mix reflected strong volume growth as the region continued to see increased demand for our snack category
products. Favorable volume/mix was driven by gains in gum, biscuits & baked snacks, chocolate, candy and cheese &
grocery, partially offset by a decline in refreshment beverages. The November 1, 2022 acquisition of Ricolino added
incremental net revenues of $98 million (constant currency basis) in 2022. Unfavorable currency impacts were primarily
due to the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to several currencies in the region, primarily the Argentinean peso,
partially offset by the strength of several currencies relative to the U.S. dollar, primarily the Brazilian real and Mexican
peso. The impact of divestitures resulted in a year-over-year decline in net revenues of $21 million.
Segment operating income increased $127 million (48.7%), primarily due to higher net pricing, favorable volume/mix,
lower manufacturing costs due to productivity, lower divestiture-related costs and lower costs incurred for the Simplify
to Grow Program. These favorable items were partially offset by higher raw material costs, higher other selling, general
and administrative expenses, higher advertising and consumer promotion costs, higher remeasurement loss on net
monetary position, acquisition integration costs incurred in 2022, the impact of divestitures, inventory step-up charges
incurred in 2022 and lapping a prior-year favorable impact from the resolution of a tax matter.
2021 compared with 2020:
Net revenues increased $320 million (12.9%), due to higher net pricing (13.7 pp), favorable volume/mix (6.1 pp) and
the impact of divestitures (0.3 pp), partially offset by unfavorable currency (7.2 pp). Higher net pricing was reflected
across all categories, driven primarily by Argentina, Brazil and Mexico. Favorable volume/mix reflected strong volume
growth as the negative impacts from the pandemic that we experienced in the prior year subsided across the region.
Favorable volume/mix was driven by gains in chocolate, biscuits & baked snacks, gum and candy, partially offset by
declines in refreshment beverages and cheese & grocery. In addition, businesses divested in 2022 added incremental
revenues of $11 million in 2021. Unfavorable currency impacts were primarily due to the strength of the U.S. dollar
relative to most currencies in the region including the Argentinean peso and Brazilian real.
Segment operating income increased $72 million (38.1%), primarily due to higher net pricing, lower manufacturing
costs (productivity and lower incremental COVID-19 related costs), lower costs incurred for the Simplify to Grow
Program and favorable volume/mix. These favorable items were partially offset by higher raw material costs, higher
advertising and consumer promotion costs, divestiture-related costs incurred in 2021, unfavorable currency, higher
other selling, general and administrative expenses and lower benefits from the resolution of tax matters.
47
Table of Contents
AMEA
 
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2022 2021 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 6,767 $ 6,465 $ 302 4.7 %
Segment operating income 929 1,054 (125) (11.9)%
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2021 2020 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 6,465 $ 5,740 $ 725 12.6 %
Segment operating income 1,054 821 233 28.4 %
2022 compared with 2021:
Net revenues increased $302 million (4.7%), due to favorable volume/mix (7.4 pp), higher net pricing (5.1 pp) and the
impact of an acquisition (0.3 pp), partially offset by unfavorable currency (7.6 pp) and the impact of a divestiture (0.5
pp). Favorable volume/mix reflected overall volume gains from increased demand for our snack category products.
Favorable volume/mix was driven by gains in biscuits & baked snacks, chocolate, refreshment beverages and candy,
partially offset by declines in gum and cheese & grocery. Higher net pricing was reflected across all categories. The
April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food added incremental net revenues of $15 million (constant currency basis) in
the first quarter of 2022. Unfavorable currency impacts were due to the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to most
currencies in the region, including the Australian dollar, Indian rupee, Chinese yuan, Philippine peso, Egyptian pound,
South African Rand, and Japanese yen. The impact of the November 1, 2021 divestiture of the packaged seafood
business, which was part of our April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food, resulted in a year-over-year reduction in net
revenues of $35 million.
Segment operating income decreased $125 million (11.9%), primarily due to higher raw material costs, intangible asset
impairment charges incurred in 2022, unfavorable currency, higher advertising and consumer promotion costs, higher
other selling, general and administrative expenses, higher costs incurred for the Simplify to Grow Program, higher fixed
asset impairment charges and the impact of a divestiture. These unfavorable items were partially offset by higher net
pricing, favorable volume/mix and lower manufacturing costs driven by productivity.
2021 compared with 2020:
Net revenues increased $725 million (12.6%), due to favorable volume/mix (5.3 pp), favorable currency (3.8 pp), higher
net pricing (2.0 pp), the impact of an acquisition (0.9 pp) and the partial year contribution of a business divested on
November 1, 2021 which had been part of an earlier 2021 acquisition (0.6 pp). Favorable volume/mix reflected net
overall volume gains as the negative impacts from the pandemic that we experienced in the prior year subsided across
most of the region, though some markets were still challenged. Favorable volume/mix was driven by gains in chocolate,
biscuits & baked snacks, gum and candy, partially offset by declines in cheese & grocery and refreshment beverages.
Favorable currency impacts were due to the strength of most currencies relative to the U.S. dollar, including the
Chinese yuan, Australian dollar, South African rand and New Zealand dollar. Higher net pricing was reflected across all
categories except cheese & grocery. The April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food added incremental net revenues of
$47 million (constant currency basis) in 2021. The packaged seafood business, which was part of our April 1, 2021
acquisition of Gourmet Food but divested on November 1, 2021, added incremental net revenues of $35 million prior to
its divestiture.
Segment operating income increased $233 million (28.4%), primarily due to lower manufacturing costs (productivity
and lower incremental COVID-19 related costs), higher net pricing, favorable volume/mix, lower costs incurred for the
Simplify to Grow Program, favorable currency, the impact of an acquisition, lapping prior-year intangible asset
impairment charges and the partial year contribution of a business divested which had been part of an earlier 2021
acquisition. These favorable items were partially offset by higher raw material costs, higher advertising and consumer
promotion costs and higher other selling, general and administrative expenses.
48
Table of Contents
Europe
 
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2022 2021 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 11,420 $ 11,156 $ 264 2.4 %
Segment operating income 1,481 2,092 (611) (29.2)%
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2021 2020 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 11,156 $ 10,207 $ 949 9.3 %
Segment operating income 2,092 1,775 317 17.9 %
2022 compared with 2021:
Net revenues increased $264 million (2.4%), due to higher net pricing (7.4 pp), the impact of acquisitions (6.3 pp), and
flat volume/mix, partially offset by unfavorable currency (11.3 pp). Higher net pricing was reflected across all
categories. The January 3, 2022 acquisition of Chipita added incremental net revenues of $685 million (constant
currency basis) and the March 25, 2021 acquisition of Grenade added incremental net revenues of $22 million
(constant currency basis) in 2022. Overall, volume/mix was flat as gains in candy, gum, chocolate and refreshment
beverages, were offset by declines in biscuits & baked snacks and cheese & grocery. Unfavorable currency impacts
reflected the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to most currencies across the region, including the euro, British pound
sterling, Turkish lira, Polish zloty, Swedish krona and Romanian leu, partially offset by the strength of a few currencies
relative to the U.S. dollar, primarily the Russian ruble.
Segment operating income decreased $611 million (29.2%), primarily due to higher raw material costs, the impact from
the European Commission legal matter, unfavorable currency, incremental costs incurred due to the war in Ukraine,
higher acquisition integration costs, higher other selling, general and administrative expenses, higher advertising and
consumer promotion costs and fixed asset impairment charges incurred in 2022. These unfavorable items were
partially offset by higher net pricing, lapping the prior-year unfavorable impact of pension participation changes and the
impact of acquisitions.
2021 compared with 2020:
Net revenues increased $949 million (9.3%), due to favorable currency (3.7 pp), favorable volume/mix (3.6 pp), higher
net pricing (1.4 pp) and the impact of an acquisition (0.6 pp). Favorable currency impacts reflected the strength of most
currencies in the region relative to the U.S. dollar, including the euro, British pound sterling, Norwegian krone, Swedish
krona and Czech koruna, partially offset by the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to a few currencies, including the
Turkish lira and Russian ruble. Favorable volume/mix was driven by strong volume growth as we experienced
increased demand for most of our snack category products and our world travel business continued to recover as
global travel improved though still remained below pre-pandemic levels. Favorable volume/mix was driven by gains in
chocolate, biscuits & baked snacks, cheese & grocery, and refreshment beverages, partially offset by declines in gum
and candy. Higher net pricing was reflected across all categories except cheese & grocery. The March 25, 2021
acquisition of Grenade added incremental net revenues of $63 million (constant currency basis) in 2021.
Segment operating income increased $317 million (17.9%), primarily due to favorable volume/mix, higher net pricing,
lower Simplify to Grow Program costs, lower manufacturing costs (productivity and lower incremental COVID-19 related
costs), favorable currency, lapping prior-year intangible asset impairment charges, lower other selling, general and
administrative expenses and the impact of an acquisition. These favorable items were partially offset by higher raw
material costs, higher advertising and consumer promotion costs, the impact from pension participation changes and
acquisition integration costs incurred in 2021.
49
Table of Contents
North America
 
For the Years Ended
December 31,
 2022 2021 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 9,680 $ 8,302 $ 1,378 16.6 %
Segment operating income 1,769 1,371 398 29.0 %
 For the Years Ended
December 31,   
 2021 2020 $ change % change
 (in millions)  
Net revenues $ 8,302 $ 8,157 $ 145 1.8 %
Segment operating income 1,371 1,587 (216) (13.6)%
2022 compared with 2021:
Net revenues increased $1,378 million (16.6%), due to higher net pricing (11.5 pp), the impact of acquisitions (4.7 pp)
and favorable volume/mix (0.8 pp), partially offset by unfavorable currency (0.4 pp). Higher net pricing was reflected
across all categories driven by pricing actions taken during 2022. The August 1, 2022 acquisition of Clif Bar added
incremental net revenues of $361 million and the January 3, 2022 acquisition of Chipita added incremental net
revenues of $35 million in 2022. Favorable volume/mix was driven by gains in candy, chocolate and gum, partially
offset by a decline in biscuits & baked snacks which primarily reflected the impact of supply chain constraints on
volume during the year. Unfavorable currency impact was due to the strength of the U.S. dollar relative to the Canadian
dollar.
Segment operating income increased $398 million (29.0%), primarily due to higher net pricing, lower costs incurred for
the Simplify to Grow Program, lapping a prior-year intangible asset impairment charge and the impact of acquisitions.
These favorable items were partially offset by higher raw material costs, higher manufacturing costs, higher acquisition
integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments (including lapping a prior year benefit from contingent
consideration adjustments), higher advertising and consumer promotion costs, fixed asset impairment charges incurred
in 2022, inventory step-up charges incurred in 2022, higher other selling, general and administrative expenses,
unfavorable volume/mix and unfavorable currency.
2021 compared with 2020:
Net revenues increased $145 million (1.8%), due to the impact of acquisitions (1.8 pp), higher net pricing (1.0 pp) and
favorable currency (0.6 pp), partially offset by unfavorable volume/mix (1.6 pp). The April 1, 2020 acquisition of Give &
Go added incremental net revenues of $106 million and the January 4, 2021 acquisition of Hu added incremental net
revenues of $38 million in 2021. Higher net pricing was driven by biscuits & baked snacks, gum and candy, partially
offset by lower net pricing in chocolate. Favorable currency impact was due to the strength of the Canadian dollar
relative to the U.S. dollar. Unfavorable volume mix reflected volume declines as the region lapped prior-year strong
volume growth driven by significantly increased food purchases for in-home consumption due to the pandemic as well
as impacts from labor disruptions and supply chain constraints in the second half of 2021. Unfavorable volume/mix was
driven by declines in biscuits & baked snacks, candy, chocolate and gum.
Segment operating income decreased $216 million (13.6%), primarily due to unfavorable volume/mix, higher raw
material costs, higher Simplify to Grow Program costs and higher advertising and consumer promotion costs. These
unfavorable items were partially offset by higher net pricing, lower other selling, general and administrative expenses
(including lower COVID-19 related costs), a net benefit from acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration
adjustments, lower intangible asset impairment charges, lower manufacturing costs (lower incremental COVID-19
related costs and productivity) and favorable currency.
50
Table of Contents
Critical Accounting Estimates
We prepare our consolidated financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP. The preparation of these financial
statements requires the use of estimates, judgments and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and
liabilities at the date of the financial statements and reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the periods
presented. Actual results could differ from those estimates and assumptions. Note 1, Summary of Significant
Accounting Policies, to the consolidated financial statements includes a summary of the significant accounting policies
we used to prepare our consolidated financial statements. We have discussed the selection and disclosure of our
critical accounting policies and estimates with our Audit Committee. The following is a review of our most significant
assumptions and estimates.
Goodwill and Indefinite-Life Intangible Assets:
We test goodwill and indefinite-life intangible assets for impairment on an annual basis on July 1. We assess goodwill
impairment risk throughout the year by performing a qualitative review of entity-specific, industry, market and general
economic factors affecting our goodwill reporting units. We review our operating segment and reporting unit structure
for goodwill testing annually or as significant changes in the organization occur. Annually, we may perform qualitative
testing, or depending on factors such as prior-year test results, current year developments, current risk evaluations and
other practical considerations, we may elect to do quantitative testing instead. In our quantitative testing, we compare a
reporting unit’s estimated fair value with its carrying value. We estimate a reporting unit’s fair value using a discounted
cash flow method which incorporates planned growth rates, market-based discount rates and estimates of residual
value. This year, for our Europe and North America reporting units, we used a market-based, weighted-average cost of
capital of 6.8% to discount the projected cash flows of those operations. For our Latin America and AMEA reporting
units, we used a risk-rated discount rate of 9.8%. Estimating the fair value of individual reporting units requires us to
make assumptions and estimates regarding our future plans and industry and economic conditions based on available
information. Given the uncertainty of the global economic environment, those estimates could be significantly different
than future performance. If the carrying value of a reporting unit’s net assets exceeds its fair value, we would recognize
an impairment charge for the amount by which the carrying value exceeds the reporting unit's fair value.
In 2022, 2021 and 2020, there were no impairments of goodwill. In connection with our 2022 annual impairment testing,
each of our reporting units had sufficient fair value in excess of carrying value. While all reporting units passed our
annual impairment testing, if planned business performance expectations are not met or specific valuation factors
outside of our control, such as discount rates, change significantly, then the estimated fair values of a reporting unit or
reporting units might decline and lead to a goodwill impairment in the future.
Annually, we assess indefinite-life intangible assets for impairment by performing a qualitative review and assessing
events and circumstances that could affect the fair value or carrying value of these assets. If significant potential
impairment risk exists for a specific asset, we quantitatively test it for impairment by comparing its estimated fair value
with its carrying value. We utilize estimates of future sales, earnings growth rates, royalty rates and discount rates in
determining a brand’s global fair value. If the carrying value of the asset exceeds its estimated fair value, the asset is
impaired and its carrying value is reduced to the estimated fair value.
In 2022, we recorded $101 million of intangible asset impairment charges related to two biscuit brands in AMEA. The
impairment charges were calculated as the excess of the carrying value over the estimated fair value of the intangible
assets on a global basis and were recorded within asset impairment and exit costs. We use several accepted valuation
methods, including Relief from Royalty, excess earnings and excess margin, that utilize estimates of future sales,
earnings growth rates, royalty rates and discount rates in determining a brand's global fair value. We also identified
eight brands with $1.5 billion of aggregate book value as of December 31, 2022 that each had a fair value in excess of
book value of 10% or less. We believe our current plans for each of these brands reduce the risk of impairment in
future periods, but if the brand earnings expectations are not met or specific valuation factors outside of our control,
such as discount rates, change significantly, then a brand or brands could become impaired in the future. In 2021, we
recorded a $32 million of intangible asset impairment charge related to one biscuit brand in North America. In 2020, we
recorded $144 million of intangible asset impairment charges related to gum, chocolate, biscuits and candy brands,
with $83 million in North America, $53 million in Europe, $5 million in AMEA and $3 million in Latin America.
Refer to Note 6, Goodwill and Intangible Assets, for additional information.
51
Table of Contents
Business Combinations:
The assets acquired and liabilities assumed upon the acquisition or consolidation of a business are recorded at fair
value, with the residual of the purchase price allocated to goodwill. We engage third-party valuation specialists to assist
management in determining the fair values of certain assets acquired and liabilities assumed. In determining fair value,
we utilized various forms of the income approach, depending on the asset being valued. Such valuations require
management to make significant judgments, estimates and assumptions, especially with respect to intangible assets.
Management makes estimates of fair value based upon the best information available at the date of acquisition. These
estimates are based upon historical experience and information obtained from the management of the acquired
company and are inherently uncertain. Critical estimates in valuing certain of the intangible assets include, but are not
limited to: expected future cash flows of the acquired business, discount and royalty rates and economic lives of
customer relationships, trade names and fixed assets. Unanticipated events and circumstances may occur, which may
affect the accuracy or validity of such assumptions or estimates.
Further, certain of our acquisitions may include earn-out provisions or other forms of contingent consideration. As of the
acquisition date, we record contingent consideration, as applicable, at the estimated fair value of expected future
payments associated with the earn-out. Any changes to the recorded fair value of contingent consideration will be
recognized as expenses or earnings in the period in which they occur. Such contingent consideration liabilities are
based on best estimates of future expected payment obligations, which are subject to change due to many factors
outside of our control. Changes to the estimate of expected future contingent consideration payments may occur, from
time to time, due to various reasons, including changing discount rates as well as actual results differing from estimates
and adjustments to the revenue or earnings assumptions used as the basis for the liability based on historical
experience.
Trade and Marketing Programs:
We promote our products with trade and sales incentives as well as marketing and advertising programs. These
programs include, but are not limited to, new product introduction fees, discounts, coupons, rebates and volume-based
incentives as well as cooperative advertising, in-store displays and consumer marketing promotions. Trade and sales
incentives are recorded as a reduction to revenues based on amounts estimated due to customers and consumers at
the end of a period. We base these estimates principally on historical utilization and redemption rates. For interim
reporting purposes, advertising and consumer promotion expenses are charged to operations as a percentage of
volume, based on estimated sales volume and estimated program spending. We do not defer costs on our year-end
consolidated balance sheets and all marketing and advertising costs are recorded as an expense in the year incurred.
Employee Benefit Plans:
We sponsor various employee benefit plans throughout the world. These include primarily pension plans and
postretirement healthcare benefits. For accounting purposes, we estimate the pension and postretirement healthcare
benefit obligations utilizing assumptions and estimates for discount rates; expected returns on plan assets; expected
compensation increases; employee-related factors such as turnover, retirement age and mortality; and health care cost
trends. We review our actuarial assumptions on an annual basis and make modifications to the assumptions based on
current rates and trends when appropriate. Our assumptions also reflect our historical experiences and management’s
best judgment regarding future expectations. These and other assumptions affect the annual expense and obligations
recognized for the underlying plans.
As permitted by U.S. GAAP, we generally amortize the effect of changes in the assumptions over future periods. The
cost or benefit of plan changes, such as increasing or decreasing benefits for prior employee service (prior service
cost), is deferred and included in expense on a straight-line basis over the average remaining service period of the
employees expected to receive benefits.
Since pension and postretirement liabilities are measured on a discounted basis, the discount rate significantly affects
our plan obligations and expenses. For plans that have assets held in trust, the expected return on plan assets
assumption affects our pension plan expenses. The assumptions for discount rates and expected rates of return and
our process for setting these assumptions are described in Note 11, Benefit Plans, to the consolidated financial
statements.
52
Table of Contents
While we do not anticipate further changes in the 2022 assumptions for our U.S. and non-U.S. pension and
postretirement health care plans, as a sensitivity measure, a fifty-basis point change in our discount rates or the
expected rate of return on plan assets would have the following effects, increase/(decrease), on our annual benefit plan
costs:
 As of December 31, 2022
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
Fifty-Basis-Point Fifty-Basis-Point
 Increase Decrease Increase Decrease
 (in millions)
Effect of change in discount rate on
   pension costs $ (4)$ 2 $ (12)$ 18 
Effect of change in expected rate of return on
   plan assets on pension costs (8) 8 (36) 36 
Effect of change in discount rate on
   postretirement health care costs — (1) — — 
See additional information on our employee benefit plans in Note 11, Benefit Plans.
Income Taxes:
As a global company, we calculate and provide for income taxes in each tax jurisdiction in which we operate. The
provision for income taxes includes the amounts payable or refundable for the current year, the effect of deferred taxes
and impacts from uncertain tax positions. Our provision for income taxes is significantly affected by shifts in the
geographic mix of our pre-tax earnings across tax jurisdictions, changes in tax laws and regulations, tax planning
opportunities available in each tax jurisdiction and the ultimate outcome of various tax audits.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are recognized for the expected future tax consequences of temporary differences
between the financial statement and tax bases of our assets and liabilities and for operating losses and tax credit
carryforwards. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates that will apply to taxable income
in the years in which those differences are expected to be recovered or settled. Valuation allowances are established
for deferred tax assets when it is more likely than not that a tax benefit will not be realized.
We believe our tax positions comply with applicable tax laws and that we have properly accounted for uncertain tax
positions. We recognize tax benefits in our financial statements from uncertain tax positions only if it is more likely than
not that the tax position will be sustained by the taxing authorities based on the technical merits of the position. The
amount we recognize is measured as the largest amount of benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of being
realized upon resolution. We evaluate uncertain tax positions on an ongoing basis and adjust the amount recognized in
light of changing facts and circumstances, such as the progress of a tax audit or expiration of a statute of limitations.
We believe the estimates and assumptions used to support our evaluation of uncertain tax positions are reasonable.
However, final determination of historical tax liabilities, whether by settlement with tax authorities, judicial or
administrative ruling or due to expiration of statutes of limitations, could be materially different from estimates reflected
on our consolidated balance sheets and historical income tax provisions. The outcome of these final determinations
could have a material effect on our provision for income taxes, net earnings or cash flows in the period in which the
determination is made.
See Note 16, Income Taxes, for additional information on our effective tax rate, current and deferred taxes, valuation
allowances and unrecognized tax benefits.
Contingencies:
See Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements.
New Accounting Guidance:
See Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies, to the consolidated financial statements for a discussion of
new accounting standards.
53
Table of Contents
Liquidity and Capital Resources
We believe that cash from operations, our revolving credit facilities, short-term borrowings and our authorized long-term
financing will continue to provide sufficient liquidity for our working capital needs, planned capital expenditures and
future payments of our contractual, tax and benefit plan obligations and payments for acquisitions, share repurchases
and quarterly dividends. We expect to continue to utilize our commercial paper program and international credit lines as
needed. We continually evaluate long-term debt issuances to meet our short- and longer-term funding requirements.
We also use intercompany loans with our international subsidiaries to improve financial flexibility. Our investments in
JDE Peet's and KDP also provide us additional flexibility. Overall, we do not expect negative effects to our funding
sources that would have a material effect on our liquidity, and we continue to monitor our operations in Europe and
related effects from the war in Ukraine. To date, we have been successful in generating cash and raising financing as
needed. However, if a serious economic or credit market crisis ensues or other adverse developments arise, it could
have a material adverse effect on our liquidity, results of operations and financial condition.
Our most significant ongoing short-term cash requirements relate primarily to funding operations (including
expenditures for raw materials, labor, manufacturing and distribution, trade and promotions, advertising and marketing,
tax liabilities, benefit plan obligations and lease expenses) as well as periodic expenditures for acquisitions,
shareholder returns (such as dividend payments and share repurchases), property, plant and equipment and any
significant one-time non-operating items.
Long-term cash requirements primarily relate to funding long-term debt repayments (refer to Note 9, Debt and
Borrowing Arrangements), our U.S. tax reform transition tax liability and deferred taxes (refer to Note 16, Income
Taxes), our long-term benefit plan obligations (refer to Note 11, Benefit Plans) and commodity-related purchase
commitments and derivative contracts (refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments).
We generally fund short- and long-term cash requirements with cash from operating activities as well as cash proceeds
from short- and long-term debt financing (refer to Debt below). We generally do not use equity to fund our ongoing
obligations.
For a full discussion related to the financial condition for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020, including a year-to-
year comparison between 2021 and 2020, see Part II, Item 7 - Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021.
Cash Flow:
We believe our ability to generate substantial cash from operating activities and readily access capital markets and
secure financing at competitive rates are key strengths and give us significant flexibility to meet our short and long-term
financial commitments. Our cash flow activity over the last three years is noted below:
2022 2021 2020
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 3,908 $ 4,141 $ 3,964 
Net cash (used in)/provided by investing activities $ (4,888)$ (26)$ 500 
Net cash used in financing activities $ (456)$ (4,069)$ (2,215)
Net Cash Provided by Operating Activities:
The decrease in net cash provided by operating activities in 2022 was primarily due to increased year-over-year
working capital requirements, as the increase in accounts receivable and inventories was offset by increases in other
liabilities. This is largely a result of business growth and acquisitions during the year.
Net Cash Used in/Provided by Investing Activities:
The increase in net cash used in investing activities was largely driven by higher cash payments for acquisitions,
including $1.4 billion cash consideration paid for the Chipita acquisition during January 2022, $2.6 billion cash
consideration paid for the Clif Bar acquisition during August 2022 and $1.3 billion cash consideration paid for the
Ricolino acquisition in November 2022 relative to $833 million paid in the prior-year to acquire Gourmet Food, Grenade
and Hu (refer to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures), as well as lower proceeds from sales of equity method
investments than in the prior-year period (refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments), partially offset by proceeds from
the settlement and replacement of net investment hedge derivative contracts.
54
Table of Contents
Capital expenditures were $906 million in 2022, $965 million in 2021 and $863 million in 2020. We continue to make
capital expenditures primarily to modernize manufacturing facilities and support new product and productivity initiatives.
We expect 2023 capital expenditures to be up to $1.2 billion, including capital expenditures in connection with our
Simplify to Grow Program and for funding our strategic priorities. We expect to continue to fund these expenditures with
cash from operations.
Net Cash Used in Financing Activities:
The decrease in net cash used in financing activities was primarily due to lower net debt repayments with higher
proceeds from borrowings in 2022 as we refinanced debt during the first quarter of 2022 with lower interest rate debt
and we lapped higher net long-term debt repayments in the prior-year.
Dividends:
We paid dividends of $1,985 million in 2022, $1,826 million in 2021 and $1,678 million in 2020. On July 26, 2022, the
Audit Committee, with authorization delegated from our Board of Directors, declared a quarterly cash dividend of
$0.385 per share of Class A Common Stock, an increase of 10 percent, which would be $1.54 per common share on an
annualized basis. The declaration of dividends is subject to the discretion of our Board of Directors and depends on
various factors, including our net earnings, financial condition, cash requirements, future prospects and other factors
that our Board of Directors deems relevant to its analysis and decision making.
For U.S. income tax purposes only, the Company has determined that 100% of the distributions paid to its shareholders
in 2022 are characterized as a qualified dividend paid from U.S. earnings and profits. See Note 13, Capital Stock, to the
consolidated financial statements and Item 5, Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities – Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities, for information on our share repurchase
program.
Supply Chain Financing
As part of our continued efforts to improve our working capital efficiency, we have worked with our suppliers over the
past several years to optimize our terms and conditions, which include the extension of payment terms. Our current
payment terms with a majority of our suppliers are from 30 to 180 days, which we deem to be commercially reasonable.
We also facilitate voluntary supply chain financing (“SCF”) programs through several participating financial institutions.
Under these programs, our suppliers, at their sole discretion, determine invoices that they want to sell to participating
financial institutions. Our suppliers’ voluntary inclusion of invoices in SCF programs has no bearing on our payment
terms or amounts due. Our responsibility is limited to making payments based upon the agreed-upon contractual terms.
No guarantees are provided by the Company or any of our subsidiaries under the SCF programs and we have no
economic interest in the suppliers’ decision to participate in the SCF programs. Amounts due to our suppliers that
elected to participate in the SCF program are included in accounts payable in our consolidated balance sheets. We
have confirmed with participating financial institutions that as of December 31, 2022, and December 31, 2021,
$2.4 billion and $2.5 billion, respectively, of our accounts payable to suppliers that participate in the SCF programs are
outstanding.
Guarantees:
As discussed in Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies, we enter into third-party guarantees primarily to cover the
long-term obligations of our vendors. As part of these transactions, we guarantee that third parties will make contractual
payments or achieve performance measures. At December 31, 2022, we had no material third-party guarantees
recorded on our consolidated balance sheets. Guarantees do not have, and we do not expect them to have, a material
effect on our liquidity.
Debt:
The nature and amount of our long-term and short-term debt and the proportionate amount of each varies as a result of
current and expected business requirements, market conditions and other factors. Due to seasonality, in the first and
second quarters of the year, our working capital requirements grow, increasing the need for short-term financing. The
second half of the year typically generates higher cash flows. As such, we may issue commercial paper or secure other
forms of financing throughout the year to meet short-term working capital or other financing needs.
55
Table of Contents
Refer to Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements, for a projection of long-term debt scheduled to mature (including
current maturities and finance leases) in future periods. In the next 12 months, we expect to repay approximately $0.3
billion of maturing long-term debt. We fund ongoing debt maturities and other long-term obligations using cash on hand
or we may refinance obligations with long-term debt or short-term financing (such as our commercial paper borrowings)
depending on financing available, timing considerations, flexibility to raise funding and the cost of financing.
At its July 2022 meeting, the Board of Directors approved a new $2 billion long-term financing authorization that
replaced the prior long-term financing authorization of $7 billion. As of December 31, 2022, $1.5 billion of the long-term
financing authorization remained available.
Our total debt was $22.9 billion at December 31, 2022 and $19.5 billion at December 31, 2021. Our debt-to-
capitalization ratio was 0.46 at December 31, 2022 and 0.41 at December 31, 2021. The weighted-average term of our
outstanding long-term debt was 8.2 years at December 31, 2022 and 9.5 years at December 31, 2021. Our average
daily commercial borrowings were $1.6 billion in 2022, $0.5 billion in 2021 and $2.3 billion in 2020. We had commercial
paper borrowings of $2.2 billion at December 31, 2022 and $0.2 billion at December 31, 2021. We expect to continue to
use cash or commercial paper to finance various short-term financing needs. As of December 31, 2022, we continued
to be in compliance with our debt covenants.
One of our subsidiaries, Mondelez International Holdings Netherlands B.V. (“MIHN”), has outstanding debt. Refer to
Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements. The operations held by MIHN generated approximately 72.4% (or $22.8
billion) of the $31.5 billion of consolidated net revenue during fiscal year 2022 and represented approximately 84.0%
(or $22.6 billion) of the $26.9 billion of net assets as of December 31, 2022.
Refer to Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements, for more information on our debt and debt covenants.
Commodity Trends
We regularly monitor worldwide supply, commodity cost and currency trends so we can cost-effectively secure
ingredients, packaging and fuel required for production. During 2022, the primary drivers of the increase in our
aggregate commodity costs were higher dairy, packaging, edible oils, energy, grains, sugar, nuts and other ingredient
costs as well as unfavorable year-over-year currency exchange transaction costs on imported materials, partially offset
by lower cocoa costs.
A number of external factors such as the current macroeconomic environment, including global inflation, effects of the
war in Ukraine, climate and weather conditions, commodity, transportation and labor market conditions, currency
fluctuations and the effects of governmental agricultural or other programs affect the cost and availability of raw
materials and agricultural materials used in our products. We address higher commodity costs and currency impacts
primarily through hedging, higher pricing and manufacturing and overhead cost control. We use hedging techniques to
limit the impact of fluctuations in the cost of our principal raw materials; however, we may not be able to fully hedge
against commodity cost changes, such as dairy, where there is a limited ability to hedge, and our hedging strategies
may not protect us from increases in specific raw material costs. Due to competitive or market conditions, planned
trade or promotional incentives, fluctuations in currency exchange rates or other factors, our pricing actions may also
lag commodity cost changes temporarily.
As a result of international supply chain, transportation and labor market disruptions and generally higher
commodity, transportation and labor costs, we expect price volatility and a higher aggregate cost environment to
continue. While the costs of our principal raw materials fluctuate, we believe there will continue to be an adequate
supply of the raw materials we use and that they will generally remain available.
56
Table of Contents
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
We use non-GAAP financial information and believe it is useful to investors as it provides additional information to
facilitate comparisons of historical operating results, identify trends in our underlying operating results and provide
additional insight and transparency on how we evaluate our business. We use non-GAAP financial measures to
budget, make operating and strategic decisions and evaluate our performance. We have detailed the non-GAAP
adjustments that we make in our non-GAAP definitions below. The adjustments generally fall within the following
categories: acquisition and divestiture activities, gains and losses on intangible asset sales and non-cash impairments,
major program restructuring activities, constant currency and related adjustments, major program financing and
hedging activities and other major items affecting comparability of operating results. We believe the non-GAAP
measures should always be considered along with the related U.S. GAAP financial measures. We have provided the
reconciliations between the GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures below, and we also discuss our underlying GAAP
results throughout our Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations in this
Form 10-K.
Our primary non-GAAP financial measures are listed below and reflect how we evaluate our current and prior-year
operating results. As new events or circumstances arise, these definitions could change. When our definitions change,
we provide the updated definitions and present the related non-GAAP historical results on a comparable basis .
•“Organic Net Revenue” is defined as net revenues excluding the impacts of acquisitions, divestitures and
currency rate fluctuations . We also evaluate Organic Net Revenue growth from emerging markets and
developed markets.
•Our emerging markets include our Latin America region in its entirety; the AMEA region, excluding
Australia, New Zealand and Japan; and the following countries from the Europe region: Russia, Ukraine,
Türkiye, Kazakhstan, Georgia, Poland, Czech Republic, Slovak Republic, Hungary, Bulgaria, Romania, the
Baltics and the East Adriatic countries.
•Our developed markets include the entire North America region, the Europe region excluding the countries
included in the emerging markets definition, and Australia, New Zealand and Japan from the AMEA region.
•“Adjusted Operating Income” is defined as operating income excluding the impacts of the Simplify to Grow
Program ; gains or losses (including non-cash impairment charges) on goodwill and intangible assets;
divestiture or acquisition gains or losses, divestiture-related costs, acquisition-related costs , and
acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments; inventory step-up charges ; the
operating results of divestitures; remeasurement of net monetary position; mark-to-market impacts from
commodity, forecasted currency and equity method investment transaction derivative contracts; impact from
resolution of tax matters; 2017 malware incident net recoveries; incremental costs due to the war in Ukraine
; impact from the European Commission legal matter ; impact from pension participation changes; and
costs associated with the JDE Peet's transaction. We also present “Adjusted Operating Income margin,” which
is subject to the same adjustments as Adjusted Operating Income. We also evaluate growth in our Adjusted
Operating Income on a constant currency basis.
•“Adjusted EPS” is defined as diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz International from continuing operations
excluding the impacts of the items listed in the Adjusted Operating Income definition as well as losses on debt
extinguishment and related expenses; gains or losses on interest rate swaps no longer designated as
accounting cash flow hedges due to changed financing and hedging plans, net earnings from divestitures;
initial impacts from enacted tax law changes ; and gains or losses on equity method investment transactions.
Similarly, within Adjusted EPS, our equity method investment net earnings exclude our proportionate share of
our investees’ significant operating and non-operating items . We also evaluate growth in our Adjusted EPS
on a constant currency basis .
(1)    When items no longer impact our current or future presentation of non-GAAP operating results, we remove these items from our non-
GAAP definitions. In the first quarter of 2022, we added to the non-GAAP definitions the exclusion of incremental costs due to the war
in Ukraine (refer to footnote (12) below), in the second quarter of 2022, we added to the non-GAAP definitions the exclusion of costs
incurred associated with our publicly-announced processes to sell businesses (refer to footnote (5) below) and in the third quarter of
2022, we added to the non-GAAP definitions the exclusion of inventory step-up charges associated with acquisitions (refer to footnote
(8) below). In the fourth quarter of 2022, we added to the non-GAAP definitions the exclusion of the impact from the European
Commission legal matter (refer to footnote (13) below).
(2)    Divestitures include completed sales of businesses (including the partial or full sale of an equity method investment) and exits of
major product lines upon completion of a sale or licensing agreement. As we record our share of KDP and JDE Peet’s ongoing
earnings on a one-quarter lag basis, any KDP or JDE Peet’s ownership reductions are reflected as divestitures within our non-GAAP
results the following quarter. During the third quarter of 2021, we began to exclude the impact of certain adjustments made(1)
(2) 
(3)
 (4)
 (2)  (5) (6)
 (7) (8)
 (2)  (9)
 (10)
 (11)
(12) (13)  (14)
 (3)
 (2)
(15)
(16)
(3)
57
Table of Contents
to our acquisition contingent consideration liabilities that were recorded at the date of acquisition. We made this adjustment to better
facilitate comparisons of our underlying operating performance across periods. See Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, and Note 7,
Equity Method Investments, for information on acquisitions and divestitures impacting the comparability of our results.
(3)    Constant currency operating results are calculated by dividing or multiplying, as appropriate, the current-period local currency
operating results by the currency exchange rates used to translate the financial statements in the comparable prior-year period to
determine what the current-period U.S. dollar operating results would have been if the currency exchange rate had not changed from
the comparable prior-year period.
(4)    Non-GAAP adjustments related to the Simplify to Grow Program reflect costs incurred that relate to the objectives of our program to
transform our supply chain network and organizational structure. Costs that do not meet the program objectives are not reflected in
the non-GAAP adjustments.
(5)    Divestiture-related costs, which includes costs incurred in relation to the preparation and completion of our divestitures as defined in
footnote (2), also includes costs incurred associated with our publicly-announced processes to sell businesses. We exclude these
items to better facilitate comparisons of our underlying operating performance across periods.
(6)    Acquisition-related costs, which includes transaction costs such as third party advisor, investment banking and legal fees, also
includes one-time compensation expense related to the buyout of non-vested ESOP shares and realized gains or losses from hedging
activities associated with acquisition funds. We exclude these items to better facilitate comparisons of our underlying operating
performance across periods.
(7)    Acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments include one-time costs related to the integration of acquisitions
as well as any adjustments made to the fair market value of contingent compensation liabilities that have been previously booked for
earn-outs related to acquisitions that do not relate to employee compensation expense. We exclude these items to better facilitate
comparisons of our underlying operating performance across periods.
(8)    In the third quarter of 2022, we began to exclude the one-time inventory step-up charges associated with acquired companies related
to the fair market valuation of the acquired inventory. We exclude this item to better facilitate comparisons of our underlying operating
performance across periods.
(9)    In connection with our applying highly inflationary accounting (refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies), for
Argentina (beginning in the third quarter of 2018) and Türkiye (beginning in the second quarter of 2022), we exclude the related
remeasurement gains or losses related to remeasuring net monetary assets or liabilities denominated in the local currency to the U.S.
dollar during the periods presented to be consistent with our prior accounting for these remeasurement gains/losses for Venezuela
when it was subject to highly inflationary accounting prior to deconsolidation in 2015.
(10)    We exclude unrealized gains and losses (mark-to-market impacts) from outstanding commodity and forecasted currency and equity
method investment transaction derivative from our non-GAAP earnings measures. The mark-to-market impacts of commodity and
forecasted currency transaction derivatives are excluded until such time that the related exposures impact our operating results. Since
we purchase commodity and forecasted currency transaction contracts to mitigate price volatility primarily for inventory requirements
in future periods, we make this adjustment to remove the volatility of these future inventory purchases on current operating results to
facilitate comparisons of our underlying operating performance across periods. We exclude equity method investment transaction
derivative contract settlements as they represent protection of value for future divestitures.
(11)    See Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies – Tax Matters, for additional information.
(12)    In February 2022, Russia began a military invasion of Ukraine and we stopped our production and closed our facilities in Ukraine.
We began to incur incremental costs directly related to the war including asset impairments, such as property and inventory losses,
higher expected allowances for uncollectible accounts receivable and committed compensation. We have isolated and exclude these
costs and related impacts from our operating results to facilitate evaluation and comparisons of our ongoing results. Incremental costs
related to increasing operations in other primarily European facilities are not included with these costs.
(13)    In the fourth quarter of 2022, we began to exclude the impact from the European Commission legal matter. In November 2019, the
European Commission informed us that it initiated an investigation into our alleged infringement of European Union competition law
through certain practices allegedly restricting cross-border trade within the European Economic Area. On January 28, 2021, the
European Commission announced it had taken the next procedural step in its investigation and opened formal proceedings. We have
been cooperating with the investigation and are currently engaged in discussions with the European Commission in an effort to reach
a negotiated, proportionate resolution to this matter. As of December 31. 2022, we recorded an estimate of the possible cost to
resolve this matter. Due to the unique nature of this matter, we believe it to be infrequent and unusual and therefore exclude it to
better facilitate comparisons of our underlying operating performance across periods. Refer to Note 14, Commitments and
Contingencies – Tax Matters, for additional information.
(14)    The impact from pension participation changes represents the charges incurred when employee groups are withdrawn from
multiemployer pension plans and other changes in employee group pension plan participation. We exclude these charges from our
non–GAAP results because those amounts do not reflect our ongoing pension obligations. See Note 11, Benefit Plans, for more
information on the multiemployer pension plan withdrawal.
(15)    We have excluded the initial impacts from enacted tax law changes. Initial impacts include items such as the remeasurement of
deferred tax balances and the transition tax from the 2017 U.S. tax reform. Previously, we only excluded the initial impacts from more
material tax reforms, specifically the impacts of the 2019 Swiss tax reform and 2017 U.S. tax reform. We exclude initial impacts from
enacted tax law changes from our Adjusted EPS as they do not reflect our ongoing tax obligations under the enacted tax law changes.
Refer to Note 16, Income Taxes, for more information.
(16)    We have excluded our proportionate share of our equity method investees’ significant operating and non-operating items such as
acquisition and divestiture related costs, restructuring program costs and initial impacts from enacted tax law changes, in order to
provide investors with a comparable view of our performance across periods. Although we have shareholder rights and board
representation commensurate with our ownership interests in our equity method investees and review the underlying operating results
and significant operating and non-operating items each reporting period, we do not have direct control over their operations or
resulting revenue and expenses. Our use of equity method investment net earnings on an adjusted basis is not intended to imply that
we have any such control. Our GAAP “diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz International from continuing operations” includes all of
the investees’ significant operating and non-operating items.
We believe that the presentation of these non-GAAP financial measures, when considered together with our U.S.
GAAP financial measures and the reconciliations to the corresponding U.S. GAAP financial measures, provides you
with a more complete understanding of the factors and trends affecting our business than could be obtained absent
58
Table of Contents
these disclosures. Because non-GAAP financial measures vary among companies, the non-GAAP financial measures
presented in this report may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies. Our use of these
non-GAAP financial measures is not meant to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for any U.S. GAAP financial
measures. A limitation of these non-GAAP financial measures is they exclude items detailed below that have an impact
on our U.S. GAAP reported results. The best way this limitation can be addressed is by evaluating our non-GAAP
financial measures in combination with our U.S. GAAP reported results and carefully evaluating the following tables
that reconcile U.S. GAAP reported figures to the non-GAAP financial measures in this Form 10-K.
Organic Net Revenue:
Applying the definition of “Organic Net Revenue”, the adjustments made to “net revenues” (the most comparable U.S.
GAAP financial measure) were to exclude the impact of currency, acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that Organic
Net Revenue reflects the underlying growth from the ongoing activities of our business and provides improved
comparability of results. We also evaluate our Organic Net Revenue growth from emerging markets and developed
markets, and these underlying measures are also reconciled to U.S. GAAP below.
 
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2022 For the Year Ended December 31, 2021
Emerging
MarketsDeveloped
Markets TotalEmerging
MarketsDeveloped
Markets Total
 (in millions) (in millions)
Net Revenue $ 12,184 $ 19,312 $ 31,496 $ 10,132 $ 18,588 $ 28,720 
Impact of currency 744 1,161 1,905 — — — 
Impact of acquisitions (596) (620) (1,216) — — — 
Impact of divestitures (22) — (22) (43) (35) (78)
Organic Net Revenue $ 12,310 $ 19,853 $ 32,163 $ 10,089 $ 18,553 $ 28,642 
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2021 For the Year Ended December 31, 2020
 Emerging
MarketsDeveloped
Markets TotalEmerging
MarketsDeveloped
Markets Total
 (in millions) (in millions)
Net Revenue $ 10,132 $ 18,588 $ 28,720 $ 9,097 $ 17,484 $ 26,581 
Impact of currency 64 (536) (472) — — — 
Impact of acquisitions — (254) (254) — — — 
Impact of divestitures (43) (35) (78) (32) — (32)
Organic Net Revenue $ 10,153 $ 17,763 $ 27,916 $ 9,065 $ 17,484 $ 26,549 
59
Table of Contents
Adjusted Operating Income:
Applying the definition of “Adjusted Operating Income”, the adjustments made to “operating income” (the most
comparable U.S. GAAP financial measure) were to exclude the impacts of the Simplify to Grow Program; intangible
asset impairment charges; mark-to-market impacts from commodity, forecasted currency and equity method investment
transaction derivative contracts; acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments; inventory step-
up charges; acquisition related costs; divestiture-related costs; operating income from divestitures; net gain on an
acquisition and divestitures; 2017 malware incident net recoveries; impact from the European Commission legal matter;
incremental costs due to the war in Ukraine; costs associated with JDE Peet's transaction; the remeasurement of net
monetary position; impact from pension participation changes; and impact from resolution of tax matters. We also
evaluate Adjusted Operating Income on a constant currency basis. We believe these measures provide improved
comparability of underlying operating results.
 
For the Years Ended
December 31,
 2022 2021 $ Change % Change
 (in millions)  
Operating Income $ 3,534 $ 4,653 $ (1,119) (24.0)%
Simplify to Grow Program 122 319 (197)
Intangible asset impairment charges 101 32 69 
Mark-to-market losses/(gains) from derivatives 326 (279) 605 
Acquisition integration costs and
   contingent consideration adjustments 136 (40) 176 
Inventory step-up 25 — 25 
Acquisition-related costs 330 25 305 
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures — (8) 8 
Divestiture-related costs 18 22 (4)
Operating income from divestiture (4) (15) 11 
2017 Malware incident net recoveries (37) — (37)
European Commission legal matter 318 — 318 
Incremental costs due to war in Ukraine 121 — 121 
Remeasurement of net monetary position 40 13 27 
Impact from pension participation changes (1) 48 (49)
Impact from resolution of tax matters — (5) 5 
Adjusted Operating Income $ 5,029 $ 4,765 $ 264 5.5 %
   Unfavorable currency translation 319 — 319 
Adjusted Operating Income (constant currency) $ 5,348 $ 4,765 $ 583 12.2 %(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
(5)
60
Table of Contents
For the Years Ended
December 31,
 2021 2020 $ Change % Change
 (in millions)  
Operating Income $ 4,653 $ 3,853 $ 800 20.8 %
Simplify to Grow Program 319 360 (41)
Intangible asset impairment charges 32 144 (112)
Mark-to-market gains from derivatives (279) (16) (263)
Acquisition integration costs (40) 4 (44)
Acquisition-related costs 25 15 10 
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures (8) — (8)
Divestiture-related costs 22 4 18 
Operating income from divestiture (15) (2) (13)
Costs associated with JDE Peet's transaction — 48 (48)
Remeasurement of net monetary position 13 9 4 
Impact from pension participation changes 48 — 48 
Impact from resolution of tax matters (5) (20) 15 
Adjusted Operating Income $ 4,765 $ 4,399 $ 366 8.3 %
   Favorable currency translation (120) — (120)
Adjusted Operating Income (constant currency) $ 4,645 $ 4,399 $ 246 5.6 %
 
(1)Refer to Note 8, Restructuring Program, for more information.
(2)Refer to Note 6, Goodwill and Intangible Assets, for more information.
(3)Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments, Note 18, Segment Reporting, and Non-GAAP Financial Measures section at the end of this item for
more information on the unrealized gains/losses on commodity, forecasted currency and equity method investment transaction derivatives.
(4)Refer to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, for more information on the November 1, 2022 acquisition of Ricolino, August 1, 2022 acquisition
of Clif Bar, January 3, 2022 acquisition of Chipita, April 1, 2021 acquisition of Gourmet Food, March 25, 2021 acquisition of a majority interest in
Grenade, January 4, 2021 acquisition of the remaining 93% of equity in Hu and April 1, 2020 acquisition of a significant majority interest in Give
& Go.
(5)Refer to Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies – Tax Matters, for more information.
(6)Refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – War in Ukraine, for more information.
(7)Refer to Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting, for information on our
application of highly inflationary accounting for Argentina.
(8)Refer to Note 11, Benefit Plans, for more information.
(9)Refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments, for more information on the JDE Peet's transaction.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(9)
(7)
(8)
(5)
61
Table of Contents
Adjusted EPS:
Applying the definition of “Adjusted EPS” , the adjustments made to “diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz
International” (the most comparable U.S. GAAP financial measure) were to exclude the impacts of the items listed in
the Adjusted Operating Income tables above as well as net earnings from divestitures; losses related to interest rate
swaps; losses on debt extinguishment and related expenses; initial impacts from enacted tax laws changes; gains or
losses on equity method investment transactions; and our proportionate share of significant operating and non-
operating items recorded by our JDE Peet's and KDP equity method investees. We also evaluate Adjusted EPS on a
constant currency basis. We believe Adjusted EPS provides improved comparability of underlying operating results.
For the Years Ended
December 31,
 2022 2021 $ Change % Change
Diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz International $ 1.96 $ 3.04 $ (1.08) (35.5)%
   Simplify to Grow Program 0.07 0.17 (0.10)
   Intangible asset impairment charges 0.05 0.02 0.03 
   Mark-to-market losses/(gains) from derivatives 0.19 (0.17) 0.36 
   Acquisition integration costs and
      contingent consideration adjustments 0.05 (0.02) 0.07 
Inventory step-up 0.01 — 0.01 
   Acquisition-related costs 0.19 0.01 0.18 
   Divestiture-related costs 0.01 0.01 — 
   Net earnings from divestitures (0.01) (0.03) 0.02 
2017 Malware incident net recoveries (0.02) — (0.02)
European Commission legal matter 0.23 — 0.23 
Incremental costs due to war in Ukraine 0.09 — 0.09 
   Remeasurement of net monetary position 0.03 0.01 0.02 
   Impact from pension participation changes 0.01 0.02 (0.01)
   Loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses 0.07 0.07 — 
   Initial impacts from enacted tax law changes 0.01 0.07 (0.06)
   Loss/(gain) on equity method investment transactions 0.02 (0.39) 0.41 
   Equity method investee items (0.01) 0.04 (0.05)
Adjusted EPS $ 2.95 $ 2.85 $ 0.10 3.5 %
   Unfavorable currency translation 0.24 — 0.24 
Adjusted EPS (constant currency) $ 3.19 $ 2.85 $ 0.34 11.9 %(1)
(2)
 (2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
 (2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
62
Table of Contents
For the Years Ended
December 31,
 2021 2020 $ Change % Change
Diluted EPS attributable to Mondelēz International $ 3.04 $ 2.47 $ 0.57 23.1 %
   Simplify to Grow Program 0.17 0.20 (0.03)
   Intangible asset impairment charges 0.02 0.08 (0.06)
   Mark-to-market gains from derivatives (0.17) (0.01) (0.16)
   Acquisition integration costs and
      contingent consideration adjustments (0.02) — (0.02)
   Acquisition-related costs 0.01 0.01 — 
   Divestiture-related costs 0.01 — 0.01 
   Net earnings from divestitures (0.03) (0.08) 0.05 
Costs associate with JDE Peet's transaction — 0.20 (0.20)
Remeasurement of net monetary position 0.01 0.01 — 
Impact from pension participation changes 0.02 0.01 0.01 
   Impact from resolution of tax matters — (0.02) 0.02 
   Loss related to interest rate swaps — 0.05 (0.05)
   Loss on debt extinguishment 0.07 0.10 (0.03)
   Initial impacts from enacted tax law changes 0.07 0.02 0.05 
   Gain on equity method investment transactions (0.39) (0.55) 0.16 
   Equity method investee items 0.04 0.05 (0.01)
Adjusted EPS $ 2.85 $ 2.54 $ 0.31 12.2 %
   Favorable currency translation (0.09) — (0.09)
Adjusted EPS (constant currency) $ 2.76 $ 2.54 $ 0.22 8.7 %
 
(1)     The tax expense/(benefit) of each of the pre-tax items excluded from our GAAP results was computed based on the facts and tax assumptions
associated with each item, and such impacts have also been excluded from Adjusted EPS.
•2022, taxes for the: Simplify to Grow Program were $(26) million, intangible asset impairment charge were $(25) million, mark-to-market
losses from derivatives were $(56) million, acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration adjustments were $(72) million,
inventory step-up charges were $(7) million, acquisition-related costs were $11 million, divestiture-related costs were $(9) million, net
earnings from divestitures were $1 million, 2017 malware incident net recoveries were $10 million, European Commission legal matter were
zero, incremental costs due to the war in Ukraine were $4 million, remeasurement of net monetary position were zero, impact from pension
participation changes were $(3) million, loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses were $(31) million, initial impacts from enacted tax
law changes were $17 million, loss on equity method investment transactions were $2 million and equity method investee items were $(5)
million.
•2021 taxes for the: Simplify to Grow Program were $(83) million, intangible asset impairment charges were $(8) million, mark-to-market gains
from derivatives were $44 million, acquisition-related costs were $(4) million, acquisition integration costs and contingent consideration
adjustments were $12 million, divestiture-related costs were $(8) million, net earnings from divestitures were $12 million, remeasurement of
net monetary position were zero, impact from pension participation changes were $(8) million, loss on debt extinguishment were $(34) million,
initial impacts from enacted tax law changes were $100 million, gain on equity method investment transactions were $184 million and equity
method investee items were $(4) million.
•2020 taxes for the: Simplify to Grow Program were $(81) million, intangible asset impairment charges were $(33) million, mark-to-market
gains from derivatives were $8 million, acquisition-related costs were zero, net earnings from divestitures were $26 million, costs associated
with the JDE Peet's transaction were $250 million, loss on remeasurement of net monetary position were zero, impact from pension
participation changes were $(2) million, impact from resolution of tax matters were $16 million, loss related to interest rate swaps were $(24)
million, loss on debt extinguishment were $(46) million, initial impacts from enacted tax law changes were $36 million, gains on equity method
investment transactions were $202 million and equity method investee items were $(4) million.
(2)     See the Adjusted Operating Income table above and the related footnotes for more information.
(3)     Refer to Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements, for more information on the loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses.
(4)     Refer to Note 16, Income Taxes, and the Non-GAAP Financial Measures section for more information.
(5)     Refer to Note 7, Equity Method Investments, for more information on the gains and losses on equity method investment transactions.
(6)     Includes our proportionate share of significant operating and non-operating items recorded by our JDE Peet's and KDP equity method
investees, such as acquisition and divestiture-related costs and restructuring program costs.
(7)    Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments, for information on our interest rate swaps that we no longer designate as cash flow hedges.(2)
 (2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
 (2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(7)
 (3)
 (4)
(5)
(6)
63
Table of Contents
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk.
As we operate globally, we are primarily exposed to currency exchange rate, commodity price and interest rate market
risks. We monitor and manage these exposures as part of our overall risk management program. Our risk management
program focuses on the unpredictability of financial markets and seeks to reduce the potentially adverse effects that the
volatility of these markets may have on our operating results.
We principally utilize derivative instruments to reduce significant, unanticipated earnings fluctuations that may arise
from volatility in currency exchange rates, commodity prices and interest rates. For additional information on our
derivative activity and the types of derivative instruments we use to hedge our currency exchange, commodity price
and interest rate exposures, see Note 10, Financial Instruments.
Many of our non-U.S. subsidiaries operate in functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar. Fluctuations in currency
exchange rates create volatility in our reported results as we translate the balance sheets, operating results and cash
flows of these subsidiaries into the U.S. dollar for consolidated reporting purposes. The translation of non-U.S. dollar
denominated balance sheets and statements of earnings of our subsidiaries into the U.S. dollar for consolidated
reporting generally results in a cumulative translation adjustment to other comprehensive income within equity. A
stronger U.S. dollar relative to other functional currencies adversely affects our consolidated earnings and net assets
while a weaker U.S. dollar benefits our consolidated earnings and net assets. While we hedge significant forecasted
currency exchange transactions as well as certain net assets of non-U.S. operations and other currency impacts, we
cannot fully predict or eliminate volatility arising from changes in currency exchange rates on our consolidated financial
results. See Consolidated Results of Operations and Results of Operations by Operating Segment under Discussion
and Analysis of Historical Results for currency exchange effects on our financial results. Throughout our discussion and
analysis of results, we isolate currency impacts and supplementally provide net revenues, operating income and diluted
earnings per share on a constant currency basis. For additional information on the impact of currency policies, recent
currency devaluations and highly inflationary accounting on our financial condition and results of operations, also see
Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies – Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting.
We also continually monitor the market for commodities that we use in our products. Input costs may fluctuate widely
due to international demand, weather conditions, government policy and regulation and the macroeconomic
environment. Refer to Recent Developments and Significant Items Affecting Comparability and Financial Outlook above
for updates on recent supply chain, transportation, labor and other disruptions that are increasing operating costs and
impacting our results. To manage input cost volatility and inflation, we enter into forward purchase agreements and
other derivative financial instruments. We also pursue productivity and cost saving measures and take pricing actions
when necessary to mitigate the impact of higher input costs on earnings.
We regularly evaluate our variable and fixed-rate debt as well as current and expected interest rates in the markets in
which we raise capital. Our primary exposures include movements in U.S. Treasury rates, corporate credit spreads,
commercial paper rates as well as limited debt tied to London Interbank Offered Rates (“LIBOR”). The last publication
date of LIBOR rates against various currencies by the Financial Conduct Authority in the United Kingdom was
December 31, 2021, with the publication of certain USD rates being phased out after June 30, 2023. We did not have a
significant impact to our financial position from the phase out of LIBOR, nor do we expect a significant impact from the
remaining phase out given our current mix of variable and fixed-rate debt. We periodically use interest rate swaps and
forward interest rate contracts to achieve a desired proportion of variable versus fixed rate debt based on current and
projected market conditions. For more information on our debt activity, see Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements.
See Note 10, Financial Instruments, for more information on our derivative activity.
Value at Risk:
We use a value at risk (“VAR”) computation to estimate: 1) the potential one-day loss in the fair value of our interest
rate-sensitive financial instruments; and 2) the potential one-day loss in pre-tax earnings of our currency and
commodity price-sensitive derivative financial instruments. The VAR analysis was done separately for our currency
exchange, fixed income and commodity risk portfolios as of each quarter end during the periods presented below. The
instruments included in the VAR computation were currency exchange forwards and options for currency exchange
risk, debt and swaps for interest rate risk, and commodity forwards, futures and options for commodity risk. Excluded
from the computation were anticipated transactions, currency trade payables and receivables, and net investments in
non-U.S. subsidiaries, which the above-mentioned instruments are intended to hedge.
64
Table of Contents
The VAR model assumes normal market conditions, a 95% confidence interval and a one-day holding period. A
parametric delta-gamma approximation technique was used to determine the expected return distribution in interest
rates, currencies and commodity prices for the purpose of calculating the fixed income, currency exchange and
commodity VAR, respectively. The parameters used for estimating the expected return distributions were determined by
observing interest rate, currency exchange and commodity price movements over the prior quarter for the calculation of
VAR amounts at December 31, 2022 and 2021, and over each of the four prior quarters for the calculation of average
VAR amounts during each year. The values of currency and commodity options do not change on a one-to-one basis
with the underlying currency or commodity and were valued accordingly in the VAR computation.
As of December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021, the estimated potential one-day loss in fair value of our interest
rate-sensitive instruments, primarily debt, and the estimated potential one-day loss in pre-tax earnings from our
currency and commodity instruments, as calculated in the VAR model, were: 
 Pre-Tax Earnings Impact Fair Value Impact
 At 12/31/22 Average High Low At 12/31/22 Average High Low
 (in millions)
Instruments sensitive to:
Interest rates $ 196 $ 201 $232 $169 
Foreign currency rates$ 20 $ 23 $ 30 $ 20 
Commodity prices 63 75 118 51 
 Pre-Tax Earnings Impact Fair Value Impact
 At 12/31/21 Average High Low At 12/31/21 Average High Low
 (in millions)
Instruments sensitive to:
Interest rates $ 135 $ 104 $135 $ 79 
Foreign currency rates$ 11 $ 11 $ 13 $ 9 
Commodity prices 52 41 61 24 
This VAR computation is a risk analysis tool designed to statistically estimate the maximum expected daily loss, under
the specified confidence interval and assuming normal market conditions, from adverse movements in interest rates,
currency exchange rates and commodity prices. The computation does not represent actual losses in fair value or
earnings we will incur, nor does it consider the effect of favorable changes in market rates. We cannot predict actual
future movements in market rates and do not present these VAR results to be indicative of future movements in market
rates or to be representative of any actual impact that future changes in market rates may have on our future financial
results.
65
Table of Contents
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Mondelēz International, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Mondelēz International, Inc. and its subsidiaries
(the “Company”) as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the related consolidated statements of earnings,
comprehensive earnings, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022,
including the related notes (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited
the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the
financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of its operations and its cash
flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022 in conformity with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America. Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material
respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective
internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial
reporting, included in the Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting appearing under Item
9A. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the
Company's internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with
the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with
respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of
the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used
and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated
financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of
internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating
the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits
provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
As described in the Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting, management has excluded
Chipita Global S.A. (“Chipita”), Clif Bar & Company (“Clif Bar”), and Ricolino from its assessment of internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2022 because they were acquired by the Company in purchase business
combinations during 2022. We have also excluded Chipita, Clif Bar, and Ricolino from our audit of internal control over
financial reporting. Chipita, Clif Bar, and Ricolino are wholly-owned subsidiaries whose total assets and total net
revenues excluded from management’s assessment and our audit of internal control over financial reporting collectively
represent 1.2% and 3.5%, respectively, of the related consolidated financial statement amounts as of and for the year
ended December 31, 2022.
66
Table of Contents
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on
the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated
financial statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate
to accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially
challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way
our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical
audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which
they relate.
Indefinite-Life Intangible Assets Annual Impairment Assessments for Certain Brand Names
As described in Notes 1 and 6 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company’s consolidated indefinite-life
intangible asset balance was $18.4 billion as of December 31, 2022, which consists principally of brand names. At least
annually management assesses indefinite-life intangible assets for impairment and if significant potential impairment
risk exists for a specific asset, management quantitatively tests the asset for impairment by comparing its estimated fair
value with its carrying value. Management estimates fair value using several accepted valuation methods, including
relief from royalty, excess earnings and excess margin, that utilize estimates of future sales, earnings growth rates,
royalty rates and discount rates to determine a brand name’s fair value.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the indefinite-life intangible
assets annual impairment assessments for certain brand names is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment
by management when developing the fair value of the indefinite-life intangible assets for certain brand names; (ii) a
high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures and evaluating management’s
significant assumptions related to estimates of future sales, earnings growth rates, royalty rates, and discount rates for
certain brand names; and (iii) the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our
overall opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of
controls relating to the indefinite-life intangible assets impairment assessments, including controls over the annual
valuation of certain brand names. These procedures also included, among others (i) testing management’s process for
developing the fair value of the indefinite-life intangible assets for certain brand names; (ii) evaluating the
appropriateness of the valuation methods; (iii) testing the completeness and accuracy of underlying data used in the
valuation methods; and (iv) evaluating the reasonableness of the significant assumptions used by management related
to estimates of future sales, earnings growth rates, royalty rates, and discount rates. Evaluating management’s
significant assumptions related to estimates of future sales and earnings growth rates involved evaluating whether the
assumptions used by management were reasonable considering (i) the current and past performance of the certain
brand names; (ii) the consistency with external market and industry data; and (iii) whether these assumptions were
consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the audit. Professionals with
67
Table of Contents
specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in evaluating (i) the appropriateness of the Company’s valuation
methods and (ii) the reasonableness of the royalty rate and discount rate significant assumptions.
Acquisition of Clif Bar - Valuation of the Clif Trade Name
As described in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, on August 1, 2022, the Company acquired Clif Bar for
purchase price consideration of $2.6 billion. Of the acquired indefinite life intangible assets, management allocated
$1.45 billion to trade names, which primarily relate to the Clif trade name. The fair value for the Clif trade name was
determined using the relief from royalty method. Significant assumptions used by management in assessing the fair
value include estimates of future sales, discount and royalty rates.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the valuation of the Clif trade
name acquired in the acquisition of Clif Bar is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management
when developing the fair value of the Clif trade name acquired; (ii) a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and
effort in performing procedures and evaluating management’s significant assumptions related to estimates of future
sales, discount and royalty rates; and (iii) the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and
knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our
overall opinion on the consolidated financial statement. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls
related to acquisition accounting, including controls over management’s valuation of the Clif trade name acquired and
controls over the development of significant assumptions related to estimates of future sales, discount and royalty
rates. These procedures also included, among others (i) reading the purchase agreement; (ii) testing management’s
process for developing the fair value of the Clif trade name acquired; (iii) testing the completeness and accuracy of the
underlying data used in the relief from royalty method; and (iv) evaluating the reasonableness of the significant
assumptions used by management related to estimates of future sales, discount and royalty rates. Evaluating
management’s significant assumption related to estimates of future sales involved evaluating whether the assumption
used by management was reasonable considering (i) the current and past performance of the Clif Bar business; (ii) the
consistency with external market and industry data; and (iii) whether this assumption was consistent with evidence
obtained in other areas of the audit. Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in
evaluating (i) the appropriateness of the Company’s relief from royalty method and (ii) the reasonableness of the
discount and royalty rate significant assumptions.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Chicago, Illinois
February 3, 2023
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2001.
68
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Earnings
For the Years Ended December 31
(in millions of U.S. dollars, except per share data)
 
 2022 2021 2020
Net revenues $ 31,496 $ 28,720 $ 26,581 
Cost of sales 20,184 17,466 16,135 
   Gross profit 11,312 11,254 10,446 
Selling, general and administrative expenses 7,384 6,263 6,098 
Asset impairment and exit costs 262 212 301 
Net gain on acquisition and divestitures — (8) — 
Amortization of intangible assets 132 134 194 
   Operating income 3,534 4,653 3,853 
Benefit plan non-service income (117) (163) (138)
Interest and other expense, net 423 447 608 
   Earnings before income taxes 3,228 4,369 3,383 
Income tax provision (865) (1,190) (1,224)
Gain/(loss) on equity method investment transactions (22) 742 989 
Equity method investment net earnings 385 393 421 
   Net earnings 2,726 4,314 3,569 
Noncontrolling interest earnings (9) (14) (14)
   Net earnings attributable to Mondelēz International $ 2,717 $ 4,300 $ 3,555 
Per share data:
   Basic earnings per share attributable to Mondelēz International $ 1.97 $ 3.06 $ 2.48 
   Diluted earnings per share attributable to Mondelēz International$ 1.96 $ 3.04 $ 2.47 
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
69
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Earnings
For the Years Ended December 31
(in millions of U.S. dollars)
 
 2022 2021 2020
Net earnings $ 2,726 $ 4,314 $ 3,569 
Other comprehensive earnings/(losses), net of tax:
   Currency translation adjustment (725) (458) (322)
   Pension and other benefit plans 274 495 (153)
   Derivative cash flow hedges 114 13 52 
Total other comprehensive earnings/(losses) (337) 50 (423)
Comprehensive earnings 2,389 4,364 3,146 
   less: Comprehensive earnings/(losses) attributable to
            noncontrolling interests (5) (2) 27 
Comprehensive earnings attributable to Mondelēz International $ 2,394 $ 4,366 $ 3,119 
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
70
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Balance Sheets, as of December 31
(in millions of U.S. dollars, except share data)
 2022 2021
ASSETS
   Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,923 $ 3,546 
   Trade receivables (net of allowances of $45 at December 31, 2022
      and $37 at December 31, 2021) 3,088 2,337 
   Other receivables (net of allowances of $59 at December 31, 2022
      and $49 at December 31, 2021) 819 851 
   Inventories, net 3,381 2,708 
   Other current assets 880 900 
      Total current assets 10,091 10,342 
   Property, plant and equipment, net 9,020 8,658 
   Operating lease right of use assets 660 613 
   Goodwill 23,450 21,978 
   Intangible assets, net 19,710 18,291 
   Prepaid pension assets 1,016 1,009 
   Deferred income taxes 473 541 
   Equity method investments 4,879 5,289 
   Other assets 1,862 371 
      TOTAL ASSETS $ 71,161 $ 67,092 
LIABILITIES
   Short-term borrowings $ 2,299 $ 216 
   Current portion of long-term debt 383 1,746 
   Accounts payable 7,562 6,730 
   Accrued marketing 2,370 2,097 
   Accrued employment costs 949 822 
   Other current liabilities 3,168 2,397 
      Total current liabilities 16,731 14,008 
   Long-term debt 20,251 17,550 
   Long-term operating lease liabilities 514 459 
   Deferred income taxes 3,437 3,444 
   Accrued pension costs 403 681 
   Accrued postretirement health care costs 217 301 
   Other liabilities 2,688 2,326 
      TOTAL LIABILITIES 44,241 38,769 
Commitments and Contingencies (Note 14)
EQUITY
   Common Stock, no par value (5,000,000,000 shares authorized and
      1,996,537,778 shares issued at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021) — — 
   Additional paid-in capital 32,143 32,097 
   Retained earnings 31,481 30,806 
   Accumulated other comprehensive losses (10,947) (10,624)
   Treasury stock, at cost (630,646,687 shares at December 31, 2022 and
      604,907,239 shares at December 31, 2021) (25,794) (24,010)
      Total Mondelēz International Shareholders’ Equity 26,883 28,269 
   Noncontrolling interest 37 54 
      TOTAL EQUITY 26,920 28,323 
            TOTAL LIABILITIES AND EQUITY $ 71,161 $ 67,092 
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
71
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(in millions of U.S. dollars, except per share data)
 
 Mondelēz International Shareholders’ Equity   
Common
StockAdditional
Paid-in
CapitalRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Earnings/
(Losses)Treasury
StockNon-
controlling
InterestTotal
Equity
Balances at January 1, 2020 $ — $32,019 $26,615 $ (10,254)$(21,139)$ 76 $27,317 
Comprehensive
earnings/(losses):
   Net earnings — — 3,555 — — 14 3,569 
   Other comprehensive
earnings/
      (losses), net of income taxes — — — (436) — 13 (423)
Exercise of stock options and
   issuance of other stock awards — 51 (59) — 336 — 328 
   Common Stock repurchased — — — — (1,401) — (1,401)
Cash dividends declared
   ($1.20 per share) — — (1,718) — — — (1,718)
Dividends paid on noncontrolling
   interest and other activities — — 9 — — (27) (18)
Balances at December 31,
2020 $ — $32,070 $28,402 $ (10,690)$(22,204)$ 76 $27,654 
Comprehensive
earnings/(losses):
   Net earnings — — 4,300 — — 14 4,314 
   Other comprehensive
earnings/
      (losses), net of income taxes — — — 66 — (16) 50 
Exercise of stock options and
   issuance of other stock awards — 27 (34) — 290 — 283 
Common Stock repurchased — — — — (2,096) — (2,096)
Cash dividends declared
   ($1.33 per share) — — (1,867) — — — (1,867)
Dividends paid on noncontrolling
   interest and other activities — — 5 — — (20) (15)
Balances at December 31,
2021 $ — $32,097 $30,806 $ (10,624)$(24,010)$ 54 $28,323 
Comprehensive
earnings/(losses):
   Net earnings — — 2,717 — — 9 2,726 
   Other comprehensive
earnings/
      (losses), net of income taxes — — — (323) — (14) (337)
Exercise of stock options and
   issuance of other stock awards — 46 (20) — 216 — 242 
Common Stock repurchased — — — — (2,000) — (2,000)
Cash dividends declared
   ($1.47 per share) — — (2,025) — — — (2,025)
Dividends paid on noncontrolling
   interest and other activities — — 3 — — (12) (9)
Balances at December 31,
2022 $ — $32,143 $31,481 $ (10,947)$(25,794)$ 37 $26,920 
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
72
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
For the Years Ended December 31
(in millions of U.S. dollars)
 2022 2021 2020
CASH PROVIDED BY/(USED IN) OPERATING ACTIVITIES
   Net earnings $ 2,726 $ 4,314 $ 3,569 
   Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to operating cash flows:
      Depreciation and amortization 1,107 1,113 1,116 
      Stock-based compensation expense 120 121 126 
      Deferred income tax provision/(benefit) (42) 205 (70)
      Asset impairments and accelerated depreciation 233 128 136 
      Loss on early extinguishment of debt 38 110 185 
      Net gain on acquisition and divestitures — (8) — 
      Loss/(gain) on equity method investment transactions 22 (742) (989)
      Equity method investment net earnings (385) (393) (421)
      Distributions from equity method investments 184 172 246 
      Mark-to-market and other non-cash items, net 426 (230) 243 
      Change in assets and liabilities,
         net of acquisitions and divestitures:
            Receivables, net (719) (197) 59 
            Inventories, net (635) (170) (24)
            Accounts payable 715 702 436 
            Other current assets (286) (169) (207)
            Other current liabilities 630 (502) (208)
      Change in pension and postretirement assets and liabilities, net (226) (313) (233)
         Net cash provided by operating activities 3,908 4,141 3,964 
CASH PROVIDED BY/(USED IN) INVESTING ACTIVITIES
   Capital expenditures (906) (965) (863)
   Acquisitions, net of cash received (5,286) (833) (1,136)
   Proceeds from divestitures including equity method investments 601 1,539 2,489 
   Proceeds from derivative settlements and other 703 233 10 
         Net cash (used in)/provided by investing activities (4,888) (26) 500 
CASH PROVIDED BY/(USED IN) FINANCING ACTIVITIES
   Issuances of commercial paper, maturities greater than 90 days — — 677 
   Repayments of commercial paper, maturities greater than 90 days — — (1,174)
   Net issuances/(repayments) of short-term borrowings 1,914 194 (2,116)
   Long-term debt proceeds 4,490 5,921 7,213 
   Long-term debt repayments (3,032) (6,247) (3,878)
   Repurchases of Common Stock (2,017) (2,110) (1,390)
   Dividends paid (1,985) (1,826) (1,678)
   Other 174 (1) 131 
         Net cash used in financing activities (456) (4,069) (2,215)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and
   restricted cash (169) (143) 73 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash:
   (Decrease)/increase (1,605) (97) 2,322 
   Balance at beginning of period 3,553 3,650 1,328 
   Balance at end of period $ 1,948 $ 3,553 $ 3,650 
Cash paid:
   Interest $ 551 $ 426 $ 413 
   Income taxes $ 1,103 $ 1,556 $ 1,264 
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
73
Table of Contents
Mondelēz International, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
Note 1. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Description of Business:
Mondelēz International, Inc. was incorporated in 2000 in the Commonwealth of Virginia. Mondelēz International, Inc.,
through its subsidiaries (collectively “Mondelēz International,” “we,” “us” and “our”), sells food and beverage products to
consumers in over 150 countries.
Principles of Consolidation:
The consolidated financial statements include Mondelēz International, Inc. as well as our wholly owned and majority
owned subsidiaries, except our Venezuelan subsidiaries that were deconsolidated in 2015. All intercompany
transactions are eliminated. The noncontrolling interest represents the noncontrolling investors’ interests in the results
of subsidiaries that we control and consolidate. We account for investments over which we exercise significant
influence under the equity method of accounting. Investments over which we do not have significant influence or control
are not material and as there is no readily determinable fair value for the equity interests, these investments are carried
at cost with changes in the investment recognized to the extent cash is received.
Use of Estimates:
We prepare our consolidated financial statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America (“U.S. GAAP”), which require us to make estimates and assumptions that affect a number of
amounts in our consolidated financial statements. Significant estimates include, valuation assumptions of goodwill and
intangible assets, useful lives of long-lived assets, restructuring program liabilities, contingent consideration, marketing
program accruals, insurance and self-insurance reserves, pension and benefit plan assumptions and income taxes. We
base our estimates on historical experience, expectations of future impacts and other assumptions that we believe are
reasonable. Given the uncertainty of the global economic environment, our estimates could be significantly different
than future performance. If actual amounts differ from estimates, we include the updates in our consolidated results of
operations in the period the actual amounts become known.
War in Ukraine
In February 2022, Russia began a military invasion of Ukraine and we closed our operations and facilities in Ukraine. In
March 2022, our two Ukrainian manufacturing facilities in Trostyanets and Vyshhorod were significantly damaged.
During the first quarter of 2022, we evaluated and impaired these and other related assets. We recorded $143 million of
total expenses ($145 million after-tax) incurred as a direct result of the war, including $75 million recorded in asset
impairment and exit costs, $44 million in cost of sales and $24 million in selling, general and administrative expenses.
We recorded $75 million of property, plant and equipment impairments, $33 million of estimated inventory write-offs,
$19 million of increased estimated allowances for trade receivables and $16 million in accrued expenses. During the
remainder of 2022, we reversed approximately $22 million of previously recorded charges primarily as a result of higher
than expected collection of trade receivables and inventory recoveries. We continue to consolidate both our Ukrainian
and Russian subsidiaries and continue to evaluate our ability to control our operating activities and businesses on an
ongoing basis. In connection with these findings and impacts, we have made estimates and assumptions based on
information available to us. We base our estimates on historical experience, expectations of future impacts and other
assumptions that we believe are reasonable. Given the uncertainty of the ongoing effects of the war in Ukraine, and its
impact on the global economic environment, our estimates could be significantly different than future performance.
Currency Translation and Highly Inflationary Accounting:
We translate the results of operations of our subsidiaries from multiple currencies using average exchange rates during
each period and translate balance sheet accounts using exchange rates at the end of each period. We record currency
translation adjustments as a component of equity (except for highly inflationary currencies) and realized exchange
gains and losses on transactions in earnings.
Highly inflationary accounting is triggered when a country’s three-year cumulative inflation rate exceeds 100%. It
requires the remeasurement of financial statements of subsidiaries in the country, from the functional currency of the
subsidiary to our U.S. dollar reporting currency, with currency remeasurement gains or losses recorded in earnings. At
this time, within our consolidated entities, Argentina and Türkiye are accounted for as highly inflationary economies.
Argentina and Türkiye represent 1.6% and 0.7% of our consolidated net revenues, with remeasurement losses of $39
million and $1 million in 2022, respectively.
74
Table of Contents
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash:
Cash and cash equivalents include demand deposits with banks and all highly liquid investments with original
maturities of three months or less. We also had restricted cash within other current assets of $25 million as of
December 31, 2022 and $7 million as of December 31, 2021. Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash was
$1,948 million as of December 31, 2022 and $3,553 million as of December 31, 2021.
Allowances for Credit Losses:
Allowances for credit losses are recorded against our receivables. They are developed at a country and region level
based on historical collection experiences, current economic condition of specific customers and the forecasted
economic condition of countries using various factors such as bond default rates and consumption indexes. We write
off receivables once it is determined that the receivables are no longer collectible and as allowed by local laws.
Changes in allowances for credit losses consisted of:
Allowance for
Trade
ReceivablesAllowance for
Other Current
ReceivablesAllowance for
Long-Term
Receivables
 (in millions)
Balance at January 1, 2021 $ (42)$ (42)$ (12)
Current period provision for expected credit losses (3) (13) — 
Write-offs charged against the allowance 5 3 2 
Currency 3 3 — 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ (37)$ (49)$ (10)
Current period provision for expected credit losses (13) (14) (3)
Write-offs charged against the allowance 2 3 — 
Currency 3 1 (1)
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ (45)$ (59)$ (14)
Transfers of Financial Assets:
We account for transfers of financial assets, such as uncommitted revolving non-recourse accounts receivable factoring
arrangements, when we have surrendered control over the related assets. We use receivable factoring arrangements
periodically when circumstances are favorable to manage liquidity. We have nonrecourse factoring arrangements in
which we sell eligible trade receivables primarily to banks in exchange for cash. We may continue to collect the
receivables sold, acting solely as a collecting agent on behalf of the banks. The outstanding principal amount of
receivables under these arrangements amounted to $516 million as of December 31, 2022, $761 million as of
December 31, 2021 and $760 million as of December 31, 2020. The incremental costs of factoring receivables under
these arrangements were not material for all periods presented. The proceeds from the sales of receivables are
included in cash from operating activities in the consolidated statements of cash flows.
Inventories:
We record our inventory using the average cost method and record inventory reserves for excess and obsolete
inventory.
Long-Lived Assets:
Property, plant and equipment are stated at historical cost and depreciated by the straight-line method over the
estimated useful lives of the assets with the expense recorded in cost of sales or selling, general and administrative
expenses depending on the nature of the long-lived assets. Machinery and equipment are depreciated over periods
ranging from 3 to 20 years and buildings and building improvements over periods up to 40 years.
We review long-lived assets, including definite-life intangible assets, for realizability on an ongoing basis. Changes in
depreciation, generally accelerated depreciation, are determined and recorded when estimates of the remaining useful
lives or residual values of long-term assets change. We amortize definite-life intangible assets over their estimated
useful lives and evaluate them for impairment as we do other long-lived assets. We review for impairment when
conditions exist that indicate the carrying amount of the assets may not be fully recoverable. In those circumstances,
we perform undiscounted operating cash flow analyses for asset and liability groups at the lowest level for which cash
flows are separately identifiable to determine if an impairment exists. Any impairment loss is calculated as the excess of
the asset’s carrying value over its estimated fair value. Fair value is estimated based on
75
Table of Contents
the discounted cash flows for the asset group over the remaining useful life or based on the expected cash proceeds
for the asset less costs of disposal.
Leases:
We determine whether a contract is or contains a lease at contract inception. For short-term operating leases with
terms of 12 months or less, we do not recognize right-of-use (“ROU”) assets and lease liabilities. ROU assets are
recognized at commencement date at the value of the lease liability, adjusted for any prepayments, lease incentives
received and initial direct costs incurred. Lease liabilities are recognized at commencement date based on the present
value of remaining lease payments over the lease term. The non-recurring fair value measurement is classified as
Level 3 as no fair value inputs are observable. As the implicit interest rate in the lease is not readily determinable, we
use our country-specific incremental borrowing rate to discount the lease liabilities.
Our leases may include options to extend or terminate the lease, which are included in the lease term when it is
reasonably certain that we will exercise that option. Our lease agreements do not contain any material residual value
guarantees or material restrictive covenants. Many of our leases contain non-lease components (e.g. product costs,
common-area or other maintenance costs) that relate to the lease components of the agreement. We account for lease
and non-lease components as a single lease component.
Amortization of ROU lease assets is calculated over the lease term with the expense recorded in cost of sales or
selling, general and administrative expenses depending on the nature of the leased item. Interest expense is recorded
over the lease term and is recorded in interest expense (based on a front-loaded interest expense pattern) for finance
leases and is recorded in cost of sales or selling, general and administrative expenses for operating leases. Variable
lease payments, which are primarily comprised of product costs, insurance and tax payments based on usage or
output, are recognized when the expense is incurred. Finance lease ROU assets are presented in property, plant and
equipment and the related finance lease liabilities are presented in the current portion of long-term debt and long-term
debt.
Software Costs:
We capitalize certain computer software and software development costs incurred in connection with developing or
obtaining computer software for internal use. Capitalized software costs are included in property, plant and equipment
and amortized on a straight-line basis over the estimated useful lives of the software, which do not exceed seven years.
Goodwill and Indefinite-Life Intangible Assets:
We test goodwill and indefinite-life intangible assets for impairment on an annual basis on July 1. We assess goodwill
impairment risk throughout the year by performing a qualitative review of entity-specific, industry, market and general
economic factors affecting our goodwill reporting units. Annually, we may perform qualitative testing, or depending on
factors such as prior-year test results, current year developments, current risk evaluations and other practical
considerations, we may elect to do quantitative testing instead. In our quantitative testing, we compare a reporting
unit’s estimated fair value with its carrying value. We estimate a reporting unit’s fair value using a discounted cash flow
method that incorporates planned growth rates, market-based discount rates and estimates of residual value. If the
carrying value of a reporting unit’s net assets exceeds its fair value, we would recognize an impairment charge for the
amount by which the carrying value exceeds the reporting unit’s fair value.
Annually, we assess indefinite-life intangible assets for impairment by performing a qualitative review and assessing
events and circumstances that could affect the fair value or carrying value of these intangible assets. If significant
potential impairment risk exists for a specific asset, we quantitatively test it for impairment by comparing its estimated
fair value with its carrying value. During our annual testing, we use several accepted valuation methods, including
Relief from Royalty, excess earnings and excess margin, that utilize estimates of future sales, earnings growth rates,
royalty rates and discount rates in determining a brand’s global fair value. If the carrying value of the asset exceeds its
fair value, we consider the asset impaired and reduce its carrying value to the estimated fair value.
Held for Sale:
Assets and liabilities to be disposed of by sale ("disposal groups") are reclassified into assets and liabilities held for sale
on our consolidated balance sheets. The reclassification occurs when all the held for sale criteria have been met,
including when management having the requisite authority have committed to a plan to sell the assets within one year.
Disposal groups are measured at the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell and are not depreciated or
amortized. The fair value of a disposal group, less any costs to sell, is assessed each reporting
76
Table of Contents
period it remains classified as held for sale and any remeasurement to the lower of carrying value or fair value less
costs to sell is reported as an adjustment to the carrying value.
Business Combinations:
The assets acquired and liabilities assumed upon the acquisition or consolidation of a business are recorded at fair
value, with the residual of the purchase price allocated to goodwill. During the measurement period, which may be up
to one year from the acquisition date, we may record adjustments to assets acquired and liabilities assumed with the
corresponding offset to goodwill. The results of operations of an acquired business are included in our operating results
from the date of acquisition.
Further, certain of our acquisitions may include earn-out provisions or other forms of contingent consideration. As of the
acquisition date, we record contingent consideration, as applicable, at the estimated fair value of expected future
payments associated with the earn-out. Any changes to the recorded fair value of contingent consideration will be
recognized as expenses or earnings in the period in which they occur.
Legal costs, due diligence costs, business valuation costs and all other business acquisition costs are expensed when
incurred.
Equity Method Investments:
Equity method investments consist of our investments in entities in which we maintain an equity ownership interest and
apply the equity method of accounting due to our ability to exert significant influence over decisions relating to their
operating and financial affairs. Revenue and expenses of our equity method investees are not consolidated into our
financial statements; rather, our proportionate share of the earnings of each investee is reflected as equity method
investment net earnings. The carrying values of our equity method investments are also impacted by our proportionate
share of items impacting the investee's accumulated other comprehensive income or losses and other items, such as
our share of investee dividends.
Insurance and Self-Insurance:
We use a combination of insurance and self-insurance for a number of risks, including workers’ compensation, general
liability, automobile liability, product liability and our obligation for employee healthcare benefits. We estimate the
liabilities associated with these risks on an undiscounted basis by evaluating and making judgments about historical
claims experience and other actuarial assumptions and the estimated impact on future results.
Revenue Recognition:
We recognize revenue when control over the products transfers to our customers, which generally occurs upon delivery
or shipment of the products. We account for product shipping, handling and insurance as fulfillment activities with
revenues for these activities recorded within net revenue and costs recorded within cost of sales. Any taxes collected
on behalf of government authorities are excluded from net revenues.
Revenues are recorded net of trade and sales incentives and estimated product returns. Known or expected pricing or
revenue adjustments, such as trade discounts, rebates or returns, are estimated at the time of sale. We base these
estimates of expected amounts principally on historical utilization and redemption rates. Estimates that affect revenue,
such as trade incentives and product returns, are monitored and adjusted each period until the incentives or product
returns are realized.
Key sales terms, such as pricing and quantities ordered, are established on a frequent basis such that most customer
arrangements and related incentives have a one year or shorter duration. As such, we do not capitalize contract
inception costs and we capitalize product fulfillment costs. Deferred revenues are not material and primarily include
customer advance payments typically collected a few days before product delivery, at which time deferred revenues are
reclassified and recorded as net revenues. We generally do not receive non-cash consideration for the sale of goods
nor do we grant payment financing terms greater than one year.
Marketing, Advertising and Research and Development:
We promote our products with marketing and advertising programs. These programs include, but are not limited to,
cooperative advertising, in-store displays and consumer marketing promotions. For interim reporting purposes,
advertising, consumer promotion and marketing research expenses are charged to operations as a percentage of
volume, based on estimated sales volume and estimated program spending. We do not defer costs on our year-end
consolidated balance sheets and all marketing and advertising costs are recorded as an expense in the year incurred.
Advertising expense was $1,670 million in 2022, $1,564 million in 2021 and $1,376 million in 2020. We
77
Table of Contents
expense product research and development costs as incurred. Research and development expense was $346 million
in 2022, $347 million in 2021 and $332 million in 2020. We record marketing and advertising as well as research and
development expenses within selling, general and administrative expenses.
Stock-based Compensation:
We maintain a share-based compensation plan, which authorizes the granting of various equity-based incentives,
including stock options (including stock appreciation rights), deferred stock units (DSUs) and performance share units
(PSUs). Stock compensation expense is amortized to expense over the vesting period, generally three years.
Stock options are granted with an exercise price equal to the closing market price of our Common Stock on the grant
date. Substantially all of the options become exercisable in three annual installments beginning a year from the grant
date and generally expire 10 years from the grant date. We use the Black-Scholes Model to measure the fair value of
stock options granted to employees. The expected life of the options represents the period of time the options are
expected to be outstanding and is based on historical trends. Expected stock price volatility is based on the implied and
historical volatility of the Company’s stock. The expected dividend yield is based on the Company’s most recent annual
dividend rate. The risk-free interest rate is based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect at the time of grant with a
term equal to the expected life.
DSUs are typically granted to selected management employees on an annual basis and vest over three years.
Dividend equivalents are paid during the vesting period. The fair value of our DSUs and other stock-based awards is
measured at the market price of our Common Stock on the grant date.
PSUs vest based on varying performance, market and service conditions. Dividend equivalents accumulated over the
vesting period are paid after vesting. The grant date fair value of PSUs is determined based on the Monte Carlo
simulation model for the market-based component and the market price of our Common Stock on the grant date for
performance-based components. The final award may equal 0-200 percent of the target grant, based on the
achievement of the performance and market-based components.
Forfeitures are estimated on the grant date for all of our stock-based compensation awards.
Employee Benefit Plans:
We provide a range of benefits to our current and retired employees including pension benefits, defined contribution
plan benefits, postretirement health care benefits and postemployment primarily severance-related benefits depending
upon local statutory requirements, employee tenure and service requirements as well as other factors. The cost for
these plans is recognized in earnings primarily over the working life of the covered employee.
Financial Instruments:
We use financial instruments to manage our currency exchange rate, commodity price and interest rate risks. We
monitor and manage these exposures as part of our overall risk management program, which focuses on the
unpredictability of financial markets and seeks to reduce the potentially adverse effects that the volatility of these
markets may have on our operating results. A principal objective of our risk management strategies is to reduce
significant, unanticipated earnings fluctuations that may arise from volatility in currency exchange rates, commodity
prices and interest rates.
When we use derivatives, we are exposed to credit and market risks. We reduce our credit risk by entering into
transactions with counterparties with high quality, investment grade credit ratings, limiting the amount of exposure with
each counterparty and monitoring the financial condition of our counterparties. We also maintain a policy of requiring
that all significant, non-exchange traded derivative contracts with a duration of one year or longer are governed by an
International Swaps and Derivatives Association master agreement. We manage derivative market risk by limiting the
types of derivative instruments, derivative strategies we use, and the degree of market risk that we plan to hedge
through the use of derivative instruments.
We record derivative financial instruments on a gross basis in our consolidated balance sheets. The fair value of our
instruments are recorded within other current assets, other assets, other current liabilities, and other liabilities in our
consolidated balance sheets.
Mark-to-market gains or losses related to our economic hedges are classified in the consolidated statements of cash
flows in other non-cash items, net, within operating activities. Cash flows related to the settlement of derivative
instruments designated as hedges of net investments in non-U.S. operations are classified in the consolidated
78
Table of Contents
statements of cash flows within investing activities. Cash flows related to derivative instruments that are designated or
settled economic hedges are classified in the same line item as the cash flows of the related hedged item. Cash flows
related to the settlement of all other free-standing derivative instruments are classified within investing activities.
Commodity derivatives. We are exposed to price risk related to forecasted purchases of certain commodities that we
primarily use as raw materials. We enter into commodity forward, futures and option contracts. Commodity forward
contracts generally are not subject to the accounting requirements for derivative instruments and hedging activities
under the normal purchases exception. We sell commodity futures to hedge future purchase commitments. We
occasionally use related futures to cross-hedge a commodity exposure. We are not a party to leveraged derivatives
and, by policy, do not use financial instruments for speculative purposes. Any mark-to-market gains or losses are
recorded in earnings (see Note 10, Financial Instruments, for additional information).
Currency exchange derivatives. We enter into currency exchange forward contracts, futures, options and swaps.to
mitigate our exposure to changes in exchange rates from third-party and intercompany current and forecasted
transactions. Any mark-to-market gains or losses are recorded in earnings (see Note 10, Financial Instruments, for
additional information).
Interest rate cash flow hedges. We manage interest rate volatility by modifying the pricing or maturity characteristics of
certain liabilities so that the net impact on expense is not, on a material basis, adversely affected by movements in
interest rates. We use derivative instruments, including interest rate swaps that have indices related to the pricing of
specific liabilities as part of our interest rate risk management strategy. We use cross-currency interest rate swaps to
hedge interest payments on newly issued debt denominated in a different currency than the functional currency of the
borrowing entity. Substantially all of these derivative instruments are highly effective and qualify for hedge accounting
treatment. Changes in the fair value of derivatives that are designated as a cash flow hedge, to the extent the hedge is
effective, are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses), net of deferred taxes, and reclassified to
earnings when the hedged item affects earnings (see Note 10, Financial Instruments, for additional information). 
Hedges of net investments in non-U.S. operations. We have numerous investments outside the United States. The net
assets of these subsidiaries are exposed to changes and volatility in currency exchange rates. We use local currency
denominated debt to hedge our non-U.S. net investments against adverse movements in exchange rates. We may
designate non-U.S. dollar-denominated borrowings in the U.S. as a net investment hedge of a portion of our overall
non-U.S. operations. The gains and losses on our net investment in these designated non-U.S. operations are
economically offset by losses and gains designated dollar-denominated borrowings. The revaluation of designated
borrowings, net of deferred taxes, is recorded within currency translation adjustment in accumulated other
comprehensive earnings/(losses) (see Note 10, Financial Instruments, for additional information).
We use derivatives instruments to hedge certain investments in our non-U.S. operations against movements in
exchange rates. These instruments may include cross-currency interest rate swaps, forwards and options. The after-tax
gain/(loss) on these net investment hedge contracts, net of deferred taxes, is recorded within cumulative translation
adjustment in accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses) (see Note 10, Financial Instruments, for additional
information).
Income Taxes:
Our provision for income taxes includes amounts payable or refundable for the current year, the effects of deferred
taxes and impacts from uncertain tax positions. We recognize deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future
tax consequences of temporary differences between the financial statement and tax basis of our assets and liabilities,
operating loss carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using
enacted tax rates expected to apply in the years in which those differences are expected to reverse.
The realization of certain deferred tax assets is dependent on generating sufficient taxable income in the appropriate
jurisdiction prior to the expiration of the carryforward periods. Deferred tax assets are reduced by a valuation allowance
if it is more likely than not that some portion, or all, of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. When assessing the
need for a valuation allowance, we consider any carryback potential, future reversals of existing taxable temporary
differences (including liabilities for unrecognized tax benefits), future taxable income and tax planning strategies.
79
Table of Contents
We recognize tax benefits in our financial statements from uncertain tax positions only if it is more likely than not that
the tax position will be sustained based on the technical merits of the position. The amount we recognize is measured
as the largest amount of benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of being realized upon resolution. Future changes
related to the expected resolution of uncertain tax positions could affect tax expense in the period when the change
occurs.
We monitor for changes in tax laws and reflect the impacts of tax law changes in the period of enactment. When there
is refinement to tax law changes in subsequent periods, we account for the new guidance in the period when it
becomes known.
New Accounting Pronouncements:
In October 2021, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) issued an Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”)
which requires companies to recognize and measure customer contract assets and contract liabilities acquired in a
business combination as if the acquiring company originated the related revenue contracts. Prior to adopting this ASU,
acquired contract assets and liabilities were measured at fair value. This ASU is effective for fiscal years beginning after
December 15, 2022 and early adoption is permitted. We are evaluating the timing and effects of adopting this ASU and
currently we do not expect this ASU to have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements.
In March 2020 and subsequently in January 2021 and December 2022, the FASB issued ASUs to provide optional
accounting guidance for a limited period of time to ease the potential burden in accounting for reference rate reform.
The guidance provides optional expedients and exceptions to existing accounting requirements for contract
modifications and hedge accounting related to transitioning from discontinued reference rates, such as LIBOR, to
alternative reference rates, if certain criteria are met. The new accounting requirements can be applied as of the
beginning of the interim period including March 12, 2020, or any date thereafter, through December 31, 2024. We
adopted this standard in the fourth quarter of 2022 and it did not have a material impact on our consolidated financial
statements.
In September 2022, the FASB issued an ASU which enhances the transparency of supplier finance programs by
requiring additional disclosure about the key terms of these programs and a roll-forward of the related obligations to
understand the effects of these programs on working capital, liquidity and cash flows. The ASU is effective for fiscal
years beginning after December 15, 2022, except for the roll-forward requirement, which is effective for fiscal years
beginning after December 15, 2023. Early adoption is permitted. We are currently assessing the impact on our
consolidated financial statements and related disclosures.
80
Table of Contents
Note 2. Acquisitions and Divestitures
Acquisitions
Ricolino
On November 1, 2022, we acquired 100% of the equity of Grupo Bimbo's confectionery business, Ricolino, located
primarily in Mexico. The acquisition of Ricolino builds on our continued prioritization of fast-growing snacking segments
in key geographies. The cash consideration paid for Ricolino totaled 26 billion Mexican pesos ($1.3 billion), net of cash
received.
We are working to complete the valuation of assets acquired and liabilities assumed and have recorded a preliminary
purchase price allocation of:
(in millions)
Cash $ 22 
Receivables 86 
Inventory 70 
Other current assets 3 
Property, plant and equipment 144 
Operating leases right of use assets 17 
Definite life intangible assets 218 
Indefinite life intangible assets 339 
Goodwill 714 
Assets acquired $ 1,613 
Current liabilities 177 
Deferred tax liability 77 
Operating lease liabilities 17 
Other liabilities 12 
Total purchase price $ 1,330 
Less: cash received (22)
Net Cash Paid $ 1,308 
Within indefinite-life intangible assets, we allocated $339 million to trade names. The fair value for the Ricolino, Dulces
Vero, LaCorona and Coronado trade names were determined using the Relief from Royalty method, a form of the
income approach, at the acquisition date. The fair value measurement of indefinite-life intangible assets are based on
significant unobservable inputs, and thus represent Level 3 inputs. Significant assumptions used in assessing the fair
values of intangible assets include estimates of future sales, discount and royalty rates.
Goodwill was determined as the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the net assets acquired and arises
principally as a result of expansion opportunities and synergies across both new and legacy product categories in
Mexico. None of the goodwill recognized is expected to be deductible for income tax purposes. All of the goodwill was
assigned to the Latin American operating segment.
Ricolino added incremental net revenues of $105 million and operating income of $1 million in 2022. In 2022, we
recorded several items within acquisition-related costs that resulted in income of $64 million as realized gains related to
hedging contracts associated with acquisition funds more than offset other acquisition transaction costs. We incurred
acquisition integration costs of $11 million and an inventory step-up charge of $5 million in 2022.
81
Table of Contents
Clif Bar
On August 1, 2022, we acquired 100% of the equity of Clif Bar & Company (“Clif Bar”), a leading U.S. maker of
nutritious energy bars with organic ingredients. The acquisition expands our global snack bar business and
complements our refrigerated snacking and performance nutrition bar portfolios. The total cash payment of $2.9 billion
includes purchase price consideration of $2.6 billion, net of cash received, and one-time compensation expense of
$0.3 billion related to the buyout of the non-vested employee stock ownership plan ("ESOP") shares. This
compensation expense is considered an acquisition-related cost. The acquisition of Clif Bar includes a contingent
consideration arrangement that may require us to pay additional consideration to the sellers for achieving certain
revenue and earnings targets in 2025 and 2026 that exceed our base financial projections for the business implied in
the upfront purchase price. The possible payments range from zero to a maximum total of $2.4 billion, with higher
payouts requiring the achievement of targets that generate rates of returns in excess of the base financial projections.
The estimated fair value of the contingent consideration obligation at the acquisition date was $440 million determined
using a Monte Carlo simulation. Significant assumptions used in assessing the fair value of the liability include financial
projections for net revenue, gross profit, and earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortization ("EBITDA"), as
well as discount and volatility rates.
We are working to complete the valuation of assets acquired and liabilities assumed and have recorded a preliminary
purchase price allocation of:
(in millions)
Cash $ 99 
Receivables 76 
Inventory 124 
Other current assets 9 
Property, plant and equipment 186 
Operating leases right of use assets 22 
Deferred tax assets 92 
Definite life intangible assets 200 
Indefinite life intangible assets 1,450 
Goodwill 1,020 
Other assets 11 
Assets acquired $ 3,289 
Current liabilities 159 
Contingent consideration 440 
Other liabilities 15 
Total purchase price $ 2,675 
Less: cash received (99)
Net Cash Paid $ 2,576 
Within indefinite-life intangible assets, we allocated $1,450 million to trade names. The fair value for the Clif and Luna
trade names were determined using the Relief from Royalty method, a form of the income approach, at the acquisition
date. The fair value measurement of indefinite-life intangible assets are based on significant unobservable inputs, and
thus represent Level 3 inputs. Significant assumptions used in assessing the fair values of intangible assets include
estimates of future sales, discount and royalty rates. We expect to generate a meaningful cash tax benefit over time
from the amortization of acquisition-related intangibles.
Goodwill was determined as the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the net assets acquired and arises
principally as a result of expansion opportunities and synergies across the U.S. and other key markets. All of the
goodwill was assigned to the North America operating segment. Tax deductible goodwill is estimated to be $1.4 billion
and will be amortized.
Clif Bar added incremental net revenues of $361 million and operating income of $13 million in 2022. We incurred an
inventory step-up charge of $20 million and acquisition integration costs of $30 million in 2022. These acquisition
integration costs include an increase to the contingent consideration liability due to changes to underlying assumptions.
Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments for additional information. We also incurred acquisition-related
82
Table of Contents
costs of $296 million in 2022. These acquisition-related costs are primarily related to the buyout of the non-vested
ESOP shares.
Chipita
On January 3, 2022, we acquired 100% of the equity of Chipita Global S.A. (“Chipita”), a leading croissants and baked
snacks company in the Central and Eastern European markets. The acquisition of Chipita offers a strategic
complement to our existing portfolio and advances our strategy to become the global leader in broader snacking. The
cash consideration paid for Chipita totaled €1.2 billion ($1.4 billion), net of cash received, plus the assumption of
Chipita’s debt of €0.5 billion ($0.4 billion) for a total purchase price of €1.7 billion ($1.8 billion).
We are working to complete the valuation of assets acquired and liabilities assumed and have recorded a preliminary
purchase price allocation of:
(in millions)
Cash $ 52 
Receivables 102 
Inventory 60 
Other current assets 3 
Property, plant and equipment 379 
Finance leases right of use assets 8 
Definite life intangible assets 48 
Indefinite life intangible assets 686 
Goodwill 795 
Other assets 77 
Assets acquired $ 2,210 
Current liabilities 133 
Deferred tax liability 158 
Finance lease liabilities 8 
Other liabilities 21 
Total purchase price $ 1,890 
Less: long-term debt (436)
Less: cash received (52)
Net Cash Paid $ 1,402 
Within indefinite-life intangible assets, we allocated $686 million to trade name. The fair value for the 7 Days trade
name, which is the primary asset acquired, was determined using the multi-period excess earnings method under the
income approach at the acquisition date. The fair value measurements of indefinite-life intangible assets are based on
significant unobservable inputs, and thus represent Level 3 inputs. Significant assumptions used in assessing the fair
values of intangible assets include forecasted future cash flows and discount rates.
Goodwill was determined as the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the net assets acquired and arises
principally as a result of expansion opportunities and synergies across both new and legacy product categories. None
of the goodwill recognized is expected to be deductible for income tax purposes. All of the goodwill was assigned to the
Europe operating segment.
Chipita added incremental net revenues of $651 million and operating income of $36 million in 2022. We incurred
acquisition-related costs of $22 million in 2022 and $6 million in 2021. We incurred acquisition integration costs of
$90 million in 2022 and $17 million in 2021.
83
Table of Contents
Other Acquisitions
On April 1, 2021, we acquired Gourmet Food, a leading Australian food company in the premium biscuit and cracker
category, for closing cash consideration of approximately $450 million Australian dollars ($343 million), net of cash
received. We have recorded a purchase price allocation of $41 million to indefinite-lived intangible assets, $80 million to
definite-lived intangible assets, $164 million to goodwill, $19 million to property, plant and equipment, $18 million to
inventory, $25 million to accounts receivable, $12 million to other assets, $5 million to operating right of use assets, $3
million to other current assets, $19 million to current liabilities and $5 million to long-term operating lease liabilities. In
2022, through the one-year anniversary of the acquisition, Gourmet Food added incremental net revenues of
$14 million, and operating income of $1 million. We incurred acquisition integration costs of $1 million in 2022. We
incurred acquisition-related costs of $7 million in 2021.
On March 25, 2021, we acquired a majority interest in Lion/Gemstone Topco Ltd (“Grenade”), a performance nutrition
leader in the United Kingdom, for closing cash consideration of £188 million ($261 million), net of cash received. The
acquisition of Grenade expands our position into the premium nutrition market. We have recorded a purchase price
allocation of $82 million to indefinite-lived intangible assets, $28 million to definite-lived intangible assets, $181 million
to goodwill, $1 million to property, plant and equipment, $11 million to inventory, $18 million to accounts receivable, $25
million to current liabilities, $20 million to deferred tax liabilities and $15 million to long-term other liabilities. In 2022,
through the one-year anniversary of the acquisition, Grenade added incremental net revenues of $21 million, and
operating income of $2 million. We incurred acquisition-related costs of $2 million in 2021.
On January 4, 2021, we acquired the remaining 93% of equity of Hu Master Holdings (“Hu”), a category leader in
premium chocolate in the United States, which provides a strategic complement to our snacking portfolio in North
America through growth opportunities in chocolate and other offerings in the well-being category. The initial cash
consideration paid was $229 million, net of cash received, and we may be required to pay additional contingent
consideration. The estimated fair value of the contingent consideration obligation at the acquisition date was $132
million and was determined using a Monte Carlo simulation based on forecasted future results. During 2021, based on
latest estimates, we recorded a $70 million reduction to the liability as recent economic and market conditions related to
COVID-19 and supply chain challenges in the U.S. impacted the pace of growth. During 2022, we recorded an
additional $7 million reduction to the liability due to further changes to forecasted future results. Refer to Note 10,
Financial Instruments for additional information. As a result of acquiring the remaining equity interest, we consolidated
the operations prospectively from the date of acquisition and recorded a pre-tax gain of $9 million ($7 million after-tax)
related to stepping up our previously-held $8 million (7%) investment to fair value. We have recorded a purchase price
allocation of $123 million to indefinite-lived intangible assets, $51 million to definite-lived intangible assets, $202 million
to goodwill, $1 million to property, plant and equipment, $2 million to inventory, $4 million to accounts receivable, $5
million to current liabilities and $132 million to long-term other liabilities. We incurred acquisition-related costs of
$9 million in 2021.
84
Table of Contents
On April 1, 2020, we acquired a majority interest in Give & Go, a North American leader in fully-finished sweet baked
goods and owner of the famous two-bite brand of brownies and the Create-A-Treat brand, known for cookie and
gingerbread house decorating kits. The acquisition of Give & Go provides access to the in-store bakery channel and
expands our position in broader snacking. The purchase consideration for Give & Go totaled $1,136 million, net of cash
received. We have recorded a purchase price allocation of net tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities
assumed as follows:
 (in millions)
Receivables $ 29 
Inventory 38
Other current assets 6
Property, plant and equipment 136
Operating right of use assets 61
Definite-life intangible assets 511
Indefinite-life intangible assets 42
Goodwill 531
Assets acquired $ 1,354 
Current liabilities 42
Deferred tax liabilities 92
Long-term operating lease liabilities 56
Long-term debt 6
Long-term other liabilities 19
Total purchase price $ 1,139 
Less: cash received 3
Net Cash Paid $ 1,136 
Within definite-life intangible assets, we allocated $416 million to customer relationships which have an estimated
useful life of 17 years. Goodwill arises principally as a result of expansion opportunities and synergies across both new
and legacy product categories. None of the goodwill recognized is expected to be deductible for income tax purposes.
All of the goodwill was assigned to the North America operating segment.
The fair value for customer relationships at the acquisition date was determined using the multi-period excess earnings
method under the income approach. The fair value measurements of intangible assets are based on significant
unobservable inputs, and thus represent Level 3 inputs. Significant assumptions used in assessing the fair values of
intangible assets include discounted future cash flows, customer attrition rates and discount rates. Through the one-
year anniversary of the acquisition, Give & Go added incremental net revenues of $106 million and operating income of
$6 million during 2021. We incurred acquisition integration costs of $26 million in 2022. These acquisition integration
costs are primarily related to an increase to the contingent consideration liability due to changes to forecasted future
results. Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments for additional information. We incurred acquisition integration costs of
$6 million in 2021.® ®
85
Table of Contents
Divestitures
Developed Market Gum - Held for Sale
On December 16, 2022, Mondelēz entered into an agreement to sell its developed market gum business in North
America and Europe for $1.4 billion. It is expected to close in Q4 2023, subject to relevant antitrust approvals and
closing conditions. In connection with these agreements, we have concluded that the disposal group has met the held
for sale criteria as of December 31, 2022. The disposal group was included as part of the North America and Europe
operating segments.
Total assets and liabilities held for sale as of December 31, 2022 on the consolidated balance sheets are comprised of
the following:
(in millions)
Inventories, net $ 79 
Current assets held for sale $ 79 
Property, plant and equipment, net 159
Goodwill 292
Intangible assets, net 671
Noncurrent assets held for sale $ 1,122 
Accrued employment costs 4
Current liabilities held for sale $ 4 
Deferred income taxes 15
Noncurrent liabilities held for sale $ 15 
(1)Reported in Other current assets on the consolidated balance sheets.
(2)Reported in Other assets on the consolidated balance sheets.
(3)Reported in Other current liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets.
(4)Reported in Other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets.
MaxFoods
On November 1, 2021, we completed the sale of MaxFoods Pty Ltd, an Australian packaged seafood business that we
had acquired as part of our acquisition of Gourmet Food Holdings Pty Ltd (“Gourmet Food”). The sales price was
$57 million Australian dollars ($41 million), net of cash divested with the business, and we recorded an immaterial loss
on the transaction. The packaged seafood business added incremental net revenues of $35 million in 2021 and
operating income of $5 million during 2021.
Note 3. Inventories
Inventories consisted of the following:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Raw materials $ 1,031 $ 770 
Finished product 2,501 2,054 
3,532 2,824 
Inventory reserves (151) (116)
Inventories, net $ 3,381 $ 2,708 (1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
86
Table of Contents
Note 4. Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment consisted of the following:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Land and land improvements $ 378 $ 379 
Buildings and building improvements 3,250 3,139 
Machinery and equipment 11,724 11,842 
Construction in progress 879 732 
16,231 16,092 
Accumulated depreciation (7,211) (7,434)
Property, plant and equipment, net $ 9,020 $ 8,658 
Capital expenditures as presented on the statement of cash flow were approximately $0.9 billion, $1.0 billion and $0.9
billion for the years ending December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 and excluded $324 million, $249 million and $275
million for accrued capital expenditures not yet paid.
In connection with our restructuring program, we recorded non-cash property, plant and equipment write-downs
(including accelerated depreciation and asset impairments) and losses/(gains) on disposal within asset impairment and
exit costs on the consolidated statements of earnings and within the segment results as follows (refer to Note 8,
Restructuring Program):
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Latin America $ (3)$ 1 $ (12)
AMEA 3 (15) (7)
Europe 4 7 5 
North America (1) 65 1 
Corporate — — — 
Total $ 3 $ 58 $ (13)
87
Table of Contents
Note 5. Leases
We have operating and finance leases for manufacturing and distribution facilities, vehicles, equipment and office
space. Our leases have remaining lease terms of 1 to 17 years, some of which include options to extend the leases for
up to 6 years.
The components of lease costs were as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021
(in millions)
Operating lease cost $ 213 $ 228 
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of right-of-use assets 95 89 
Interest on lease liabilities 8 7 
Short-term lease cost 11 29 
Variable lease cost 602 506 
Sublease income (4) (6)
Total lease cost $ 925 $ 853 
Supplemental cash flow information related to leases was as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021
(in millions)
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of
   lease liabilities:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ (212)$ (229)
Operating cash flows from finance leases (8) (8)
Financing cash flows from finance leases (95) (88)
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for lease obligations:
Operating leases $ 220 $ 186 
Finance leases 148 76 
88
Table of Contents
Supplemental balance sheet information related to leases was as follows:
As of December 31,
2022 2021
(in millions)
Operating Leases:
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization $ 660 $ 613 
Other current liabilities $ 166 $ 174 
Long-term operating lease liabilities 514 459 
Total operating lease liabilities $ 680 $ 633 
Finance Leases:
Finance leases, net of amortization (within property, plant and equipment)$ 287 $ 233 
Current portion of long-term debt $ 95 $ 82 
Long-term debt 198 157 
Total finance lease liabilities $ 293 $ 239 
Weighted Average Remaining Lease Term
Operating leases 7.0 years 6.6 years
Finance leases 4.1 years 3.9 years
Weighted Average Discount Rate
Operating leases 4.2 % 3.3 %
Finance leases 4.0 % 2.9 %
Maturities of lease liabilities were as follows:
As of December 31, 2022
Operating Leases Finance Leases
(in millions)
Year Ending December 31:
2023 $ 195 $ 105 
2024 142 85 
2025 105 61 
2026 70 38 
2027 52 14 
Thereafter 244 18 
Total future undiscounted lease payments $ 808 $ 321 
Less imputed interest (128) (28)
Total reported lease liability $ 680 $ 293 
On October 5, 2021, the Company closed an asset sale-leaseback transaction on a property in New Jersey. The
Company received proceeds of approximately $142 million, net of selling costs for the property, which had a carrying
value of $51 million, and resulted in an approximately $91 million gain on the sale transaction. The leaseback is
accounted for as an operating lease. The leaseback is expected to end in 2023 and has three 90-day renewal options.
89
Table of Contents
Note 6. Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill by operating segment was:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Latin America $ 1,421 $ 674 
AMEA 3,132 3,365 
Europe 8,009 7,830 
North America 10,888 10,109 
Goodwill $ 23,450 $ 21,978 
Intangible assets consisted of the following:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Indefinite-life intangible assets $ 18,413 $ 17,299 
Definite-life intangible assets 3,354 2,991 
21,767 20,290 
Accumulated amortization (2,057) (1,999)
Intangible assets, net $ 19,710 $ 18,291 
Indefinite-life intangible assets consist principally of brand names purchased through our acquisitions of Nabisco
Holdings Corp., the global LU biscuit business of Groupe Danone S.A., Cadbury Limited and Clif Bar. Definite-life
intangible assets consist primarily of trademarks, customer-related intangibles, process technology, licenses and non-
compete agreements.
Amortization expense for intangible assets was $132 million in 2022, $134 million in 2021 and $194 million in 2020. For
the next five years, we estimate annual amortization expense of approximately $150 million in 2023-2025,
approximately $95 million in 2026 and approximately $90 million in 2027 (reflecting December 31, 2022 exchange
rates).
Changes in goodwill and intangible assets consisted of:
 2022 2021
 GoodwillIntangible
Assets, at cost GoodwillIntangible
Assets, at cost
 (in millions)
Balance at January 1 $ 21,978 $ 20,290 $ 21,895 $ 20,399 
Changes due to:
Currency (757) (692) (464) (465)
Acquisitions 2,529 2,941 547 405 
Held for Sale (292) (671) — — 
Divestitures (8) — — (17)
Asset impairments — (101) — (32)
Balance at December 31 $ 23,450 $ 21,767 $ 21,978 $ 20,290 
Changes to goodwill and intangibles were:
•Acquisitions – In connection with our 2022 acquisitions, we recorded $1.0 billion to goodwill and $1.7 billion to
intangible assets for Clif Bar, $795 million to goodwill and $734 million to intangible assets for Chipita, and
$714 million to goodwill and $557 million to intangible assets for Ricolino as part of purchase accounting. In
connection with our 2021 acquisitions of Gourmet Food, Grenade and the remaining interest
90
Table of Contents
in Hu, we recorded $547 million of goodwill and $405 million of intangible assets as part of purchase
accounting. See Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, for additional information.
•Held for Sale - During the fourth quarter of 2022, we agreed to sell our gum business in North America and
Europe. As a result, we reclassified $292 million of goodwill and $671 million of intangible assets to held for
sale. See Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, for additional information.
•Divestitures – During 2022 and 2021, we made divestitures in Latin America and AMEA which were not
material.
•Asset impairments – As further discussed below, we recorded $101 million of intangible asset impairments in
2022 and $32 million in 2021.
In 2022, 2021 and 2020, there were no goodwill impairments and each of our reporting units had sufficient fair value in
excess of its carrying value. While all reporting units passed our annual impairment testing, if planned business
performance expectations are not met or specific valuation factors outside of our control, such as discount rates,
change significantly, then the estimated fair values of a reporting unit or reporting units might decline and lead to a
goodwill impairment in the future.
In 2022, we recorded $101 million of intangible asset impairment charges related to two biscuit brands in AMEA. We
also identified eight brands with $1.5 billion of aggregate book value as of December 31, 2022 that each had a fair
value in excess of book value of 10% or less. We believe our current plans for each of these brands will allow them to
not be impaired, but if the brand earnings expectations are not met or specific valuation factors outside of our control,
such as discount rates, change significantly, then a brand or brands could become impaired in the future. In 2021, we
recorded a $32 million of intangible asset impairment charge related to one biscuit brand in North America.
Note 7. Equity Method Investments
Our equity method investments include, but are not limited to, our ownership interests in JDE Peet’s (Euronext
Amsterdam: “JDEP”), Keurig Dr Pepper Inc. (Nasdaq: “KDP”), Dong Suh Foods Corporation and Dong Suh Oil & Fats
Co. Ltd. Our ownership interests may change over time due to investee stock-based compensation arrangements,
share issuances or other equity-related transactions. As of December 31, 2022, we owned 19.7%, 5.3%, 50.0% and
49.0%, respectively, of these companies' outstanding shares.
Our investments accounted for under the equity method of accounting totaled $4.9 billion as of December 31, 2022 and
$5.3 billion as of December 31, 2021. We recorded equity earnings and cash dividends of $385 million and $184 million
in 2022, equity earnings and cash dividends of $393 million and $172 million in 2021 and equity earnings and cash
dividends of $421 million and $246 million in 2020.
Based on the quoted closing prices as of December 31, 2022, the combined fair value of our publicly-traded
investments in JDEP and KDP was $5.5 billion, and for each investment, there was no other than temporary
impairment identified.
JDE Peet’s Transactions:
In 2022, we sold approximately 18.6 million of our JDE Peet’s shares back to JDE Peet’s, which reduced our ownership
interest by approximately 3% to 19.8% of the total outstanding shares. We received €500 million ($529 million) of
proceeds and recorded a loss of €8 million ($8 million) on this sale during the second quarter of 2022.
In 2021, we issued €300 million exchangeable bonds, which are redeemable at maturity at their principal amount in
cash or, at our option, through the delivery of an equivalent number of JDE Peet’s ordinary shares based on an initial
exchange price of €35.40 and, as the case may be, an additional amount in cash. If all bonds were redeemed in
exchange for JDE Peet's shares, this would represent approximately 8.5 million shares or approximately 9% of our
equity interest in JDE Peet's. Refer to Note 10, Financial Instruments, for further details on this transaction.
In 2020, JDE Peet’s B.V. (renamed JDE Peet’s N.V. immediately prior to Settlement (as defined below), “JDE Peet’s”)
consummated the offering, listing and trading of its ordinary shares on Euronext Amsterdam, a regulated market
operated by Euronext Amsterdam N.V. In connection with this transaction, JDE Peet’s and the selling shareholders,
including us, agreed to sell at a price of €31.50 per ordinary share a total of approximately 82.1 million ordinary shares,
including ordinary shares subject to an over-allotment option. The ordinary shares were listed and first traded on May
29, 2020, and payment for, and delivery of, the ordinary shares sold in the offering (excluding ordinary shares subject to
the over-allotment option) took place on June 2, 2020 (“Settlement”).
91
Table of Contents
Prior to Settlement, we exchanged our 26.4% ownership interest in JDE for a 26.5% equity interest in JDE Peet’s. We
did not invest new capital in connection with the transaction and the exchange was accounted for as a change in
interest transaction. Upon Settlement, we sold approximately 9.7 million of our ordinary shares in JDE Peet’s in the
offering for gross proceeds of €304 million ($343 million). We subsequently sold approximately 1.4 million additional
shares and received gross proceeds of €46 million ($51 million) upon exercise of the over-allotment option. Following
Settlement and the exercise of the over-allotment option, we held a 22.9% equity interest in JDE Peet’s. During the
second quarter of 2020, we recorded a preliminary gain of $121 million, net of $33 million released from accumulated
other comprehensive losses, and $48 million of transaction costs. During the third quarter of 2020, we increased our
preliminary gain by $10 million to $131 million.
As we continue to have significant influence, we continue to account for our investment in JDE Peet’s under the equity
method, resulting in recognizing our share of their earnings within our earnings and our share of their dividends within
our cash flows. We continue to have board representation with two directors on the JDE Peet's Board of Directors and
have retained certain additional governance rights.
Keurig Dr Pepper Transactions:
In 2021, we sold approximately 42.7 million shares of KDP, which reduced our ownership interest by 3.0% to 5.3% of
the total outstanding shares. We received $1,497 million of proceeds and recorded a pre-tax gain of $768 million (or
$581 million after-tax) during 2021.
In 2020, we sold approximately 73.4 million shares, which reduced our ownership interest by 5.2% to 8.4% of the total
outstanding shares. We received $2,094 million of proceeds and recorded a pre-tax gain of $865 million (or
$662 million after-tax) during 2020.
As we continue to have significant influence, we continue to account for our investment in KDP under the equity
method, resulting in recognizing our share of their earnings within our earnings and our share of their dividends within
our cash flows. We continue to have board representation with one director on the KDP Board of Directors and have
retained certain additional governance rights.
Summary Financial Information for Equity Method Investments:
Summarized financial information related to our equity method investments is reflected below.
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Current assets $ 8,740 $ 6,313 
Noncurrent assets 71,375 71,949 
Total assets $ 80,115 $ 78,262 
Current liabilities $ 12,711 $ 11,105 
Noncurrent liabilities 26,671 27,204 
Total liabilities $ 39,382 $ 38,309 
Equity attributable to shareowners of investees $ 40,596 $ 39,798 
Equity attributable to noncontrolling interests 137 155 
Total net equity of investees $ 40,733 $ 39,953 
Mondelēz International ownership interests 5-50% 5-50%
Equity method investments $ 4,879 $ 5,289 
 (1)
92
Table of Contents
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Net revenues $ 23,518 $ 22,149 $ 20,112 
Gross profit 10,738 10,804 9,856 
Income from continuing operations 2,984 2,614 2,078 
Net income 2,984 2,614 2,078 
Net income attributable to investees $ 2,990 $ 2,618 $ 2,070 
Mondelēz International ownership interests 5-50% 5-50% 8-50%
Equity method investment net earnings $ 385 $ 393 $ 421 
(1)Includes a basis difference of approximately $419 million as of December 31, 2022 and $475 million as of December 31, 2021 between the U.S.
GAAP accounting basis for our equity method investments and the U.S. GAAP accounting basis of our investees’ equity.
Note 8. Restructuring Program
On May 6, 2014, our Board of Directors approved a $3.5 billion 2014-2018 restructuring program and up to $2.2 billion
of capital expenditures. On August 31, 2016, our Board of Directors approved a $600 million reallocation between
restructuring program cash costs and capital expenditures so the $5.7 billion program consisted of approximately $4.1
billion of restructuring program costs ($3.1 billion cash costs and $1.0 billion non-cash costs) and up to $1.6 billion of
capital expenditures. On September 6, 2018, our Board of Directors approved an extension of the restructuring
program through 2022, an increase of $1.3 billion in the program charges and an increase of $700 million in capital
expenditures. On October 21, 2021, our Board of Directors approved an extension of the restructuring program through
2023. The total $7.7 billion program now consists of $5.4 billion of program charges ($4.1 billion of cash costs and $1.3
billion of non-cash costs) and total capital expenditures of $2.3 billion to be incurred over the life of the program. The
current restructuring program, as increased and extended by these actions, is now called the Simplify to Grow
Program.
The primary objective of the Simplify to Grow Program is to reduce our operating cost structure in both our supply chain
and overhead costs. The program covers severance as well as asset disposals and other manufacturing and
procurement-related one-time costs. Since inception, we have incurred total restructuring and related implementation
charges of $5.1 billion related to the Simplify to Grow Program. We expect to incur the remainder of the program
charges by year-end 2023.
Restructuring Costs:
The Simplify to Grow Program liability activity for the years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021 was:
Severance
and related
costsAsset
Write-downs and
Other Total
 (in millions)
Liability Balance, January 1, 2021 $ 304 $ — $ 304 
Charges 86 68 154 
Cash spent (160) — (160)
Non-cash settlements/adjustments (5) (68) (73)
Currency (14) — (14)
Liability Balance, December 31, 2021 $ 211 $ — $ 211 
Charges 31 5 36 
Cash spent (69) (69)
Non-cash settlements/adjustments (3) (5) (8)
Currency (6) (6)
Liability balance, December 31, 2022 $ 164 $ — $ 164 
(1)Includes gains as a result of assets sold which are included in the restructuring program.
(2)We recorded restructuring charges of $36 million in 2022, $154 million in 2021 and $156 million in 2020 within asset impairment and exit costs
and benefit plan non-service income.(1)
 (2)
 (3)
(4)
(2)
 (3)
 (4)
(5)
93
Table of Contents
(3)We spent $69 million in 2022 and $160 million in 2021 in cash severance and related costs.
(4)In 2022, we recognized non-cash asset write-downs (including accelerated depreciation and other non-cash adjustments, including any gains on
sale of assets, primarily real estate, included in the restructuring program totaling $8 million. In 2021, we recognized non-cash asset write-downs
(including accelerated depreciation and asset impairments), non-cash pension settlement losses and other non-cash adjustments, partially offset
by gains on sale of assets, primarily real estate, included in the restructuring program totaling $73 million.
(5)At December 31, 2022, $126 million of our net restructuring liability was recorded within other current liabilities and $38 million was recorded
within other long-term liabilities.
Implementation Costs:
Implementation costs are directly attributable to restructuring activities; however, they do not qualify for special
accounting treatment as exit or disposal activities. We believe the disclosure of implementation costs provides readers
of our financial statements with more information on the total costs of our Simplify to Grow Program. Implementation
costs primarily relate to reorganizing our operations and facilities in connection with our supply chain reinvention
program and other identified productivity and cost saving initiatives. The costs include incremental expenses related to
the closure of facilities, costs to terminate certain contracts and the simplification of our information systems. Within our
continuing results of operations, we recorded implementation costs of $87 million in 2022, $167 million in 2021 and
$207 million in 2020. We recorded these costs within cost of sales and general corporate expense within selling,
general and administrative expenses.
Restructuring and Implementation Costs in Operating Income:
During 2022, 2021 and 2020, and since inception of the Simplify to Grow Program, we recorded the following
restructuring and implementation costs within segment operating income and earnings before income taxes:
 
Latin
America AMEA EuropeNorth
America Corporate Total
 (in millions)
For the Year Ended
December 31, 2022
Restructuring Costs $ (6)$ 13 $ 16 $ 12 $ 1 $ 36 
Implementation Costs 7 6 25 37 12 87 
Total $ 1 $ 19 $ 41 $ 49 $ 13 $ 123 
For the Year Ended
December 31, 2021
Restructuring Costs $ 7 $ (17)$ 4 $ 153 $ 7 $ 154 
Implementation Costs 9 10 33 97 18 167 
Total $ 16 $ (7)$ 37 $ 250 $ 25 $ 321 
For the Year Ended
December 31, 2020
Restructuring Costs $ 30 $ 23 $ 67 $ 23 $ 13 $ 156 
Implementation Costs 18 23 63 72 31 207 
Total $ 48 $ 46 $ 130 $ 95 $ 44 $ 363 
Total Project
(Inception to Date)
Restructuring Costs $ 548 $ 554 $ 1,163 $ 657 $ 150 $ 3,072 
Implementation Costs 303 245 569 590 368 2,075 
Total $ 851 $ 799 $ 1,732 $ 1,247 $ 518 $ 5,147 
94
Table of Contents
Note 9. Debt and Borrowing Arrangements
Short-Term Borrowings:
Our short-term borrowings and related weighted-average interest rates consisted of: 
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
Amount
OutstandingWeighted-
Average RateAmount
OutstandingWeighted-
Average Rate
(in millions) (in millions)
Commercial paper $ 2,209 4.7 %$ 192 0.2 %
Bank loans 90 9.1 % 24 8.6 %
Total short-term borrowings $ 2,299 $ 216 
Our uncommitted credit lines and committed credit lines available as of December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021
include:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
Facility Amount Borrowed Amount Facility Amount Borrowed Amount
(in millions)
Uncommitted credit facilities $ 1,335 $ 90 $ 1,367 $ 24 
Credit facility expiry :
February 23, 2022 — — 2,500 — 
February 22, 2023 2,500 — — — 
March 11, 2023 2,000 — — — 
February 27, 2024 — — 4,500 — 
July 29, 2025 2,000 2,000 — — 
February 23, 2027 4,500 — — — 
(1)We maintain a multi-year senior unsecured revolving credit facility for general corporate purposes, including working capital needs, and to support
our commercial paper program. The revolving credit agreement includes a covenant that we maintain a minimum shareholders' equity of at least
$25.0 billion, excluding accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses), the cumulative effects of any changes in accounting principles and
earnings/(losses) recognized in connection with the ongoing application of any mark-to-market accounting for pensions and other retirement
plans. At December 31, 2022, we complied with this covenant as our shareholders' equity, as defined by the covenant, was $37.8 billion. The
revolving credit facility also contains customary representations, covenants and events of default. There are no credit rating triggers, provisions or
other financial covenants that could require us to post collateral as security.
(2)Capitalizable financing costs are classified in long-term other assets and were immaterial for all periods presented.
(3)On July 11, 2022, we entered into a supplemental term loan credit facility that can be utilized for general corporate purposes, including
acquisitions. Under this agreement we may draw up to a total of $2.0 billion in term loans from the facility. The maturity dates of any loans drawn
under this facility will be eighteen months after the funding date of the applicable loan(s).
(4)On March 31, 2022, we entered into a supplemental term loan credit facility that can be utilized for general corporate purposes, including
acquisitions. Under this agreement we may draw up to a total of $2.0 billion in term loans from the facility. On July 29, 2022, we drew down $2.0
billion in term loans, due July 29, 2025, bearing interest at a variable annual rate based on SOFR plus an applicable margin.(1) (2)
(3)
(4)
95
Table of Contents
Long-Term Debt:
Our long-term debt consisted of (interest rates are as of December 31, 2022):
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
U.S. dollar notes and term loans, 0.750% to 7.000% (weighted-average effective rate
2.998%),
   due through 2050 $ 11,275 $ 9,280 
Euro notes, 0.000% to 2.375% (weighted-average effective rate 0.712%),
   due through 2041 7,666 8,134 
Pound sterling notes, 3.875% to 4.500% (weighted-average effective rate 4.151%),
   due through 2045 316 354 
Swiss franc notes, 0.615% to 1.125% (weighted-average effective rate 1.011%),
   due through 2025 638 811 
Canadian dollar notes, 3.250% (effective rate 3.377%),
   due through 2025 442 473 
Finance leases and other 297 244 
Total 20,634 19,296 
Less current portion of long-term debt (383) (1,746)
Long-term debt $ 20,251 $ 17,550 
(1) Amounts are shown net of unamortized premiums, discounts and bank fees of $(149) million and imputed interest on finance leases of
$(28) million, were (in millions):
Over the next five years, aggregate principal maturities, including finance leases, of our term loans and long-term debt
were (in millions):
 
2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter Total
$393 $2,041 $3,970 $1,149 $1,567 $11,691 $20,811
Tenders Offers:
During 2022, we completed a tender offer in cash and redeemed $987 million of long term U.S. dollar-denominated
notes for the following amounts (in millions):
Interest Rate Tender Date Maturity Date Amount Repurchased
3.625% March 2022 February 2026 $130
4.125% March 2022 May 2028 $211
2.750% March 2022 April 2030 $500
6.500% March 2022 November 2031 $17
7.000% March 2022 August 2037 $10
6.875% March 2022 February 2038 $21
6.875% March 2022 January 2039 $8
6.500% March 2022 February 2040 $36
4.625% March 2022 May 2048 $54
We recorded a $129 million loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses within interest and other expense, net,
consisting of $38 million paid in excess of carrying value of the debt and from recognizing unamortized discounts and
deferred financing costs in earnings and $91 million from recognizing unamortized forward starting swap losses in
earnings at the time of the debt extinguishment. The cash payments related to the debt extinguishment were classified
as cash outflows from financing activities in the consolidated statement of cash flows.(1)
96
Table of Contents
Debt Redemptions:
During 2022, we completed an early redemption of U.S. dollar denominated notes for the following amounts (in
millions):
Interest Rate Redemption Date Maturity Date Amount Redeemed USD Equivalent
0.625% March 2022 July 2022 $1,000 $1,000
During 2021 we completed an early redemption of euro and U.S. dollar denominated notes for the following amounts
(in millions):
Interest Rate Redemption Date Maturity Date Amount Redeemed USD Equivalent
2.000% September 2021 October 2021 $1,500 $1,500
3M LIBOR + 0.700% September 2021 October 2022 $500 $500
3M LIBOR + 0.800% September 2021 October 2024 $500 $500
1.000% March 2021 March 2022 €500 $587
1.625% March 2021 January 2023 €700 $821
2.125% March 2021 April 2023 $500 $500
4.000% March 2021 February 2024 $492 $492
We recorded an extinguishment loss of $137 million within interest and other expense, net related to $110 million paid
in excess of carrying value of the debt and from recognizing unamortized discounts and deferred financing in earnings
and $27 million foreign currency derivative loss related to the redemption at the time of the debt extinguishment. The
cash payments related to the redemption were classified as cash outflows from financing activities in the consolidated
statement of cash flows.
Debt Repayments:
During 2022, we repaid the following notes (in millions):
Interest Rate Maturity Date Amount USD Equivalent
2.125% September 2022 $500 $500
0.650% July 2022 Fr.150 $156
Various Various €381 $431
(1)Repaid by Mondelez International Holdings Netherlands B.V. ("MIHN"), a wholly owned Dutch subsidiary of Mondelēz International, Inc.
(2)On January 3, 2022, we closed on our acquisition of Chipita and assumed and entirely paid down €0.4 billion ($0.4 billion) of Chipita's debt
during the twelve months ended December 31, 2022.
During 2021, we repaid the following notes or term loans (in millions):
Interest Rate Maturity Date Amount USD Equivalent
0.625% December 2021 Fr.300 $327
2.375% January 2021 €679 827(1)
(2)
97
Table of Contents
Debt Issuances:
During 2022, we issued the following notes (in millions):
Issuance Date Interest Rate Maturity Date Gross ProceedsGross Proceeds USD
Equivalent
September 2022 4.250% September 2025 $500 $500
March 2022 2.125% March 2024 $500 $500
March 2022 2.625% March 2027 $750 $750
March 2022 3.000% March 2032 $750 $750
During 2021, we issued the following notes (in millions):
Issuance Date Interest Rate Maturity Date Gross ProceedsGross Proceeds USD
Equivalent
September 2021 0.750% September 2024 $500 $500
September 2021 1.250% September 2026 $350 $350
September 2021 0.000% September 2024 €300 $352
September 2021 0.250% September 2029 €650 $769
September 2021 0.625% September 2032 €650 $769
September 2021 1.250% September 2041 €700 $828
March 2021 0.250% March 2028 €750 $896
March 2021 0.750% March 2033 €600 $717
March 2021 1.375% March 2041 €650 $777
(1)Represents gross proceeds from the issuance of notes excluding debt issuance costs, discounts and premiums.
(2)Notes issued by Mondelez International Holdings Netherlands B.V. (“MIHN”), a wholly owned Dutch subsidiary of Mondelēz International, Inc.
(3)Issuance of exchangeable bonds that were issued at 102% of their principal amount and are redeemable for cash or existing ordinary shares of
JDE Peet's at our option (see Note 7, Equity Method Investments). Bondholders have an option to redeem bonds before maturity subject to
exchange periods. We have identified our option to settle in either cash or existing ordinary shares of JDE Peet's as an embedded derivative that
is bifurcated and accounted for separately from the bond. See Note 10, Financial Instruments.
(4)Issuance of green bonds where we have committed to allocate an amount equal to the €1.97 billion total net proceeds from the offering over time
to eligible projects that align with our sustainability priorities in the areas of building a thriving ingredient supply chain and reducing our
environmental impact.
Fair Value of Our Debt:
The fair value of our short-term borrowings reflects current market interest rates and approximates the amounts we
have recorded on our consolidated balance sheets. The fair value of our term loans was determined using quoted
prices for similar instruments in markets that are not active (Level 2 valuation data) and approximates the amounts we
have recorded on our consolidated balance sheets. The fair value of our long-term debt was determined using quoted
prices in active markets (Level 1 valuation data) for the publicly traded debt obligations.
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
(in millions)
Fair Value $ 20,217 $ 20,249 
Carrying Value $ 22,933 $ 19,512  (1)
(2)
 (1)
(2)
(2)
(2) (3)
(2) (4)
(2) (4)
(2) (4)
98
Table of Contents
Interest and Other Expense, net:
Interest and other expense, net within our results of continuing operations consisted of:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Interest expense, debt $ 428 $ 365 $ 423 
Loss on debt extinguishment and related expenses 129 137 185 
Loss related to interest rate swaps — — 103 
Other income, net (134) (55) (103)
Interest and other expense, net $ 423 $ 447 $ 608 
Note 10. Financial Instruments
Fair Value of Derivative Instruments:
Derivative instruments were recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets as follows:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
Asset
DerivativesLiability
DerivativesAsset
DerivativesLiability
Derivatives
 (in millions)
Derivatives designated as
accounting hedges:
Interest rate contracts $ 132 $ 35 $ 27 $ 17 
Net investment hedge derivative contracts 265 241 117 45 
$ 397 $ 276 $ 144 $ 62 
Derivatives not designated as
   accounting hedges:
Currency exchange contracts $ 185 $ 103 $ 156 $ 40 
Commodity contracts 200 247 387 137 
Interest rate contracts 8 — — — 
Equity method investment contracts — 3 — 3 
$ 393 $ 353 $ 543 $ 180 
Total fair value $ 790 $ 629 $ 687 $ 242 
(1)Net investment hedge contracts consist of cross-currency interest rate swaps and forward contracts. We also designate some of our non-U.S.
dollar denominated debt to hedge a portion of our net investments in our non-U.S. operations. This debt is not reflected in the table above, but is
included in long-term debt discussed in Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements. Both net investment hedge derivative contracts and non-U.S.
dollar denominated debt acting as net investment hedges are also disclosed in the Derivative Volume table and the Hedges of Net Investments in
International Operations section appearing later in this footnote.
(2)Equity method investment contracts consist of the bifurcated embedded derivative option that was a component of the September 20, 2021
€300 million exchangeable bonds issuance. Refer to Note 9, Debt and Borrowing Arrangements.
Derivatives designated as accounting hedges above include cash flow and net investment hedge derivative contracts.
Our currency exchange, commodity derivative and equity method investment contracts are economic hedges that are
not designated as accounting hedges. We record derivative assets and liabilities on a gross basis on our consolidated
balance sheets. The fair value of our asset derivatives is recorded within other current assets and other assets and the
fair value of our liability derivatives is recorded within other current liabilities and other liabilities.(1)
(2)
99
Table of Contents
The fair values (asset/(liability)) of our derivative instruments were determined using:
 As of December 31, 2022
Total
Fair Value of Net
Asset/(Liability)Quoted Prices in
Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
 (in millions)
Currency exchange contracts $ 82 $ — $ 82 $ — 
Commodity contracts (47) (35) (12) — 
Interest rate contracts 105 — 105 — 
Net investment hedge contracts 24 — 24 — 
Equity method investment contracts (3) — (3) — 
Total derivatives $ 161 $ (35)$ 196 $ — 
 As of December 31, 2021
 Total
Fair Value of Net
Asset/(Liability)Quoted Prices in
Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
 (in millions)
Currency exchange contracts $ 116 $ — $ 116 $ — 
Commodity contracts 251 161 90 — 
Interest rate contracts 10 — 10 — 
Net investment hedge contracts 71 — 71 — 
Equity method investment contracts (3) — (3) — 
Total derivatives $ 445 $ 161 $ 284 $ — 
Level 1 financial assets and liabilities consist of exchange-traded commodity futures and listed options. The fair value
of these instruments is determined based on quoted market prices on commodity exchanges.
Level 2 financial assets and liabilities consist primarily of over-the-counter (“OTC”) currency exchange forwards,
options and swaps; commodity forwards and options; net investment hedge contracts; and interest rate swaps. Our
currency exchange contracts are valued using an income approach based on observable market forward rates less the
contract rate multiplied by the notional amount. Commodity derivatives are valued using an income approach based on
the observable market commodity index prices less the contract rate multiplied by the notional amount or based on
pricing models that rely on market observable inputs such as commodity prices. Our bifurcated exchange options are
valued, as derivative instrument liabilities, using the Black-Scholes option pricing model. This model requires
assumptions related to the market price of the underlying note and associated credit spread combined with the share of
price, expected dividend yield, and expected volatility of the JDE Peet’s shares over the life of the option. Our
calculation of the fair value of interest rate swaps is derived from a discounted cash flow analysis based on the terms of
the contract and the observable market interest rate curve. Our calculation of the fair value of financial instruments
takes into consideration the risk of nonperformance, including counterparty credit risk. Our OTC derivative transactions
are governed by International Swap Dealers Association agreements and other standard industry contracts. Under
these agreements, we do not post nor require collateral from our counterparties. The majority of our derivative
contracts do not have a legal right of set-off. We manage the credit risk in connection with these and all our derivatives
by entering into transactions with counterparties with investment grade credit ratings, limiting the amount of exposure
with each counterparty and monitoring the financial condition of our counterparties.
100
Table of Contents
Derivative Volume:
The gross notional values of our derivative instruments were:
 Notional Amount
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Currency exchange contracts:
Intercompany loans and forecasted interest payments $ 2,085 $ 1,891 
Forecasted transactions 5,470 4,831 
Commodity contracts 12,131 9,694 
Interest rate contracts 4,147 1,850 
Net investment hedges:
Net investment hedge derivative contracts 7,319 3,915 
Non-U.S. dollar debt designated as net investment hedges
Euro notes 3,410 3,622 
British pound sterling notes — 356 
Swiss franc notes 638 811 
Canadian dollar notes 443 475 
Cash Flow Hedges:
Cash flow hedge activity, net of taxes, within accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses) included:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Accumulated (loss)/gain at beginning of period $ (148)$ (161)$ (213)
Transfer of realized (gains)/losses in fair value to earnings (39) (155) 161 
Unrealized gain/(loss) in fair value 153 168 (109)
Accumulated (loss)/gain at end of period $ (34)$ (148)$ (161)
After-tax gains/(losses) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses) into net earnings were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Currency exchange contracts - forecasted transactions $ (8)$ — $ — 
Interest rate contracts $ 47 $ 155 $ (161)
Total $ 39 $ 155 $ (161)
After-tax gains/(losses) recognized in other comprehensive earnings/(losses) were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Currency exchange contracts – forecasted transactions $ 8 $ — $ (2)
Interest rate contracts 145 168 (107)
Total $ 153 $ 168 $ (109)
Cash flow hedge ineffectiveness was immaterial for all periods presented.
101
Table of Contents
We record pre-tax (i) gains or losses reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses) into
earnings, (ii) gains or losses on ineffectiveness and (iii) gains or losses on amounts excluded from effectiveness testing
in interest and other expense, net for interest rate contracts.
Based on current market conditions, we would expect to transfer losses of $7 million (net of taxes) for interest rate cash
flow hedges to earnings during the next 12 months.
Cash Flow Hedge Coverage:
As of December 31, 2022, our longest dated cash flow hedges were interest rate swaps that hedge forecasted interest
rate payments over the next 3 years, 8 months.
Hedges of Net Investments in International Operations:
Net investment hedge (“NIH”) derivative contracts:
We enter into cross-currency interest rate swaps and forwards to hedge certain investments in our non-U.S. operations
against movements in exchange rates. As of December 31, 2022, the aggregate notional value of these NIH derivative
contracts was $7.3 billion and their impact on other comprehensive earnings and net earnings during the years
presented below were as follows:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
After-tax gain/(loss) on NIH contracts $ 396 $ 63 $ (221)
(1)Amounts recorded for unsettled and settled NIH derivative contracts are recorded in the cumulative translation adjustment within other
comprehensive earnings. The cash flows from the settled contracts are reported within other investing activities in the consolidated statement of
cash flows.
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Amounts excluded from the assessment of
   hedge effectiveness $ 116 $ 75 $ 117 
(1)We elected to record changes in the fair value of amounts excluded from the assessment of effectiveness in net earnings within interest and other
expense, net.
Non-U.S. dollar debt designated as net investment hedges:
After-tax gains/(losses) related to hedges of net investments in international operations in the form of euro, British
pound sterling, Swiss franc and Canadian dollar-denominated debt were recorded within the cumulative translation
adjustment section of other comprehensive income and were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Euro notes $ 162 $ 211 $ (251)
British pound sterling notes 45 3 (8)
Swiss franc notes 13 29 (82)
Canadian notes 25 (3) (7)(1)
(1)
102
Table of Contents
Economic Hedges:
Pre-tax gains/(losses) recorded in net earnings for economic hedges were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,Recognized
in Earnings  2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)  
Currency exchange contracts:
   Intercompany loans and
      forecasted interest payments $ (14)$ 57 $ (70)Interest and other
expense, net
   Forecasted transactions 117 80 41 Cost of sales
   Forecasted transactions 17 (1) (4)Interest and other
expense, net
   Forecasted transactions (1) — (1)Selling, general
and administrative
expenses
Commodity contracts 157 385 4 Cost of sales
Equity method investment contracts — 2 — Gain on equity method
investment contracts
Total $ 276 $ 523 $ (30)
Fair Value of Contingent Consideration
The following is a summary of our contingent consideration liability activity:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Liability at the beginning of the period $ 159 $ 55 $ 14 
Contingent consideration arising from acquisitions 440 145 17 
Changes in fair value 44 (41) 24 
Currency (1) — — 
Liability at the end of the period $ 642 $ 159 $ 55 
Contingent consideration was recorded at fair value in the condensed consolidated balance sheets as follows:
 As of December 31, 2022
 Total Fair Value of
LiabilityQuoted Prices in
Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
 (in millions)
Clif Bar $ 452 $ — $ — $ 452 
Other 190 — — 190 
Total contingent consideration $ 642 $ — $ — $ 642 (1)
(2)
103
Table of Contents
 As of December 31, 2021
 Total Fair Value of
LiabilityQuoted Prices in
Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
 (in millions)
Other $ 159 $ — $ — $ 159 
Total contingent consideration $ 159 $ — $ — $ 159 
(1)In connection with the Clif Bar acquisition, we entered into a contingent consideration arrangement that may require us to pay additional
consideration to the sellers for achieving certain net revenue, gross profit and EBITDA targets in 2025 and 2026 that exceed our base financial
projections for the business implied in the upfront purchase price. The other contingent consideration liabilities are recorded at fair value with
$452 million classified as long term liabilities at December 31, 2022. The estimated fair value of the contingent consideration obligation at the
acquisition date was determined using a Monte Carlo simulation and recorded in other liabilities. Significant assumptions used in assessing the
fair value of the liability include financial projections for net revenue, gross profit, and EBITDA, as well as discount and volatility rates. Fair value
adjustments are primarily recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses in the condensed consolidated statement of earnings. Refer
to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures for additional information.
(2)The other contingent consideration liabilities are recorded at fair value, with $102 million classified as other current liabilities at December 31,
2022 and $88 million and $159 million classified as long term liabilities at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021. The estimated fair value
of this contingent consideration was determined using a Monte Carlo valuation model based on Level 3 inputs, including management's latest
estimate of forecasted future results. Other key assumptions included discount rate and volatility. Fair value adjustments are recorded in selling,
general and administrative expenses in the condensed consolidated statement of earnings. Refer to Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures for
additional information.
Note 11. Benefit Plans
Pension Plans
Obligations and Funded Status:
The projected benefit obligations, plan assets and funded status of our pension plans were:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 2022 2021 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Projected benefit obligation at January 1 $ 1,729 $ 1,887 $ 10,821 $ 11,658 
Service cost 5 6 88 137 
Interest cost 51 42 172 130 
Benefits paid (39) (31) (461) (533)
Settlements paid (71) (113) — — 
Actuarial (gains)/losses (482) (63) (2,844) (269)
Acquisitions — — 18 — 
Currency — — (957) (308)
Other — 1 41 6 
Projected benefit obligation at December 31 1,193 1,729 6,878 10,821 
Fair value of plan assets at January 1 1,826 1,959 11,021 10,972 
Actual return on plan assets (455) 1 (2,388) 548 
Contributions 4 10 211 292 
Benefits paid (39) (31) (461) (533)
Settlements paid (71) (113) — — 
Currency — — (992) (258)
Other — — (2) — 
Fair value of plan assets at December 31 1,265 1,826 7,389 11,021 
Net pension assets at December 31 $ 72 $ 97 $ 511 $ 200 (2)
104
Table of Contents
The accumulated benefit obligation, which represents benefits earned to the measurement date, for U.S. pension plans
was $1.2 billion at December 31, 2022 and $1.7 billion at December 31, 2021. The accumulated benefit obligation for
non-U.S. pension plans was $6.8 billion at December 31, 2022 and $10.7 billion at December 31, 2021.
The actuarial (gain) loss for all pension plans in 2022 and 2021 was primarily related to a change in the discount rate
used to measure the benefit obligations of those plans.
The combined U.S. and non-U.S. pension plans resulted in a net pension asset of $583 million at December 31, 2022
and a net pension asset of $297 million at December 31, 2021. We recognized these amounts in our consolidated
balance sheets as follows:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Prepaid pension assets $ 1,016 $ 1,009 
Other current liabilities (30) (31)
Accrued pension costs (403) (681)
$ 583 $ 297 
Certain of our U.S. and non-U.S. plans are underfunded with accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets.
For these plans, the projected benefit obligations, accumulated benefit obligations and the fair value of plan assets
were:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 As of December 31, As of December 31,
 2022 2021 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Projected benefit obligation $ 31 $ 42 $ 531 $ 1,889 
Accumulated benefit obligation 31 42 492 1,805 
Fair value of plan assets 2 3 135 1,223 
We used the following weighted-average assumptions to determine our benefit obligations under the pension plans:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 As of December 31, As of December 31,
 2022 2021 2022 2021
Discount rate 5.55 % 3.01 % 4.51 % 1.73 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.25 % 4.50 % 5.41 % 3.44 %
Rate of compensation increase 4.00 % 4.00 % 3.22 % 2.83 %
Year-end discount rates for our U.S., Canadian, Eurozone and U.K. plans were developed from a model portfolio of
high quality, fixed-income debt instruments with durations that match the expected future cash flows of the benefit
obligations. Year-end discount rates for our remaining non-U.S. plans were developed from local bond indices that
match local benefit obligations as closely as possible. Changes in our discount rates were primarily the result of
changes in bond yields year-over-year. We determine our expected rate of return on plan assets from the plan assets’
historical long-term investment performance, current asset allocation and estimates of future long-term returns by asset
class.
For the periods presented, we measure service and interest costs by applying the specific spot rates along a yield
curve used to measure plan obligations to the plans’ liability cash flows. We believe this approach provides a more
precise measurement of service and interest costs by aligning the timing of the plans’ liability cash flows to the
corresponding spot rates on the yield curve.
105
Table of Contents
Components of Net Periodic Pension Cost:
Net periodic pension cost consisted of the following:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 For the Years Ended December 31, For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Service cost $ 5 $ 6 $ 6 $ 88 $ 137 $ 121 
Interest cost 51 42 49 172 130 149 
Expected return on plan assets (79) (72) (77) (353) (419) (400)
Amortization:
Net loss/(gain) 6 17 17 57 130 118 
Prior service cost/(benefit) 1 1 1 (2) (6) (7)
Curtailment expense/(credit) — — — 8 (17) — 
Settlement losses and other expenses 14 19 18 2 3 4 
Net periodic pension cost $ (2)$ 13 $ 14 $ (28)$ (42)$ (15)
 
(1)During the third quarter of 2021, we terminated our Defined Benefit Pension Scheme in Nigeria. During the second quarter of 2021, we made a
decision to freeze our Defined Benefit Pension Scheme in the United Kingdom. As a result, we recognized curtailment credits of ($17 million) in
2021 recorded within benefit plan non-service income. In connection with the United Kingdom plan freeze, we also incurred incentive payment
charges and other expenses of $48 million in 2021 included in operating income.
For the U.S. plans, we determine the expected return on plan assets component of net periodic benefit cost using a
calculated market return value that recognizes the cost over a four-year period. For our non-U.S. plans, we utilize a
similar approach with varying cost recognition periods for some plans, and with others, we determine the expected
return on plan assets based on asset fair values as of the measurement date.
We used the following weighted-average assumptions to determine our net periodic pension cost:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 For the Years Ended December 31, For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Discount rate 3.01 % 2.73 % 3.44 % 1.74 % 1.33 % 1.74 %
Expected rate of return
on plan assets 4.50 % 4.50 % 5.00 % 3.44 % 3.90 % 4.20 %
Rate of compensation increase 4.00 % 4.00 % 4.00 % 2.84 % 3.16 % 3.17 %(1)
106
Table of Contents
Plan Assets:
The fair value of pension plan assets was determined using the following fair value measurements:
 As of December 31, 2022
Asset CategoryTotal Fair
ValueQuoted Prices
in Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
 (in millions)
U.S. equity securities $ 3 $ 3 $ — $ — 
Non-U.S. equity securities 1 1 — — 
Pooled funds - equity securities 960 906 54 — 
Total equity securities 964 910 54 — 
Government bonds 2,495 48 2,447 — 
Pooled funds - fixed-income securities 560 453 107 — 
Corporate bonds and other
   fixed-income securities 2,296 144 612 1,540 
Total fixed-income securities 5,351 645 3,166 1,540 
Real estate 221 152 — 69 
Private equity 4 — — 4 
Cash 4 3 — 1 
Other 102 97 5 — 
Total assets in the fair value hierarchy $ 6,646 $ 1,807 $ 3,225 $ 1,614 
Investments measured at net asset value 1,892 
Total investments at fair value $ 8,538 
 As of December 31, 2021
Asset CategoryTotal Fair
ValueQuoted Prices
in Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
 (in millions)
U.S. equity securities $ 4 $ 4 $ — $ — 
Non-U.S. equity securities 3 3 — — 
Pooled funds - equity securities 1,545 1,084 461 — 
Total equity securities 1,552 1,091 461 — 
Government bonds 3,777 56 3,721 — 
Pooled funds - fixed-income securities 648 449 199 — 
Corporate bonds and other
   fixed-income securities 3,943 139 1,415 2,389 
Total fixed-income securities 8,368 644 5,335 2,389 
Real estate 251 179 — 72 
Private equity 4 — — 4 
Cash 5 4 — 1 
Other 162 157 5 — 
Total assets in the fair value hierarchy $ 10,342 $ 2,075 $ 5,801 $ 2,466 
Investments measured at net asset value 2,382 
Total investments at fair value $ 12,724 
We excluded plan assets of $117 million at December 31, 2022 and $124 million at December 31, 2021 from the above
tables related to certain insurance contracts as they are reported at contract value, in accordance with authoritative
guidance.
107
Table of Contents
Fair value measurements
•Level 1 – includes primarily U.S and non-U.S. equity securities and government bonds valued using quoted prices
in active markets.
•Level 2 – includes primarily pooled funds, including assets in real estate pooled funds, valued using net asset
values of participation units held in common collective trusts, as reported by the managers of the trusts and as
supported by the unit prices of actual purchase and sale transactions. Level 2 plan assets also include corporate
bonds and other fixed-income securities, valued using independent observable market inputs, such as matrix
pricing, yield curves and indices.
•Level 3 – includes investments valued using unobservable inputs that reflect the plans’ assumptions that market
participants would use in pricing the assets, based on the best information available.
•Fair value estimates for pooled funds are calculated by the investment advisor when reliable quotations or
pricing services are not readily available for certain underlying securities. The estimated value is based on
either cost or last sale price for most of the securities valued in this fashion.
•Fair value estimates for private equity investments are calculated by the general partners using the market
approach to estimate the fair value of private investments. The market approach utilizes prices and other
relevant information generated by market transactions, type of security, degree of liquidity, restrictions on the
disposition, latest round of financing data, company financial statements, relevant valuation multiples and
discounted cash flow analyses.
•Fair value estimates for private debt placements are calculated using standardized valuation methods,
including but not limited to income-based techniques such as discounted cash flow projections or market-based
techniques utilizing public and private transaction multiples as comparables.
•Fair value estimates for real estate investments are calculated by investment managers using the present
value of future cash flows expected to be received from the investments, based on valuation methodologies
such as appraisals, local market conditions, and current and projected operating performance.
•Fair value estimates for fixed-income securities that are buy-in annuity policies are calculated on a replacement
policy value basis by discounting the projected cash flows of the plan members using a discount rate based on
risk-free rates and adjustments for estimated levels of insurer pricing.
•Net asset value – primarily includes equity funds, fixed income funds, real estate funds, hedge funds and private
equity investments for which net asset values are normally used.
Changes in our Level 3 plan assets, which are recorded in other comprehensive earnings/(losses), included:
Asset CategoryJanuary 1,
2022
BalanceNet Realized
and Unrealized
Gains/
(Losses)Net Purchases,
Issuances and
SettlementsNet Transfers
Into/(Out of)
Level 3Currency
ImpactDecember 31,
2022
Balance
 (in millions)
Corporate bond and other
   fixed-income securities$ 2,387 $ (450)$ (148)$ — $ (249)$ 1,540 
Real estate 74 3 (1) — (6) 70 
Private equity and other 5 — — — (1) 4 
Total Level 3
investments $ 2,466 $ (447)$ (149)$ — $ (256)$ 1,614 
Asset CategoryJanuary 1,
2021
BalanceNet Realized
and Unrealized
Gains/
(Losses)Net Purchases,
Issuances and
SettlementsNet Transfers
Into/(Out of)
Level 3Currency
ImpactDecember 31,
2021
Balance
 (in millions)
Corporate bond and other
   fixed-income securities$ 1,791 $ (178)$ 784 $ — $ (10)$ 2,387 
Real estate 70 7 1 — (4) 74 
Private equity and other 4 1 — — — 5 
Total Level 3
investments $ 1,865 $ (170)$ 785 $ — $ (14)$ 2,466 
The decrease in level 3 pension plan investments during 2022 was related to rising bond yields, benefits paid and
currency impact. The increase in Level 3 pension plan investments during 2021 was primarily due to purchases of
corporate bond, annuity contracts and other fixed income securities.
108
Table of Contents
The percentage of fair value of pension plan assets was:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 As of December 31, As of December 31,
Asset Category 2022 2021 2022 2021
Equity securities 15% 15% 16% 17%
Fixed-income securities 85% 85% 63% 62%
Real estate — — 3% 3%
Buy-in annuity policies — — 17% 17%
Cash — — 1% 1%
Total 100% 100% 100% 100%
For our U.S. plans, our investment strategy is to reduce our funded status risk in part through appropriate asset
allocation within our plan assets. We attempt to maintain our target asset allocation by rebalancing between asset
classes as we make monthly benefit payments. The strategy involves using indexed U.S. equity and international
equity securities and actively managed U.S. investment grade fixed-income securities (which constitute 95% or more of
fixed-income securities) with smaller allocations to high yield fixed-income securities.
For our non-U.S. plans, the investment strategy is subject to local regulations and the asset/liability profiles of the plans
in each individual country. In aggregate, the asset allocation targets of our non-U.S. plans are broadly characterized as
a mix of approximately 15% equity securities, 61% fixed-income securities, 20% buy-in annuity policies and 4% real
estate.
Employer Contributions:
In 2022, we contributed $4 million to our U.S. pension plans and $190 million to our non-U.S. pension plans. In
addition, employees contributed $21 million to our non-U.S. plans. We make contributions to our pension plans in
accordance with local funding arrangements and statutory minimum funding requirements. Discretionary contributions
are made to the extent that they are tax deductible and do not generate an excise tax liability. In 2023, we estimate that
our pension contributions will be $6 million to our U.S. plans and $119 million to our non-U.S. plans based on current
tax laws. Our actual contributions may be different due to many factors, including changes in tax and other benefit laws,
significant differences between expected and actual pension asset performance or interest rates.
Future Benefit Payments:
The estimated future benefit payments from our pension plans at December 31, 2022 were (in millions):
 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028-2032
U.S. Plans $147 $89 $92 $91 $90 $442
Non-U.S. Plans 404 395 401 414 419 2,157
Multiemployer Pension Plans:
In accordance with obligations we have under collective bargaining agreements, we made contributions to
multiemployer pension plans for continuing participation and these amounts were not material. Our contributions are
based on our contribution rates under our collective bargaining agreements, the number of our eligible employees and
fund surcharges.
On July 11, 2019, we received an undiscounted withdrawal liability assessment from the Fund totaling $526 million
requiring pro-rata monthly payments over 20 years. We began making monthly payments during the third quarter of
2019. Within selling, general and administrative expenses, we recorded a $35 million ($26 million net of tax) adjustment
related to the discounted withdrawal liability. Within interest and other expense, net, we recorded accreted interest of
$11 million in 2022, $11 million in 2021 and $11 million in 2020. As of December 31, 2022, the remaining discounted
withdrawal liability was $344 million, with $15 million recorded in other current liabilities and $329 million recorded in
long-term other liabilities.
109
Table of Contents
Other Costs:
We sponsor and contribute to employee defined contribution plans. These plans cover eligible salaried, non-union and
union employees. Our contributions and costs are determined by the matching of employee contributions, as defined by
the plans. Amounts charged to expense in continuing operations for defined contribution plans totaled $66 million in
2022, $73 million in 2021 and $83 million in 2020.
Postretirement Benefit Plans
Obligations:
Our postretirement health care plans are not funded. The changes in and the amount of the accrued benefit obligation
were:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Accrued benefit obligation at January 1 $ 317 $ 361 
Service cost 2 4 
Interest cost 9 8 
Benefits paid (15) (15)
Plan amendments — (1)
Currency (5) (1)
Actuarial losses/(gains) (75) (39)
Accrued benefit obligation at December 31 $ 233 $ 317 
The current portion of our accrued postretirement benefit obligation of $16 million at December 31, 2022 and $16
million at December 31, 2021 was included in other current liabilities.
The actuarial (gain) for all postretirement plans in 2021 and 2022 was driven by gains related to assumption changes
partially offset by losses related to a change in the discount rate used to measure the benefit obligations of those plans.
We used the following weighted-average assumptions to determine our postretirement benefit obligations:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 As of December 31, As of December 31,
 2022 2021 2022 2021
Discount rate 5.53 % 2.96 % 6.07 % 3.81 %
Health care cost trend rate assumed for next year 7.00 % 5.50 % 5.98 % 5.72 %
Ultimate trend rate 5.00 % 5.00 % 4.70 % 4.47 %
Year that the rate reaches the ultimate trend rate 2031 2024 2040 2040
Year-end discount rates for our U.S., Canadian and U.K. plans were developed from a model portfolio of high quality,
fixed-income debt instruments with durations that match the expected future cash flows of the benefit obligations. Year-
end discount rates for our remaining non-U.S. plans were developed from local bond indices that match local benefit
obligations as closely as possible. Changes in our discount rates were primarily the result of changes in bond yields
year-over-year. Our expected health care cost trend rate is based on historical costs.
For the periods presented, we measure service and interest costs for other postretirement benefits by applying the
specific spot rates along a yield curve used to measure plan obligations to the plans’ liability cash flows. We believe this
approach provides a good measurement of service and interest costs by aligning the timing of the plans’ liability cash
flows to the corresponding spot rates on the yield curve.
110
Table of Contents
Components of Net Periodic Postretirement Health Care Costs:
Net periodic postretirement health care costs consisted of the following:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Service cost $ 2 $ 4 $ 5 
Interest cost 9 8 12 
Amortization:
Net loss/(gain) 1 2 7 
Prior service credit — — (30)
Net periodic postretirement health care costs/(benefit) $ 12 $ 14 $ (6)
We used the following weighted-average assumptions to determine our net periodic postretirement health care cost:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 For the Years Ended December 31, For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Discount rate 2.96% 2.68% 3.41% 3.81% 3.35% 3.86%
Health care cost trend rate 5.50% 5.75% 6.00% 5.72% 5.66% 5.42%
Future Benefit Payments:
Our estimated future benefit payments for our postretirement health care plans at December 31, 2022 were (in
millions):
 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028-2032
U.S. Plans $11 $12 $11 $11 $11 $49
Non-U.S. Plans 4 5 5 5 5 28
Other Costs:
We made contributions to multiemployer medical plans totaling $17 million in 2022, $19 million in 2021 and $20 million
in 2020. These plans provide medical benefits to active employees and retirees under certain collective bargaining
agreements.
Postemployment Benefit Plans
Obligations:
Our postemployment plans are not funded. The changes in and the amount of the accrued benefit obligation at
December 31, 2022 and 2021 were:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Accrued benefit obligation at January 1 $ 56 $ 65 
Service cost 4 6 
Interest cost 2 3 
Benefits paid (14) (12)
Actuarial losses/(gains) (1) (6)
Accrued benefit obligation at December 31 $ 47 $ 56 
111
Table of Contents
The accrued benefit obligation was determined using a weighted-average discount rate of 6.3% in 2022 and 4.3% in
2021, an assumed weighted-average ultimate annual turnover rate of 0.4% in 2022 and 2021, assumed compensation
cost increases of 4.0% in 2022 and 2021 and assumed benefits as defined in the respective plans.
Postemployment costs arising from actions that offer employees benefits in excess of those specified in the respective
plans are charged to expense when incurred.
Components of Net Periodic Postemployment Costs:
Net periodic postemployment costs consisted of the following:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Service cost $ 4 $ 6 $ 6 
Interest cost 2 3 3 
Amortization of net gains (6) (4) (2)
Net periodic postemployment costs $ — $ 5 $ 7 
As of December 31, 2022, the estimated net gain for the postemployment benefit plans that we expect to amortize from
accumulated other comprehensive earnings/(losses) into net periodic postemployment costs during 2023 is
approximately $3 million.
Note 12. Stock Plans
Under our Amended and Restated 2005 Performance Incentive Plan (the “2005 Plan”), we are authorized through
May 21, 2024 to issue a maximum of 243.7 million shares of our Class A common stock (“Common Stock”) to
employees and non-employee directors. As of December 31, 2022, there were 45.5 million shares available to be
granted under the 2005 Plan.
Stock Options:
We recorded compensation expense related to stock options held by our employees of $20 million in 2022, $23 million
in 2021 and $28 million in 2020 in our results from continuing operations. The deferred tax benefit recorded related to
this compensation expense was $3 million in 2022, $4 million in 2021 and $5 million in 2020. The unamortized
compensation expense related to our employee stock options was $21 million at December 31, 2022 and is expected
to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.6 years.
Our weighted-average Black-Scholes Model fair value assumptions were:
 Risk-Free
Interest Rate Expected LifeExpected
VolatilityExpected
Dividend YieldFair Value
at Grant Date
2022 1.87% 5 years 22.05% 2.13% $11.24
2021 0.57% 5 years 23.45% 2.20% $9.08
2020 1.34% 5 years 19.64% 2.06% $8.61
The risk-free interest rate represents the constant maturity U.S. government treasuries rate with a remaining term equal
to the expected life of the options. The expected life is the period over which our employees are expected to hold their
options. Volatility reflects historical movements in our stock price for a period commensurate with the expected life of
the options. The dividend yield reflects the dividend yield in place at the time of the historical grants.
112
Table of Contents
Stock option activity is reflected below:
Shares Subject
to OptionWeighted-
Average
Exercise or
Grant Price
Per ShareAverage
Remaining
Contractual
TermAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
Balance at January 1, 2020 33,855,948 $ 36.19 $ 640  million
Annual grant to eligible employees 2,280,440 59.04 
Additional options issued 136,360 49.48 
Total options granted 2,416,800 58.50 
Options exercised (7,847,964) 30.55 $ 205  million
Options cancelled (672,890) 44.94 
Balance at December 31, 2020 27,751,894 39.51 $ 527  million
Annual grant to eligible employees 2,412,710 56.13 
Additional options issued 160,640 58.17 
Total options granted 2,573,350 56.26 
Options exercised (6,249,330) 33.68 $ 169  million
Options cancelled (572,155) 49.65 
Balance at December 31, 2021 23,503,759 42.65 $ 556  million
Annual grant to eligible employees 2,180,540 64.65 
Additional options issued 63,490 64.39 
Total options granted 2,244,030 64.64 
Options exercised (4,780,086) 35.96 $ 142  million
Options cancelled (477,453) 55.89 
Balance at December 31, 2022 20,490,250 46.31 5 years $ 417  million
Exercisable at December 31, 2022 16,350,018 42.62 4 years $ 393  million
 
(1)Cash received from options exercised was $158 million in 2022, $206 million in 2021 and $236 million in 2020. The actual tax benefit realized and
recorded in the provision for income taxes for the tax deductions from the option exercises totaled $22 million in 2022, $24 million in 2021 and
$27 million in 2020.
Deferred Stock Units, Performance Share Units and Other Stock-Based Awards:
We recorded compensation expense related to DSUs, PSUs and other stock-based awards of $100 million in 2022,
$98 million in 2021 and $98 million in 2020 in our results from continuing operations. The deferred tax benefit recorded
related to this compensation expense was $17 million in 2022, $16 million in 2021 and $15 million in 2020. The
unamortized compensation expense related to our DSUs, PSUs and other stock-based awards was $113 million at
December 31, 2022 and is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 0.9 years.(1)
(1)
(1)
113
Table of Contents
Our PSU, DSU and other stock-based award activity is reflected below:
Number
of Shares Grant DateWeighted-Average
Fair Value
Per Share (4)Weighted-Average
Aggregate
Fair Value (3)
Balance at January 1, 2020 5,661,945 $ 46.90 
Annual grant to eligible employees: Feb. 20, 2020
Performance share units 825,230 65.83 
Deferred stock units 545,550 59.04 
Additional shares granted 390,730 Various 56.90 
Total shares granted 1,761,510 61.75 $ 109  million
Vested (2,051,054) 42.87 $ 88  million
Forfeited (475,411) 48.24 
Balance at December 31, 2020 4,896,990 53.80 
Annual grant to eligible employees: Feb. 18, 2021
Performance share units 903,250 59.35 
Deferred stock units 550,090 56.13 
Additional shares granted 1,163,644 Various 53.76 
Total shares granted 2,616,984 56.19 $ 147  million
Vested (2,459,427) 49.59 $ 122  million
Forfeited (386,501) 57.52 
Balance at December 31, 2021 4,668,046 57.04 
Annual grant to eligible employees: Feb. 24, 2022
Performance share units 806,590 61.87 
Deferred stock units 505,090 64.65 
Additional shares granted 836,117 Various 59.37 
Total shares granted 2,147,797 61.55 $ 132  million
Vested (1,925,556) 54.13 $ 104  million
Forfeited (438,613) 60.68 
Balance at December 31, 2022 4,451,674 60.12 
(1)Includes PSUs and DSUs.
(2)Includes PSUs, DSUs and other stock-based awards.
(3)The actual tax benefit realized and recorded in the provision for income taxes for the tax deductions from the shares vested totaled $5 million in
2022, $6 million in 2021 and $5 million in 2020.
(4)The grant date fair value of PSUs is determined based on the Monte Carlo simulation model for the market-based total shareholder return
component and the closing market price of the Company’s stock on the grant date for performance-based components. The Monte Carlo
simulation model incorporates the probability of achieving the total shareholder return market condition. Compensation expense is recognized
using the grant date fair values regardless of whether the market condition is achieved, so long as the requisite service has been provided.(1)
(2) (3)
(2)
(1)
(2) (3)
(2)
(1)
(2) (3)
(2)
114
Table of Contents
Note 13. Capital Stock
Our amended and restated articles of incorporation authorize 5.0 billion shares of Common Stock and 500 million
shares of preferred stock. There were no preferred shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2022, 2021 and
2020. Shares of Common Stock issued, in treasury and outstanding were:
Shares Issued Treasury SharesShares
Outstanding
Balance at January 1, 2020 1,996,537,778 (561,531,524) 1,435,006,254 
Shares repurchased — (25,071,845) (25,071,845)
Exercise of stock options and issuance of
   other stock awards — 9,239,812 9,239,812 
Balance at December 31, 2020 1,996,537,778 (577,363,557) 1,419,174,221 
Shares repurchased — (35,384,366) (35,384,366)
Exercise of stock options and issuance of
   other stock awards — 7,840,684 7,840,684 
Balance at December 31, 2021 1,996,537,778 (604,907,239) 1,391,630,539 
Shares repurchased — (31,556,510) (31,556,510)
Exercise of stock options and issuance of
   other stock awards — 5,817,062 5,817,062 
Balance at December 31, 2022 1,996,537,778 (630,646,687) 1,365,891,091 
Stock plan awards to employees and non-employee directors are issued from treasury shares. At December 31, 2022,
70.4 million shares of Common Stock held in treasury were reserved for stock options and other stock awards.
Share Repurchase Program:
Between 2013 and 2020, our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of a total of $23.7 billion of our Common
Stock and extended the program through December 31, 2023. Repurchases under the program are determined by
management and are wholly discretionary. Prior to January 1, 2022, we had repurchased approximately $20.0 billion of
Common Stock pursuant to this authorization. During the twelve months ended December 31, 2022, we repurchased
approximately 31.6 million shares of Common Stock at an average cost of $63.41 per share, or an aggregate cost of
approximately $2.0 billion, all of which was paid during the period. All share repurchases were funded through available
cash and commercial paper issuances. Our Board of Directors approved a new program authorizing the repurchase of
up to $6.0 billion of our Common Stock through December 31, 2025. This authorization, effective January 1, 2023,
replaces our current share repurchase program.
Note 14. Commitments and Contingencies
Legal Proceedings:
We routinely are involved in various pending or threatened legal proceedings, claims, disputes, regulatory matters and
governmental inquiries, inspections or investigations arising in the ordinary course of or incidental to our business,
including those noted below in this section. We record provisions in the consolidated financial statements for pending
legal matters when we determine that an unfavorable outcome is probable, and the amount of the loss can be
reasonably estimated. For matters we have not provided for that are reasonably possible to result in an unfavorable
outcome, management is unable to estimate the possible loss or range of loss or such amounts have been determined
to be immaterial. At present we believe that the ultimate outcome of these legal proceedings and regulatory and
governmental matters, individually and in the aggregate, will not materially harm our financial position, results of
operations or cash flows. However, legal proceedings and regulatory and governmental matters are subject to inherent
uncertainties, and unfavorable rulings or other events could occur. Unfavorable resolutions could involve substantial
fines, civil or criminal penalties, and other expenditures. In addition, in matters for which conduct remedies are sought,
unfavorable resolutions could include an injunction or other order prohibiting us from selling one or more products at all
or in particular ways, precluding particular business practices or requiring other equitable remedies. An unfavorable
outcome might result in a material adverse impact on our business, results of operations or financial position.
115
Table of Contents
On April 1, 2015, the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission ("CFTC") filed a complaint against Kraft Foods
Group and Mondelēz Global LLC (“Mondelēz Global”) in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Illinois (the
"District Court"), Eastern Division (the “CFTC action”) following its investigation of activities related to the trading of
December 2011 wheat futures contracts that occurred prior to the spin-off of Kraft Foods Group. The complaint alleged
that Kraft Foods Group and Mondelēz Global (1) manipulated or attempted to manipulate the wheat markets during the
fall of 2011; (2) violated position limit levels for wheat futures; and (3) engaged in non-competitive trades by trading
both sides of exchange-for-physical Chicago Board of Trade wheat contracts. The CFTC sought civil monetary
penalties of either triple the monetary gain for each violation of the Commodity Exchange Act (the “Act”) or $1 million for
each violation of Section 6(c)(1), 6(c)(3) or 9(a)(2) of the Act and $140,000 for each additional violation of the Act, plus
post-judgment interest; an order of permanent injunction prohibiting Kraft Foods Group and Mondelēz Global from
violating specified provisions of the Act; disgorgement of profits; and costs and fees. On May 13, 2022, the District
Court approved a settlement agreement between the CFTC and Mondelēz Global. The terms of the settlement, which
are available in the District Court’s docket, had an immaterial impact on our financial position, results of operations and
cash flows and did not include an admission by Mondelēz Global. Several class action complaints also were filed
against Kraft Foods Group and Mondelēz Global in the District Court by investors in wheat futures and options on
behalf of themselves and others similarly situated. The complaints make similar allegations as those made in the CFTC
action, and the plaintiffs are seeking monetary damages, interest and unjust enrichment; costs and fees; and injunctive,
declaratory and other unspecified relief. In June 2015, these suits were consolidated in the United States District Court
for the Northern District of Illinois as case number 15-cv-2937, Harry Ploss et al. v. Kraft Foods Group, Inc. and
Mondelēz Global LLC. On January 3, 2020, the District Court granted plaintiffs' request to certify a class. It is not
possible to predict the outcome of these matters; however, based on our Separation and Distribution Agreement with
Kraft Foods Group dated as of September 27, 2012, we expect to bear any monetary penalties or other payments in
connection with the class action. Although the CFTC action and the class action complaints involve the same alleged
conduct, the resolution of the CFTC matter may not be dispositive as to the outcome of the class action.
As previously disclosed, in November 2019, the European Commission informed us that it initiated an investigation into
our alleged infringement of European Union competition law through certain practices allegedly restricting cross-border
trade within the European Economic Area. On January 28, 2021, the European Commission announced it had taken
the next procedural step in its investigation and opened formal proceedings. We have been cooperating with the
investigation and in the fourth quarter of 2022 discussions with the European Commission progressed in an effort to
reach a negotiated, proportionate resolution to this matter. In view of the developments in this period, within other
current liabilities in the consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2022 and selling, general and administrative
expenses in the consolidated statement of earnings for 2022, we have determined to record an accrual in accordance
with U.S. GAAP of €300 million ($318 million) as an estimate of the possible cost to resolve this matter. It is not
possible to predict if our discussions will result in a negotiated resolution, or result in a negotiated resolution in a higher
amount, or when we will have clarity on the ultimate outcome of these discussions. If our discussions do not result in a
negotiated resolution, we expect that the European Commission will pursue proceedings against the Company,
including the imposition of a fine, and we would defend against any allegations made in such proceedings. There is a
possibility that the final liability could be materially higher than the amount accrued. However, due to the inherent
uncertainty of the discussions and possible outcomes, any possible loss or range of loss different from the amount
accrued is not reasonably estimable at this time.
Third-Party Guarantees:
We enter into third-party guarantees primarily to cover long-term obligations of our vendors. As part of these
transactions, we guarantee that third parties will make contractual payments or achieve performance measures. At
December 31, 2022, we had no material third-party guarantees recorded on our consolidated balance sheets.
Tax Matters:
We are a party to various tax matter proceedings incidental to our business. These proceedings are subject to inherent
uncertainties, and unfavorable outcomes could subject us to additional tax liabilities and could materially adversely
impact our business, results of operations or financial position.
116
Table of Contents
Note 15. Reclassifications from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
The following table summarizes the changes in the accumulated balances of each component of accumulated other
comprehensive earnings/(losses) attributable to Mondelēz International. Amounts reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive earnings/(losses) to net earnings (net of tax) were net losses/(gains) of $21 million in 2022, $(44)
million in 2021 and $285 million in 2020.
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Currency Translation Adjustments:
Balance at beginning of period $ (9,097)$ (8,655)$ (8,320)
Currency translation adjustments (659) (481) (398)
Reclassification to earnings related to:
Equity method investment transactions — — 29 
Tax (expense)/benefit (66) 23 47 
Other comprehensive earnings/(losses) (725) (458) (322)
Less: other comprehensive (earnings)/loss attributable to noncontrolling
interests 14 16 (13)
Balance at end of period (9,808) (9,097) (8,655)
Pension and Other Benefit Plans:
Balance at beginning of period $ (1,379)$ (1,874)$ (1,721)
Net actuarial gain/(loss) arising during period 149 398 (187)
Tax (expense)/benefit on net actuarial gain/(loss) (37) (80) 38 
Losses/(gains) reclassified into net earnings:
Amortization of experience losses and prior service costs 57 140 104 
Settlement losses and other expenses 16 22 22 
Curtailment credit 8 (17) — 
Tax (benefit) on reclassifications (21) (34) (31)
Currency impact 102 66 (99)
Other comprehensive earnings/(losses) 274 495 (153)
Balance at end of period (1,105) (1,379) (1,874)
Derivative Cash Flow Hedges:
Balance at beginning of period $ (148)$ (161)$ (213)
Net derivative gains/(losses) 160 163 (132)
Tax (expense)/benefit on net derivative gain/(loss) (13) — 27 
Losses/(gains) reclassified into net earnings:
Currency exchange contracts 8 — — 
Interest rate contracts (30) (152) 189 
Tax (benefit) on reclassifications (17) (3) (28)
Currency impact 6 5 (4)
Other comprehensive earnings/(losses) 114 13 52 
Balance at end of period (34) (148) (161)
Accumulated other comprehensive income attributable to
   Mondelēz International:
Balance at beginning of period $(10,624)$(10,690)$(10,254)
Total other comprehensive earnings/(losses) (337) 50 (423)
Less: other comprehensive (earnings)/loss attributable to noncontrolling
interests 14 16 (13)
Other comprehensive earnings/(losses) attributable to Mondelēz
International (323) 66 (436)
Balance at end of period $(10,947)$(10,624)$(10,690)
(1)Includes equity method investment transactions recorded within gain/(loss) on equity method investment transactions.
(2)These reclassified losses are included in net periodic benefit costs disclosed in Note 11, Benefit Plans.
(3)Taxes reclassified to earnings are recorded within the provision for income taxes.
(4)These reclassified losses are recorded within interest and other expense, net. (1)
(2)
(1)
 (2)
(3)
(4)
 (1) (4)
(3)
117
Table of Contents
Note 16. Income Taxes
Earnings/(losses) from continuing operations before income taxes and the provision for income taxes consisted of:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Earnings/(losses) from continuing operations before income taxes:
United States $ 463 $ 519 $ 514 
Outside United States 2,765 3,850 2,869 
$ 3,228 $ 4,369 $ 3,383 
Provision for income taxes:
United States federal:
Current $ 187 $ 297 $ 440 
Deferred (17) (31) (82)
170 266 358 
State and local:
Current 78 89 98 
Deferred 2 9 (7)
80 98 91 
Total United States 250 364 449 
Outside United States:
Current 642 599 756 
Deferred (27) 227 19 
Total outside United States 615 826 775 
Total provision for income taxes $ 865 $ 1,190 $ 1,224 
The effective income tax rate on pre-tax earnings differed from the U.S. federal statutory rate as follows:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
U.S. federal statutory rate 21.0% 21.0% 21.0%
Increase/(decrease) resulting from:
State and local income taxes, net of federal tax benefit 1.6% 1.1% 1.6%
Tax impacts from our foreign operations 2.0% (1.6)% 1.1%
Changes in judgment on realizability of deferred tax assets (1.1)% 0.1% (2.2)%
Reversal of other tax accruals no longer required (1.4)% (0.5)% (0.8)%
Tax accrual on investment in KDP (including tax impact of
   share sales) 0.5% 4.7% 6.7%
Excess tax benefits from equity compensation (0.8)% (0.7)% (1.0)%
Tax legislation 0.5% 2.3% 1.0%
Business sales (including tax impact from JDE Peet's transaction) 0.1% —% 7.4%
Foreign tax provisions under TCJA (GILTI, FDII and BEAT) 0.1% 0.8% 1.1%
Non-deductible expenses, including buyout of Clif Bar ESOP and
European Commission legal matter 4.1% 0.1% 0.1%
Other 0.2% (0.1)% 0.2%
Effective tax rate 26.8% 27.2% 36.2%
(1)The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (“TCJA”) established the Global Intangible Low-Tax Income (“GILTI”) provision, which taxes U.S. allocated
expenses and certain income from foreign operations; the Foreign-Derived Intangible Income (“FDII”) provision, which allows a(1)
118
Table of Contents
deduction against certain types of U.S. taxable income resulting in a lower effective U.S. tax rate on such income; and the Base Erosion Anti-
abuse Tax (“BEAT”), which is a minimum tax based on cross-border service payments by U.S. entities.
Our 2022 effective tax rate of 26.8% was higher due to the buyout of the Clif Bar ESOP that was recorded to earnings
before income taxes and the European Commission legal matter, for which there is no associated income tax benefits.
Excluding these impacts, our effective tax rate was 22.6%, which reflects unfavorable provisions from the U.S. tax code
and the establishment of a valuation allowance related to a deferred tax asset arising from the 2022 Ukraine loss,
largely offset by favorable impacts from the mix of pre-tax income in various non-U.S. jurisdictions. The 22.6% includes
a favorable discrete net tax benefit of $96 million, driven by a $72 million net benefit from the release of liabilities for
uncertain tax positions due to expirations of statutes of limitations and audit settlements in several jurisdictions and a
$51 million net benefit from the Chipita acquisition, partially offset by $17 million expense from tax law changes in
various jurisdictions.
Our 2021 effective tax rate of 27.2% was higher due to the $187 million net tax expense incurred in connection with the
KDP share sales during the second and third quarters. Excluding this impact, our effective tax rate was 23.0%, which
reflects unfavorable provisions from the 2017 U.S. tax reform and taxes on earnings from equity method investments
(these earnings are reported separately on our consolidated statements of earnings and not within earnings before
income taxes), largely offset by favorable impacts from the mix of pre-tax income in various non-U.S. jurisdictions. The
23.0% includes a discrete net tax benefit of $2 million, primarily driven by a $47 million net benefit from the release of
liabilities for uncertain tax positions due to expirations of statutes of limitations and audit settlements in several
jurisdictions and a $44 million benefit from two U.S. tax returns amended to reflect new guidance from the U.S.
Treasury Department, offset by $100 million net tax expense from the increase of our deferred tax liabilities resulting
from enacted tax legislation (mainly in the United Kingdom).
Our 2020 effective tax rate of 36.2% was higher due to the $452 million net tax expense incurred in connection with the
JDE Peet's transaction and four KDP share sales that occurred during 2020 (the related gains were reported as gains
on equity method investments). Excluding these impacts, our effective tax rate was 22.8%, which reflects unfavorable
provisions from U.S. tax reform and taxes on earnings from equity method investments (these earnings are reported
separately on our consolidated statements of earnings and not within earnings before income taxes), largely offset by
favorable impacts from the mix of pre-tax income in various non-U.S. jurisdictions and discrete net tax benefits of
$119 million. The discrete net benefits were primarily driven by the $70 million net benefit from the release of the China
valuation allowance and a $50 million net benefit from the release of liabilities for uncertain tax positions due to
expirations of statutes of limitations and audit settlements in several jurisdictions.
119
Table of Contents
Tax effects of temporary differences that gave rise to deferred income tax assets and liabilities consisted of:
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021
 (in millions)
Deferred income tax assets:
Accrued postretirement and postemployment benefits $ 83 $ 114 
Other employee benefits 156 150 
Accrued expenses 649 454 
Loss carryforwards 664 685 
Tax credit carryforwards 786 786 
Other 481 468 
Total deferred income tax assets 2,819 2,657 
Valuation allowance (1,257) (1,280)
Net deferred income tax assets $ 1,562 $ 1,377 
Deferred income tax liabilities:
Intangible assets, including impact from Swiss tax reform $ (3,279)$ (3,214)
Property, plant and equipment (708) (638)
Accrued pension costs (57) 23 
Other (482) (451)
Total deferred income tax liabilities (4,526) (4,280)
Net deferred income tax liabilities $ (2,964)$ (2,903)
Our significant valuation allowances are in the U.S. and Switzerland. The U.S. valuation allowance mainly relates to
excess foreign tax credits generated by the deemed repatriation under U.S. tax reform while the Swiss valuation
allowance brings the allowed step-up of intangible assets recorded under Swiss tax reform to the amount more likely
than not to be realized. Our total valuation allowance was $1,280 million as of January 1, 2022 and $1,257 million as of
December 31, 2022. The $23 million net change consisted of $79 million additions less $102 million reductions.
At December 31, 2022, the Company has tax-effected loss carryforwards of $664 million, of which $34 million will
expire at various dates between 2023 and 2042 and the remaining $630 million can be carried forward indefinitely.
As of December 31, 2022, the company is indefinitely reinvested in unremitted earnings of approximately $4.4 billion, of
which approximately $1.2 billion has already been subject to U.S. tax but would incur approximately $90 million of local
costs if repatriated, which has not been recognized in our financial statements. It is not practicable to quantify the total
U.S. tax impact from all our indefinitely reinvested earnings. Future tax law changes or changes in the needs of our
non-U.S. subsidiaries could require us to recognize deferred tax liabilities on a portion, or all, of our accumulated
earnings that are currently indefinitely reinvested.
120
Table of Contents
The changes in our unrecognized tax benefits were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
January 1 $ 446 $ 442 $ 426 
Increases from positions taken during prior periods 16 31 35 
Decreases from positions taken during prior periods (9) (21) (17)
Increases from positions taken during the current period 48 47 48 
Decreases relating to settlements with taxing authorities (54) (13) (27)
Reductions resulting from the lapse of the applicable
   statute of limitations (22) (26) (29)
Currency/other (1) (14) 6 
December 31 $ 424 $ 446 $ 442 
As of January 1, 2022, our unrecognized tax benefits were $446 million. If we had recognized all of these benefits, the
net impact on our income tax provision would have been $372 million. Our unrecognized tax benefits were $424 million
at December 31, 2022, and if we had recognized all of these benefits, the net impact on our income tax provision would
have been $352 million. Within the next 12 months, our unrecognized tax benefits could increase by approximately $40
million due to unfavorable audit developments or decrease by approximately $70 million due to audit settlements and
the expiration of statutes of limitations in various jurisdictions. We include accrued interest and penalties related to
uncertain tax positions in our tax provision. We had accrued interest and penalties of $173 million as of January 1,
2022 and $162 million as of December 31, 2022. Our 2022 provision for income taxes included $1 million expense for
interest and penalties.
In connection with the 2017 enacted U.S. tax reform, we recorded a $1.3 billion transition tax liability that is payable in
installments through 2026. As of December 31, 2022, the remaining liability was approximately $570 million.
Our income tax filings are regularly examined by federal, state and non-U.S. tax authorities. U.S. federal, state and
non-U.S. jurisdictions have statutes of limitations generally ranging from three to five years; however, these statutes are
often extended by mutual agreement with the tax authorities. The earliest year still open to examination by U.S. federal
and state tax authorities is 2016 and years still open to examination by non-U.S. tax authorities in major jurisdictions
include (earliest open tax year in parentheses): India (2005), Switzerland (2018), China (2012), the United Kingdom
(2015), and Greece (2017).
121
Table of Contents
Note 17. Earnings per Share
Basic and diluted earnings per share (“EPS”) were calculated as follows:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions, except per share data)
Net earnings $ 2,726 $ 4,314 $ 3,569 
Noncontrolling interest earnings (9) (14) (14)
Net earnings attributable to Mondelēz International $ 2,717 $ 4,300 $ 3,555 
Weighted-average shares for basic EPS 1,378 1,403 1,431 
Plus incremental shares from assumed conversions
   of stock options and long-term incentive plan shares 7 10 10 
Weighted-average shares for diluted EPS 1,385 1,413 1,441 
Basic earnings per share attributable to
   Mondelēz International $ 1.97 $ 3.06 $ 2.48 
Diluted earnings per share attributable to
   Mondelēz International $ 1.96 $ 3.04 $ 2.47 
We exclude antidilutive Mondelēz International stock options and long-term incentive plan shares from our calculation
of weighted-average shares for diluted EPS, which are 3.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2022, 3.1 million
for the year ended December 31, 2021 and 3.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2020.
Note 18. Segment Reporting
We manufacture and market primarily snack food products, including chocolate, biscuits and baked snacks, as well as
gum & candy, cheese & grocery and powdered beverages.
We manage our global business and report operating results through geographic units. We manage our operations by
region to leverage regional operating scale, manage different and changing business environments more effectively
and pursue growth opportunities as they arise across our key markets. Our regional management teams have
responsibility for the business, product categories and financial results in the regions.
Our operations and management structure are organized into four operating segments:
•Latin America
•AMEA
•Europe
•North America
We use segment operating income to evaluate segment performance and allocate resources. We believe it is
appropriate to disclose this measure to help investors analyze segment performance and trends. Segment operating
income excludes unrealized gains and losses on hedging activities (which are a component of cost of sales), general
corporate expenses (which are a component of selling, general and administrative expenses), amortization of intangible
assets, gains and losses on divestitures and acquisitions and acquisition-related costs (which are a component of
selling, general and administrative expenses) in all periods presented. We exclude these items from segment operating
income in order to provide better transparency of our segment operating results. Furthermore, we centrally manage
benefit plan non-service income and interest and other expense, net. Accordingly, we do not present these items by
segment because they are excluded from the segment profitability measure that management reviews.
122
Table of Contents
Our segment net revenues and earnings, reflecting our current segment structure for all periods presented, were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Net revenues:
Latin America $ 3,629 $ 2,797 $ 2,477 
AMEA 6,767 6,465 5,740 
Europe 11,420 11,156 10,207 
North America 9,680 8,302 8,157 
Net revenues $ 31,496 $ 28,720 $ 26,581 
Earnings before income taxes:
Operating income:
Latin America $ 388 $ 261 $ 189 
AMEA 929 1,054 821 
Europe 1,481 2,092 1,775 
North America 1,769 1,371 1,587 
Unrealized gains/(losses) on hedging activities
(mark-to-market impacts) (326) 279 16 
General corporate expenses (245) (253) (326)
Amortization of intangible assets (132) (134) (194)
Gain on acquisition — 8 — 
Acquisition-related costs (330) (25) (15)
Operating income 3,534 4,653 3,853 
Benefit plan non-service income 117 163 138 
Interest and other expense, net (423) (447) (608)
Earnings before income taxes $ 3,228 $ 4,369 $ 3,383 
Items impacting our segment operating results are discussed in Note 1, Summary of Significant Accounting Policies,
Note 2, Acquisitions and Divestitures, Note 4, Property, Plant and Equipment, Note 6, Goodwill and Intangible Assets,
Note 8, Restructuring Program, and Note 14, Commitments and Contingencies. Also see Note 9, Debt and Borrowing
Arrangements, and Note 10, Financial Instruments, for more information on our interest and other expense, net for
each period.
123
Table of Contents
Total assets, depreciation expense and capital expenditures by segment, reflecting our current segment structure for all
periods presented, were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Total assets:
Latin America $ 6,164 $ 4,106 $ 4,181 
AMEA 9,882 10,386 9,997 
Europe 22,713 20,927 21,442 
North America 26,603 23,321 23,297 
Equity method investments 4,879 5,289 6,036 
Unallocated assets and adjustments 920 3,063 2,857 
Total assets $ 71,161 $ 67,092 $ 67,810 
(1)Segment assets do not reflect outstanding intercompany asset balances that have been eliminated at a segment level.
(2)Unallocated assets consist primarily of cash and cash equivalents, deferred income taxes, centrally held property, plant and equipment, prepaid
pension assets and derivative financial instrument balances. Final adjustments for jurisdictional netting of deferred tax assets and liabilities is
done at a consolidated level.
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Depreciation expense :
Latin America $ 117 $ 105 $ 101 
AMEA 169 173 159 
Europe 256 257 238 
North America 148 148 154 
Total depreciation expense $ 690 $ 683 $ 652 
(1)Includes depreciation expense related to owned property, plant and equipment. Does not include amortization of intangible assets or leased
assets. Refer to the consolidated statement of cash flows for total depreciation and amortization expenses.
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Capital expenditures:
Latin America $ 113 $ 165 $ 219 
AMEA 229 208 177 
Europe 355 409 295 
North America 209 183 172 
Total capital expenditures $ 906 $ 965 $ 863 (1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(1)
124
Table of Contents
Geographic data for net revenues (recognized in the countries where products are sold from) and long-lived assets,
excluding deferred taxes, goodwill, intangible assets and equity method investments, were:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Net revenues:
United States $ 8,315 $ 7,146 $ 7,130 
Other 23,181 21,574 19,451 
Total net revenues $ 31,496 $ 28,720 $ 26,581 
 As of December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Long-lived assets:
United States $ 2,740 $ 1,851 $ 1,956 
United Kingdom 932 1,125 888 
Other 8,886 7,675 7,784 
Total long-lived assets $ 12,558 $ 10,651 $ 10,628 
Net revenues by product category, reflecting our current segment structure for all periods presented, were:
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2022
 Latin
America AMEA EuropeNorth
America Total
 (in millions)
Biscuits & Baked Snacks $ 1,013 $ 2,515 $ 3,818 $ 8,262 $ 15,608 
Chocolate 1,003 2,520 5,646 317 9,486 
Gum & Candy 840 780 691 1,101 3,412 
Beverages 409 572 119 — 1,100 
Cheese & Grocery 364 380 1,146 — 1,890 
Total net revenues $ 3,629 $ 6,767 $ 11,420 $ 9,680 $ 31,496 
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2021 
 Latin
America AMEA EuropeNorth
America Total
 (in millions)
Biscuits & Baked Snacks $ 799 $ 2,254 $ 3,354 $ 7,145 $ 13,552 
Chocolate 758 2,395 5,836 282 9,271 
Gum & Candy 567 816 614 875 2,872 
Beverages 359 550 126 — 1,035 
Cheese & Grocery 314 450 1,226 — 1,990 
Total net revenues $ 2,797 $ 6,465 $ 11,156 $ 8,302 $ 28,720 (1)
125
Table of Contents
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2020 
 Latin
America AMEA EuropeNorth
America Total
 (in millions)
Biscuits & Baked Snacks $ 669 $ 2,045 $ 3,058 $ 7,024 $ 12,796 
Chocolate 609 2,019 5,268 253 8,149 
Gum & Candy 474 696 612 880 2,662 
Beverages 403 544 102 — 1,049 
Cheese & Grocery 322 436 1,167 — 1,925 
Total net revenues $ 2,477 $ 5,740 $ 10,207 $ 8,157 $ 26,581 
(1)Our snack product categories include biscuits & baked snacks, chocolate and gum & candy. During the first quarter of 2022, we realigned some
of our products between our biscuits & baked snacks and chocolate categories; as such, we reclassified the product category net revenues on a
basis consistent with the 2022 presentation.(1)
126
Table of Contents
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.
None.
ltem 9A. Controls and Procedures.
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We have established disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be
disclosed in our reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported
within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of the SEC, and such information is accumulated and
communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer (“CEO”) and Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”),
as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. Management, together with our CEO and CFO,
evaluated the effectiveness of the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2022. Based on
this evaluation, the CEO and CFO concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures were effective as of
December 31, 2022.
Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as
defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act. Our internal control over financial reporting is a
process designed by, or under the supervision of, our CEO and CFO, or persons performing similar functions, and
effected by the Company’s Board of Directors, management and other personnel to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Our internal control over financial reporting includes those
written policies and procedures that:
•pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions
and dispositions of assets;
•provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;
•provide reasonable assurance that receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with
management and director authorization; and
•provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or
disposition of assets that could have a material effect on the consolidated financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
Management assessed the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022.
Management based this assessment on criteria for effective internal control over financial reporting described in
Internal Control Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (“COSO”). The scope of Management’s assessment of internal control over financial reporting excludes
Chipita, Clif Bar and Ricolino because they were acquired by the Company in purchase business combinations in 2022.
The total assets and total net revenues of Chipita, Clif Bar and Ricolino collectively represent 1.2% and 3.5%,
respectively, of the related consolidated financial statement amounts as of and for the year ended December 31, 2022.
Based on this assessment, management concluded that the Company’s internal control over financial reporting is
effective as of December 31, 2022, based on the criteria in Internal Control Integrated Framework issued by the COSO.
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, has audited the effectiveness of our
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, as stated in their report that appears under Item 8.
February 3, 2023
127
Table of Contents
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management, together with our CEO and CFO, evaluated the changes in our internal control over financial reporting
during the quarter ended December 31, 2022. There were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting
during the quarter ended December 31, 2022, that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect,
our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information.
None.
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections.
Not applicable.
128
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10.   Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information required by this Item 10 is included under the heading “Information about our Executive Officers” in Part I,
Item 1 of this Form 10-K, as well as under the headings “Election of Directors,” “Corporate Governance – Governance
Guidelines,” “Corporate Governance – Codes of Conduct,” “Board Committees and Membership – Audit Committee”
and “Ownership of Equity Securities – Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports” in our definitive Proxy Statement for our
Annual Meeting of Shareholders scheduled to be held on May 17, 2023 (“2023 Proxy Statement”). All of this information
from the 2023 Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report.
Item 11.   Executive Compensation.
Information required by this Item 11 is included under the headings “Board Committees and Membership – People and
Compensation Committee,” “Compensation of Non-Employee Directors,” “Compensation Discussion and Analysis,”
“Executive Compensation Tables,” “People and Compensation Committee Report for the Year Ended December 31,
2022” and “CEO Pay Ratio” in our 2023 Proxy Statement. All of this information is incorporated by reference into this
Annual Report.
Item 12.   Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.
The number of shares to be issued upon exercise or vesting of grants issued under, and the number of shares
remaining available for future issuance under, our equity compensation plans at December 31, 2022 were:
Equity Compensation Plan Information
Number of Securities to
be Issued Upon Exercise
of Outstanding
Options, Warrants
and RightsWeighted Average
Exercise Price of
Outstanding Options,
Warrants and RightsNumber of Securities
Remaining Available for
Future Issuance under
Equity Compensation
Plans (excluding
securities reflected
in column (a)) 
(a) (b) (c)
Equity compensation plans
approved by security holders 24,935,153 $46.31 45,500,000
 
(1)Includes outstanding options, deferred stock units and performance share units and excludes restricted stock.
(2)Weighted average exercise price of outstanding options only.
(3)Shares available for grant under our Amended and Restated 2005 Performance Incentive Plan.
Information related to the security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management is included in our 2023
Proxy Statement under the heading “Ownership of Equity Securities” and is incorporated by reference into this Annual
Report.
Item 13.   Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.
Information required by this Item 13 is included under the headings “Corporate Governance – Director Independence”
and “Corporate Governance – Review of Transactions with Related Persons” in our 2023 Proxy Statement. All of this
information is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report.
Item 14.   Principal Accountant Fees and Services.
Information required by this Item 14 is included under the heading “Board Committees and Membership – Audit
Committee” in our 2023 Proxy Statement. All of this information is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report. (1)  (2) (3)
129
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules.
 
(a) Index to Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedules
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 238) 66
Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 69
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Earnings for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 70
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 71
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 72
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 73
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 74
Schedules other than those listed above have been omitted either because such schedules are not required or are not
applicable.
 
(b) The following exhibits are filed as part of, or incorporated by reference into, this Annual Report:
2.1 Separation and Distribution Agreement between the Registrant and Kraft Foods Group,
Inc., dated as of September 27, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to the
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on October 1, 2012).
2.2 Canadian Asset Transfer Agreement, by and between Mondelez Canada Inc. and Kraft
Canada Inc., dated as of September 29, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.3 to
the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).
2.3 Master Ownership and License Agreement Regarding Patents, Trade Secrets and Related
Intellectual Property, among Kraft Foods Global Brands LLC, Kraft Foods Group Brands
LLC, Kraft Foods UK Ltd. and Kraft Foods R&D Inc., dated as of October 1, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-
K filed with the SEC on October 1, 2012).
2.4 Master Ownership and License Agreement Regarding Trademarks and Related
Intellectual Property, by and between Kraft Foods Global Brands LLC and Kraft Foods
Group Brands LLC., dated as of September 27, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on October 1,
2012).
3.1 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Registrant, effective March 14,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on May 8, 2013).
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Registrant, effective as of October 19, 2022
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed with the SEC on October 24, 2022).
4.1 Description of the Registrant's capital stock and debt securities registered under Section
12 of the Exchange Act.
4.2 The Registrant agrees to furnish to the SEC upon request copies of any instruments
defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of the Registrant and its consolidated
subsidiaries that does not exceed 10 percent of the total assets of the Registrant and its
consolidated subsidiaries.
4.3 Indenture, by and between the Registrant and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas
(as successor trustee to The Bank of New York and The Chase Manhattan Bank), dated
as of October 17, 2001 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Registrant’s
Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Reg. No. 333-86478) filed with the SEC on April 18,
2002).
4.4 Indenture between the Registrant and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as
trustee, dated as of March 6, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the
Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 24, 2017).
4.5 Supplemental Indenture No. 1, dated February 13, 2019, between the Registrant and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the
Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on February 13, 2019).
4.6 Supplemental Indenture No. 2, dated April 13, 2020, between Mondelēz International, Inc.
and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on April 13, 2020).
130
Table of Contents
4.7 Indenture, by and between Mondelez International Holdings Netherlands B.V, the
Registrant and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, dated as of October 28, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-
K filed with the SEC on October 28, 2016).
4.8 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 19, 2019, by and among Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., as issuer, Mondelēz International, Inc., as
guarantor, and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC
on September 20, 2019).
4.9 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 2, 2019, by and among Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., as issuer, Mondelēz International, Inc., as
guarantor, and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC
on October 2, 2019).
4.10 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 22, 2020, by and among Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., as issuer, Mondelēz International, Inc., as
guarantor, and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC
on September 24, 2020).
4.11 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 9, 2021, by and among Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., as issuer, Mondelēz International, Inc., as
guarantor, and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as trustee, paying agent,
transfer agent and registrar (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on September 13, 2021).
4.12 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 24, 2021, by and among Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., as issuer, Mondelēz International, Inc., as
guarantor, and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC
on September 24, 2021).
4.13 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 15, 2022, by and among Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., as issuer, Mondelēz International, Inc., as
guarantor, and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC
on September 16, 2022).
10.1 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement, dated February 23, 2022, by and among Mondelēz
International, Inc., the lenders named therein and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on February 23, 2022).
10.2 Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement, dated February 23, 2022, by and among Mondelēz
International, Inc., the lenders named therein and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on February 23, 2022).
10.3 Term Credit Agreement, dated March 31, 2022, by and among Mondelēz International,
Inc., the lenders named therein and Mizuho Bank, Ltd., as Administrative Agent
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed with the SEC on March 31, 2022).
10.4 Term Credit Agreement, dated July 11, 2022, by and among Mondelēz International, Inc.,
the lenders named therein and Mizuho Bank, Ltd., as Administrative Agent (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the
SEC on July 12, 2022).
10.5 Tax Sharing and Indemnity Agreement, by and between the Registrant and Kraft Foods
Group, Inc., dated as of September 27, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on October 1, 2012).
10.6 Global Contribution Agreement by and among Mondelēz International Holdings, LLC,
Acorn Holdings B.V., Charger Top HoldCo B.V. and Charger OpCo B.V., dated May 7,
2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on August 8, 2014).*
10.7 Amendment Agreement to Global Contribution Agreement by and among Mondelēz
International Holdings LLC, Acorn Holdings B.V., Jacobs Douwe Egberts B.V. (formerly
Charger Top HoldCo B.V.) and Jacobs Douwe Egberts International B.V. (formerly Charger
OpCo B.V.), dated July 28, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the
Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on July 31, 2015).*
10.8 Investor Rights Agreement between Acorn Holdings B.V., Mondelez Coffee HoldCo B.V.
and JDE Peet’s B.V., dated May 25, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on June 2, 2020).
10.9 Letter Agreement between Mondelez Coffee HoldCo B.V., Acorn Holdings B.V., Delta
Charger HoldCo B.V., JDE Minority Holdings B.V. and JACOBS DOUWE EGBERTS B.V.,
dated May 30, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on June 2, 2020).
131
Table of Contents
10.10 Investor Rights Agreement by and among Keurig Dr Pepper Inc., Maple Holdings B.V. and
Mondelēz International Holdings LLC, dated July 9, 2018 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on July 10,
2018).
10.11 Mondelez International Holdings Netherlands B.V. Deed of Adherence to the Investor
Rights Agreement, dated July 23, 2021, and Deed of Assignment of Rights Under the
Investor Rights Agreement between Mondelez Coffee HoldCo B.V. and Mondelez
International Holdings Netherlands B.V., dated July 23, 2021 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on
November 2, 2021).
10.12 Settlement Agreement, between the Registrant and Kraft Foods Group, Inc., dated
June 22, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on July 31, 2015).
10.13 Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance Incentive Plan,
amended and restated as of February 3, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2
to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on May 3, 2017).+
10.14 2020 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Non-Qualified Global Stock Option Agreement (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.4 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on
April 29, 2020).+
10.15 2021 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Non-Qualified Global Stock Option Agreement (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on
April 28, 2021).+
10.16 2022 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Non-Qualified Global Stock Option Agreement (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.4 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on
April 26, 2022).+
10.17 2020 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Global Long-Term Incentive Grant Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April
29, 2020).+
10.18 2021 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Global Long-Term Incentive Grant Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April
28, 2021).+
10.19 2022 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Global Long-Term Incentive Grant Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April
26, 2022).+
10.20 2020 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Global Deferred Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.6 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April 29,
2020).+
10.21 2021 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Global Deferred Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4 to the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April 28,
2021).+
10.22 2022 Form of Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Performance
Incentive Plan Global Deferred Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.6 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April 26,
2022).+
10.23 Mondelēz Global LLC Supplemental Benefits Plan I, effective as of September 1, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-
K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.24 First Amendment to the Mondelēz Global LLC Supplemental Benefits Plan I, dated
December 20, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.26 to the Registrant's Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 8, 2019).+
10.25 Mondelēz Global LLC Supplemental Benefits Plan II, effective as of September 1, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.11 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-
K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.26 First Amendment to the Mondelēz Global LLC Supplemental Benefits Plan II, dated
December 20, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.28 to the Registrant's Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 8, 2019).+
10.27 Form of Mondelēz Global LLC Amended and Restated Cash Enrollment Agreement
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.12 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-
K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.28 Form of Mondelēz Global LLC Amended and Restated Employee Grantor Trust
Enrollment Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.13 to the Registrant’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.29 Mondelēz International, Inc. Amended and Restated 2006 Stock Compensation Plan for
Non-Employee Directors, amended and restated as of October 1, 2012 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.14 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the
g p
SEC on February 25, 2013).+
132
Table of Contents
10.30 Mondelēz International, Inc. 2001 Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors,
amended as of December 31, 2008 and restated as of January 1, 2013 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.15 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the
SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.31 Mondelēz International, Inc. Change in Control Plan for Key Executives, amended May
14, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on July 31, 2019).+
10.32 Mondelēz Global LLC Executive Deferred Compensation Plan, effective as of October 1,
2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.17 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.33 Mondelēz Global LLC Executive Deferred Compensation Plan Adoption Agreement,
effective as of October 1, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.18 to the
Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.34 Deferred Compensation Plan Trust Document, by and between Mondelēz Global LLC and
Wilmington Trust Retirement and Institutional Services Company, dated as of
September 18, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.19 to the Registrant’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 25, 2013).+
10.35 Offer of Employment Letter, between the Registrant and Dirk Van de Put, dated July 27,
2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed with the SEC on August 2, 2017).+
10.36 Offer of Employment Letter, between Mondelēz Global LLC and Paulette Alviti, dated April
12, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on July 26, 2018).+
10.37 International Permanent Transfer Letter, between Mondelēz Global LLC and Luca
Zaramella, effective August 1, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on August 7, 2018).+
10.38 Employment Letter, between Mondelez Europe and Vinzenz P. Gruber, dated November
29, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to the Registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on May 1, 2019).+
10.39 Offer of Employment Letter, between the Registrant and Gustavo Valle, dated January 6,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on April 29, 2020).+
10.40 Offer of Employment Letter, between Mondelēz Global LLC and Laura Stein, dated
November 9, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.41 to the Registrant's Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 5, 2021).+
10.41 Offer of Employment Letter, between Mondelēz Global LLC and Mariano Lozano, dated
April 1, 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC on July 26, 2022).+
10.42 Offer of Employment Letter, between the Registrant and Daniel E. Ramos, dated
September 27, 2022.+
10.43 Form of Indemnification Agreement for Non-Employee Directors (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.28 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the
SEC on February 27, 2009).+
10.44 Indemnification Agreement between the Registrant and Dirk Van de Put, dated
November 20, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.37 to the Registrant’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 9, 2018).+
21.1 Subsidiaries of the Registrant, as of December 31, 2022.
23.1 Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting
Firm.
31.1
 Certification of the Registrant’s Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-
14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, as adopted pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2
 Certification of the Registrant’s Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-
14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, as adopted pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1
 Certifications of the Registrant’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley
Act of 2002.
101
 The following materials from Mondelēz International’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
fiscal year ended December 31, 2022, formatted in iXBRL (Inline eXtensible Business
Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings, (ii) the Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Earnings, (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets, (iv) the
Consolidated Statements of Equity, (v) the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows and
(vi) Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
133
Table of Contents
104 The cover page from Mondelēz International’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal
year ended December 31, 2022, formatted in Inline XBRL (included as Exhibit 101).
* Portions of this exhibit (indicated by asterisks) have been omitted pursuant to a request for
confidential treatment and have been separately filed with the SEC.
+ Indicates a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
None.
134
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
MONDELĒZ INTERNATIONAL, INC.
By: /s/  LUCA ZARAMELLA
 Luca Zaramella
 Executive Vice President
 and Chief Financial Officer
(Duly Authorized Officer)
Date: February 3, 2023
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
Signature Title Date
/s/    DIRK VAN DE PUT Director, Chairman and
Chief Executive OfficerFebruary 3, 2023
(Dirk Van de Put)
/s/    LUCA ZARAMELLA Executive Vice President and
Chief Financial OfficerFebruary 3, 2023
(Luca Zaramella)
/s/    MICHAEL CALL Senior Vice President,
Corporate Controller and
Chief Accounting OfficerFebruary 3, 2023
(Michael Call)
/s/    LEWIS W.K. BOOTH Director February 3, 2023
(Lewis W.K. Booth)
/s/    CHARLES E. BUNCH Director February 3, 2023
(Charles E. Bunch)
/s/    ERTHARIN COUSIN Director February 3, 2023
(Ertharin Cousin)
/s/    LOIS D. JULIBER  Director February 3, 2023
(Lois D. Juliber)
/s/    ANINDITA MUKHERJEE Director February 3, 2023
(Anindita Mukherjee)
/s/    JORGE S. MESQUITA Director February 3, 2023
(Jorge S. Mesquita)
/s/    JANE HAMILTON NIELSEN Director February 3, 2023
(Jane Hamilton Nielsen)
/s/    CHRISTIANA S. SHI  Director February 3, 2023
(Christiana S. Shi)
/s/    PATRICK T. SIEWERT  Director February 3, 2023
(Patrick T. Siewert)
/s/  MICHAEL A. TODMAN Director February 3, 2023
(Michael A. Todman)
135
